00:02:03
How do you market war. How do you sell
combat to the people who are actually going to have to engage in it
.
00:02:13
It's not a hypothetical question by the way any military that
requires volunteers to decide they want to join the service has to think about how
you actually sell the idea to the people who you know have to take part
in it. An idea that carries with it the potential for some very
nasty outcomes in the very worst of circumstances doesn't it's a difficult job
perhaps to market combat. It's easier to do in peacetime
though right if you have to sell suntan oil to people in Alaska
. You might be able to pull that off in the summer. In December it's a really tough
sell before the first world war breaks out.
00:02:55
If you're trying to market recruitment into the British army you can sell the
same sort of talking points the same sort of angles that have worked for governments and
monarchies and tribes going back to the beginning of civilization. The military has long
had certain selling points. I think we're all familiar with them.
00:03:14
You could add regular pay thrown in to that as well. The
heroism the adventure the status I mean you know there's a
lot of things. Some people just like to fight I mean you never know. The problem
is that that's a pre-one thousand nine hundred fourteen you know
talking point when it comes to what happens when the first world war breaks out
and how that just totally messes with your marketing strategy unless you're
marketing hell as a travel destination
.
00:03:47
You can't no matter how much press censorship you have in the British had plenty in the first world
war just like everyone else. You can't mask those kind of casualty numbers and you can
mask the reality sort of stuff that some of these newspaper reporters who were censored during the
war after the war you know they would write books telling you the real story what really happened
because you couldn't have imagined it and it was all censored by the press.
00:04:10
Even with the censorship you can't hide the death and destruction and
dismemberment and you see the people returning to your hometown with the horrible wounds you hear some of the
rumors and stories. You know it's not going to be fun.
00:04:24
All of a sudden the marketers in Great Britain's
recruitment operation at the play hardball
. No more just throwing out carrots they're going to use some sticks too.
00:04:38
In the U.S. We have a twenty first century volunteer army ourselves in the U.S. uses
just carrots to encourage people to join up. We'll pay you more
. We'll pay you for college. You'll make something of your life I mean there's all these different things that they used to motivate
people but there's not very many sticks in the U.S. system. Once the first
couple of weeks of the First World War happened and everybody together finds out
how enormous this is going to be and in an absolutely stunning group wake up call where the light goes on
over everyone's head they're going oh my gosh we don't have enough resources. Oh my
gosh we don't have enough money for a war like this and oh my gosh we don't have enough people.
And even some of these larger states where you think to yourself you know people should be a problem look at how many people are
coming up every generation. Remember manpower in the old
you know air quotes means manpower across the board not just the people fighting on the front line
but the people that can still be miners to extract the material you
need to carry on the war or people working in arms manufacturing plants so that they
can build the bombs you need to fight the war. In other words if you take too much to
throw on the fighting line you won't have enough people back home making the stuff that the people on
the fighting line need to win. Manpower becomes a very big deal. All these other
countries in the war Germany France Russia no problem they've spent decades working out a
conscription operation where they draft people you know you come of age you do a
couple of years in the service and then you become part of the reserves and then you become part of the other Reserve and the
heavier and older reserve and you know after a while they got a whole revolving
self-perpetuating system in place where as every generation comes up they're cranking out new
soldiers except for Great Britain. There the last
volunteer service involved in this conflict when it breaks out. It puts unique
pressures on them the first thing they do is simply ask people
to join up. Remember in one thousand fourteen you didn't quite know what you were in for you could still sell the old
selling points the uniforms are wonderful and the women you look dashing and you'd just be you know I mean
war adventure kill the boss you know all the good methods that King made you king and country
all the things that have always worked and still work by the way and a lot of cases especially in peacetime
worked in more folks in Britain and Scotland and Canada and Australia all these
places signed up and they even could handle they were looking for a couple hundred thousand got a lot
more than that but that's before the casualties start happening
a lot of patriotic Briton signed up but you don't know how many patriotic Britons you're going to need and not
just in one big lump but every month to replace the troops you lose
in late one thousand and fifteen the British just lose deliberately
and they walk away after a couple of months with two hundred fifty. Two thousand casualties.
00:07:29
You don't just replace those by playing nice and easy and saying come and fight for King
and Country you're using more hardball methods and one of the ones that I've always thought was
just indicative of something that if you imagined it in modern times it boggles the mind using a strategy like
this today but it's absolute genius. It shows exactly the most
vulnerable point in a young man's you know psyche. I mean the place where if you're a
marketer you're looking for for you know what motivates people how you can touch these
these elements of influence and the owner of the feather the white
feather movement is absolutely brilliant in that regard I mean it's almost devious you try to
imagine our government doing something like this today with a modern twenty first century technology it's interesting to think about
but basically you know one August early September one hundred fourteen rolls around.
00:08:17
There's an admiral in the British Admiralty who's who's working like everyone else to think about him how can we encourage
more people to sign up for this horrible war and comes up with you
know and attack on a motivation a marketing strategy. He's going to
enlist patriotic young British women to walk the streets of all these
towns in Britain their home town you know where there are people they know and if they see
men not in uniform who look like they could be or should be they're going to
go up surround this person and start saying the most horrible thing
you are a coward and all these terrible things to them. Pretty women
in a public dressing you down if you're eighteen years old that's a
pretty good marketing. You know a chink in someone's armor to exploit
not just that you're probably in usually were on the street of your hometown where the passers
by know you or your family. This is a
profoundly embarrassing moment you know for everyone around you
everyone connected with you. God forbid if you have a girlfriend she's going to think this looks pretty bad for
her too I mean the effect was was huge. And then before this little group of women
were done with you they would put a white feather signifying
cowardice on your lapel or somewhere very visible. You know on
you. This was not an unusual
occurrence there are accounts from people that say they were afraid to go outside the house sometimes
because these patriotic and zealous women who were really just trying to
help that's the funny part this is the society motivating patriotism all these things right it's it's all the
right virtues. But I've got an account from a sixteen year old
boy who had to go through this and then he signed up for the service because he was
so deathly embarrassed and afraid and in shock and ashamed and the service person laughed
him out of the room but then said he looks so downtrodden he exaggerated his height exaggerated
his age exaggerated his weight and he was in at
sixteen under one hundred ten pounds on the western
front. It's absolutely deviously clever. Once
again I try to imagine if using it today.
00:10:35
You know these ideas could backfire though. These creative marketing recruitment ideas for
example the government felt the need to put out symbols that people could wear who had
already done their service overseas or had been wounded and honorably discharged or
worked for some really important armaments or war related industry and couldn't be spared because
apparently enough of those people were being mistakenly given the order of the white feather
treatment to make that an important thing for the government to do. There were other
creative marketing plans not sticks but carrots and one of them. Another brilliant one when you
think about it on the surface involved the British government explaining to recruits that if you sign up with your
pals your buddies you get all served together and so people joined
up from the same street or the same pub or the same community or the same
fraternity or the same profession and they all served together and they had wonderful names these are like
military unit names that they are still known by.
00:11:31
I mean there were the Liverpool pals or the Grimsby chums and
these friends all went to the service you figure if you got to serve humans will do it with your friends. But then you get to watch your
friends die. That's the part we didn't really consider when we signed up and it sounded kind of fun
. Not just that when these units would get decimated in some of these terrible encounters for
example you could be walking down a road with your pals in the open and all of a sudden get
caught by artillery fire. Suffer eighty percent casualties and then instead of the
losses and the suffering and the grief being spread out sort of diluted across the with
the breadth of the entire British Isles or British Empire for that matter
some local community or some fraternity or some profession just
gets pounded. And there are villages and towns in Britain now that had
these terrible days just happen to the whole community and pretty much everybody suffers a
major loss in one way or the other.
00:12:26
That's the downside of that clever marketing plan by nine hundred sixteen
there's nothing clever enough to get enough people in uniform the losses are so high that the
British finally do what the British really don't do. And they started conscripting their
people.
00:12:43
It's hard to blame the British too for starting the same sort of draft that the Continental great powers
use.
00:12:49
All you have to do is reset the casualties are so high look at the by the end in one thousand fifteen the British have suffered half a
million casualties two hundred thousand of those are dead by the way for a
traditionally naval power who has traditionally a rather small army by
Continental standards. Those are huge numbers. Now you want to see
what Continental standards look like. Look at the British ally the French who
had a huge army in the meat grinder since the first minute of this whole affair. And by the end in one
nine hundred fifteen their casualties are over two million more than seven hundred thousand
of those are dead and all these great powers are looking at their
principal enemies and trying to figure out how close they are to the throwing in
the towel moment. The Germans are looking at the French and all the casualties they've suffered in the looking in
their thinking they must be close to the end of their rope. The Germans have
suffered more casualties by the end of one thousand nine hundred than the French. But they're fighting on more
fronts right they're fighting the French and the British in the West. The gigantic Russian forces
in the east and they're involved in the Balkans a lot nine hundred fifteen. There are casualties
by the end in one hundred fifteen or over two and a half million. About seven hundred
fifty thousand of those are dead. Hard to know the German's list two hundred fifty thousand
missing in this war. People got blown to bits they got covered up by
you know giant mountains of earth that shells had blown up in the air falling back on the ground a lot of missing
people probably between seven hundred fifty and eight hundred thousand dead
for the Germans at this point in the war. The Russians have suffered Titanic
losses from minute one.
00:14:28
They lost a huge battle in one thousand fifteen called Corley's Tarnoff
Okaloosa time off. And that battle all by itself.
They lost one hundred fifty thousand dead almost seven hundred thousand wounded
and basically a million prisoners. Those are titanic
losses.
00:14:50
Maybe it's easier to understand their monthly burn rate by October one thousand
fifteen the Russians are losing two hundred thirty five thousand men a month.
00:15:00
How sustainable is that you again you got to be looking at the Russians thinking they're almost done and the
German High Command kind of is now the Germans can't be too happy though because
their main ally the Ostrog Ariens are suffering casualties that are
every bit as momentous as the Russians but they don't have the manpower to back that up
.
00:15:21
I mean in one four month period in one thousand nine hundred fifteen one four month period the
Austrian suffer seven hundred fifty thousand casualties.
00:15:28
But that's in addition to the already
astounding casualties they took in the few months right after the war started.
00:15:37
The German several times I have to prop up the Austrians just to keep them able to continue in the
conflict and the Austrians are a pain in the rear to their German allies a
lot of the time I mean for Erik from Falcon hunt a German commander in charge in January one thousand nine
hundred eighty he can't stand them. They're always getting into some sort of disaster
that they then go to Falcon Hine and ask for help getting out of it and to make matters worse
it's usually a disaster that foam Falcon Heene warned them about in advance don't do that it'll
be a disaster and then they do it against his wishes and then come and ask to be bailed out multiple
times. They can always play their their trump card though against one Falcon
Hine legitimately considering the huge casualties they've suffered they can kind of go there and
say well listen I mean you know if you don't help us we're not that far from dropping out of the war I don't know I can't
guarantee you will be here and you know you have to help him or it's a strategic disaster if the Ostrom
Guerin's drop out of the war right.
00:16:34
But Falcon Hein doesn't want to pay any attention to any of these. He doesn't want to worry about the
Russians. There are German generals and what not. They keep saying we need to focus on the Russians
that's how we win the war. Falcon I didn't hear about that. Doesn't want to focus in the Balkans although in
nine hundred fifteen they destroy Serbia. Just get that out of the way.
All kind of don't want to hear about the Middle East and the Turkey doesn't want to talk about Austria and her probably don't want to know
what Italy is doing. He wants to focus on this maybe
war winning or war losing the Gordian knot that is the puzzle that must
be solved if you are a general tasked with winning this war. It's the Western
Front.
00:17:14
How do you deal with that if and it's an unprecedented problem.
00:17:18
You know there's a famous German saying that may or may not have happened but it's
infused this whole period where one German general is
supposed have commented about how amazingly the British troops fought and he
said their lions and the subcommander with him is supposed to
have said something to the effect of Yes Lucky for us they were led by donkeys
one thousand and fifteen western front battles are where the donkeys first get
labelled with that sort of reputation at the same time
when you realise that they have no metrics for what they're doing in one thousand and fifteen
this. It's never been done before Nobody's ever had this kind of firepower nobody's ever put these kind of
defenses up I mean we're playing with all sorts of new military toys and they've never been
tested in a situation like this. How much slack do you cut the generals
and give them what is sometimes called by historians in this case a learning
curve and you're playing with people's lives how slowly Are you
allowed to figure things out. We didn't go into any of the one thousand and fifteen
battles Winston Churchill is just one of many people who objects to the whole idea
of calling those battles in the one nine hundred fifteen year or one nine hundred sixteen
year one thousand nine hundred seventeen YEAR battles. He says it's a disservice to what the
name means he said there were battles in one thousand fourteen at the start of the war and there were battles in one thousand eight
hundred at the end of the war but that stuff in the middle was a C H. He writes quote.
00:18:51
These sanguinary prodigious struggles extending over many months are often
loosely described as battles judging by the number of men who took their turn in the
fighting at different times by the immense quantities of guns and shells employed
and by the hideous casualty totals. They certainly rank taken as a whole.
Among the largest events in military history. But we must not be misled by
terminology. You have to call them battles was merely a method of presenting a
general view of an otherwise confusing picture. It might well pass
unchallenged but an attempt has been made by military commanders and by a whole
school of writers to represent these prolonged operations
as events comparable to the decisive battles of the past only larger and more
important to yield to this specious argument is to be drawn into a wholly
wrong impression. Both of military science and of what actually took place in the Great
War.
00:19:49
End quote.
00:19:51
All these battles on the western front. For a full three
years in the conflict look pretty much like this as described
by historian soldier her vague quote the fighting on the Western
Front had taken on a deadly regularity.
00:20:09
Attackers stormed enemy trenches in ways only to be mowed down by
hostile machine gun fire and artillery as they tried to cut the wire entanglements
that protected the earthworks.
00:20:21
End quote.
00:20:23
There's a repetitiveness to the fighting on the western front. It's a repetitiveness
that actually is associated with World War One and the western front
specifically. It's part of the tragedy. It adds to the pain
because after all if you've seen this same event over and over and over
again doesn't that become a different kind of tragic. If you
watch the first wave of those young soldiers leave the safety of their trench go
over the top but you know whistle of their officer get mowed down by
machine gun fire before they've even gone ten feet. That's tragic
. It's another level of tragedy when the next wave gets up right behind them to
follow in their footsteps. Having already seen what happened to them.
That's what we wanted to capture in our discussions of the western
front because it became an issue early on how we were going to deal with all these
battles that were roughly the same equally tragic.
00:21:25
And for the soldiers on the ground eerily similar when trying to figure
out what we wanted to highlight a Shakespeare quote
kept popping into my head when I was working on this and it was his line that all the world's a
stage and all the people merely players.
00:21:44
And I thought to myself well that's what we have here. We have one of
the most extreme stages in human history
.
00:21:54
We've created with these Western Front battles in one thousand fifty one thousand six hundred seventeen
a hell like environment and then we force
millions of people to act in it
. But some of the most extreme situations people
have been put into ever in history and watching how
they endured is sometimes soul crushing
. But I think times it's absolutely life enhancing
. You know sometimes you can benefit quite a
bit from the suffering of other people.
00:22:38
As we sat down when we started this series and tried to figure out a creative
approach to dealing with all these battles. One thing becomes very clear
we did some creative experiments and you quickly find out that the battles in an
emotional sense reach a point of diminishing returns very quickly
.
00:22:58
You just become benumbed by them all the scale the intensity the
sheer horrific repetitive pounding eventually
makes you stop feeling and so rather than go from
indecisive and horrific battle to the next indecisive and horrific battle
we thought we would focus on a few what we would consider to be almost
signature battles if you will but they provide a very similar backdrop for the poor
individuals who have to live in that environment and allow us to sort of
examine at a human level what's going on here a little bit as best we can
and to explore some of the questions that are very intriguing about this story and not just about the human suffering but
about command decisions and some of the technology and some other things.
00:23:47
Hopefully interspersed with a little bit of you know comment about what's going on in the rest of the
world while this is happening. And part of what makes nine hundred sixteen so difficult is there's a
lot of overlapping stuff. So if you tell it in a he said
then she said then he said fashion. It becomes very confusing very quickly. The first thing
to understand though is that nineteen sixteen comes about obviously
because of plans made in late one thousand nine hundred fifteen we'd said to you earlier
that this was a real question for the generals. But how do you solve this
Gordian knot that is the Western Front. Well in late one nine hundred fifteen the Allied
commands got together at a place called Chantilly in France to deal with this question
. Their plan was going to be to continue to pound and
pound harder. But the new aspect was they were going to make
sure that everybody all the different Allied Powers pounded the central
powers Germany and friends at the same time. They we're going to coordinate
their efforts.
00:24:51
This was going to nullify what the Germans had been doing so far the
Germans have a great army but they can't be everywhere at once. Luckily for them up until
nine hundred sixteen they weren't attacked everywhere at once so they would use something called
interior lines it's a little like taking the center square in a game of tic tac
toe. The Germans were able to use their wonderful railway system to transfer troops
from less threatened sectors to more hot spots and thereby frustrate
allied efforts of the Allied plan for knocking down German fortifications in one thousand sixteen's that
they're all going to attack at basically the same time frustrating the Germans ability to move troops to hot
spots. The Germans had a different plan entirely.
00:25:34
You see the people at Chantilly and nine hundred fifteen get together and decide to attack the Germans for multiple
you know locations at the same time are still for the most part envisioning the classic
military end to this war.
00:25:48
They see the chances increased by attacking multiple locations that you're going to
crack the Germans somewhere and when you crack Um you're going to send your forces through the breach in you're going to
send the cavalry through and that the Germans are going to break and are going to be on the run of the to be routed toward Berlin and
you know that's how these things and in the minds of people who have a very especially old
fashioned view of war.
00:26:11
There are dissidents to this idea who say even on the Allied side you've got it all wrong it's
not going to happen that way the technology the specific circumstances the fact there are no flanks on the
western front.
00:26:21
Your dream because your dream and your plans are going to work right. On the
German side the people who have this attitude that that old fashioned view point is
just that old fashioned. I happen to be in positions of higher authority than the
dissident generals on the other side.
00:26:40
They have looked at the way the war is going and figured out that the casualties
are the difference maker and that all these countries are suffering because of the numbers of
people that are dying.
00:26:51
You need to increase the numbers of people who are dying. Not only does it become hard to replace them
but it puts huge stresses and strains on the societies that are losing these people their
families their governments. Some of these societies are fragile enough to
simply you know fall apart like a house of cards. Others could have the
entire population turned on the government and say we know we've had enough. That becomes the
best path to end the war in the minds of some of these generals a guy like the leader in
Germany Eric Von Falcon Hein is looking at what these nine hundred fifteen
battles taught him and they taught him that modern warfare on the Western Front
turns into a meat grinder no matter what you do. And he comes up with the
brilliant idea again most historians still think some people say it's you know shooting an
arrow and painting a bull's eye around it afterwards but he comes up with a brilliant idea that these meat grinders are
happening no matter what you design the battle to be like what if you designed the battle to be like a meat grinder
. What if you create a meat grinder and then entice the enemy to
come into it. If that's what's so effective on the battlefield what if you
planned to grind meat instead of having it be a byproduct of other
activities in plants and Falcon in late one thousand fifteen determines that the
French are already you know near their breaking point in terms of the casualties they've suffered
. And he goes to the rest of the military command he starts talking about what he'd like to do in one thousand nine
hundred eighteen to try to win the war.
00:28:20
He wants to set a trap for the French army.
00:28:27
The idea is to create one of these you know modern
twentieth century attrition amplifiers one of these meat grinders
and then lure the French army into it. For that you need
bait and the determination of where this awful battles are going to
happen is dependent on what site can be chosen
that would best play the role of bait and I should point out that historians from different
countries disagree on this Americans and British historians often point out that this site chosen
has no real military value at all that it was soley chosen because it's the
perfect emotional bait to lure the French army into the meat grinder. German
and French historians though often assert that this site did have military
importance and that that you know did create a real military need to do what the French
ended up doing. Nonetheless the German plan is to use all this
artillery first to pulverize the defenses around this important site
that the French you know have an emotional and political and everything else attachment to it.
Blow the French off of these hills that overlook this city this
city called for Don and then fortify the hills bring your guns up
there. Start shooting at the City of are done and wait for the French army to
show up and try to knock you off those hills. And knowing the
superiority of prepared defenses the French are just going to bash
themselves up against your barbed wire your trenches your machine guns your cannon and
everything else in a place that was specifically designed to be a killing field
so thoroughly attritional bloody twentieth century way to
conduct warfare. But it's not a bad idea.
It also should be no surprise that a battle that was designed to
act like a meat grinder turns into one of the most horrible battle of all
time. Even the name when I
hear it ver done it's like Stalin grat it really is it's one of those names
that just conjures up a specific image and level of horror
that puts it in a special place in military history.
00:30:46
You know it's it's sort of like if you said you know where is the worst place in the world to ever be in military
history like a tie between a million different spots right.
00:30:54
Mankinds had a long enough past so that there are recurring examples of
horrific places to end up on any given day we like to cite the famous
battle between the Romans and Carthaginians thousands of years ago Kony were all those Romans were surrounded
and trapped and killed over the whole long day I mean it's terrible. But probably about as bad as
a lot of other terrible situations.
00:31:16
There's a few where you just go OK that's as bad as the battle of Kony
sort of but an artillery I mean overdone is like nothing that
has ever happened really on a large scale and I'm sure again mankind's long history everything's
kind of tried Nothing's new under the sun as they say a very special breed Don is so
special in fact and so different and so outside the box for the thinking of the time period
that when fall behind comes up with the idea that he's going to bleed France
white his words.
00:31:49
It's so runs against the grain of the nineteenth century sort of morality of
warfare remember we started this war a mere year and a half ago wearing white
gloves with people who duelled when they were in school together and who thought of this in an almost
especially on the Western Front galon to kind of sense right to use Exchange swords and we
surrender and all this stuff. And now we have generals thinking OK how can I louer millions of men
into a confined space and just pound them into
marmalade. To quote one French soldier's way of explaining what
happened. One of the things I loved by the way about this period just like I love it
about the Second World War is that we have a lot of the actual words of the
generals themselves. They all wrote memoirs as we said after the war. Most of the time
trying to defend their reputation against their critics because after this war everyone's pointing fingers
at everybody.
00:32:44
You know because it was so terrible and people were so angry and so mad at generals
amongst other people that they were looking to blame that all the general right pieces
defending their ideas we have thought going to Luden Dorf we have all these guys' memoirs and
you can't take them you know at face value remember they're trying to stake out a historical
position here in defense of their own historical reputation.
00:33:07
None the less for going to time you know I neither love for going or hate him he has his fans and he has his detractors
. I'm one of his fans I I like the way his mind works in the way he writes in his book or he has you know
written right after the war where he's trying to explain his thinking on this. He runs down in logical
fashion you know where he sees the war in one thousand fifteen and it's not that bad for the Central
Powers really are a lot of people that will say after the Germans failed with that initial knockout blow in one thousand
fourteen it was all a hard slog downhill for them not necessarily.
00:33:37
One hundred fifteen was a good year for the Central Powers. They'll have some other attempts where they'll almost win the war
later in the war so this is like as we've said all along a heavyweight fight and there are times when both
sides have the other side in trouble. A quick look at fog and memoir shows that he thinks France
is in trouble that it's not that far from the breaking point.
00:33:54
Here's what Falcon hind writes about his thinking leading up to his planning for this
battle that he's most known for ever done.
00:34:02
Falcon Hein writes quote As I've already insisted the
strain on France has almost reached the breaking point though it is certainly born with the most
remarkable devotion. If we succeeded in opening the eyes of her people to the fact
that in the military sense they have nothing more to hope for. That breaking point will be reached
and England's best sword knocked out of her hand. To achieve that object the
uncertain method of a mass break through in any case beyond our means is
unnecessary. We can probably do enough for our purposes with limited resources
within our reach behind the French sector of the Western Front. There are objectives for
the retention of which the French General Staff would be compelled to throw in every man they
have. If they do so the forces of France will bleed to death as there can
be no question of a voluntary withdrawal.
00:34:53
Whether we reach our goal or not.
00:34:55
End quote. British military historian John
Keegan put it this way quote Falcon Hines plan was brutally
simple.
00:35:06
The French are forced to fight in a crucial but narrowly constricted corner of the Western
Front would be compelled to feed reinforcements into a battle of attrition
where the material circumstances so favored the Germans that defeat was inevitable.
If the French gave up the struggle they would lose ver done if they persisted they would lose
their army.
00:35:27
End quote.
00:35:28
This plan a falcon high and it was given the sinister sounding name of
operation gibberish which I've seen translated multiple different ways usually it's
called Operation judgement which implies a sort of analogy that
is the high hope of fall behind going into this campaign right. Maybe this will decide the war
. Another translation you sometimes run into is court of
justice. Same sort of an idea a decision point. The third
translation though that you'll sometimes run into is more indicative of the
tactics and approach. But Falcon is going to take to win this battle
its operation place of execution.
00:36:10
And while the Kaiser and Falcon Heine and all these generals are coming up with this plan in
late nine hundred fifteen the allies the Entente forces are doing the same thing and the Allies are a
little bit lackadaisical about the whole thing not the Russians not the people in the
Balkans they've been feeling German attacks over the last year.
00:36:28
But the British and the French who haven't seen the German army on the offensive since way back in
one thousand nine hundred eighteen they're kind of leisure early planning what they think will probably be their
war winning giant offensive slated for late spring or early summer one thousand nine
hundred eighteen over on the river Somme an enormous joint British and French
effort with months of planning and and just sweeping everything in front of them that
kind of in a rosy outlook. And the Germans instead in late
February one thousand nine hundred eighteen go on the offensive on the Western Front for the first time in
more than a year and catch everyone off guard.
00:37:05
It's ridiculous that they could have.
00:37:08
The amount of effort that was required to put together a modern offensive is something
we modern people take for granted. But when you hear how much
planning and stockpiling and engineering feats are required
to pull off something like the battle over done you begin to see why it was
so different than anything these people had ever known in the past. As we said one hundred years
before a Napoleonic battle was considered extraordinary if it went on for three days
throughout most of human history battles take hours. These battles that
these ally and central power planners are
conducting require months of preparation. They all go on for
months to how do you get enough stuff there to make sure your soldiers don't starve or run out of
ammunition. Well for the battle over done
it was more than seven weeks of actual unloading of supplies is the
way writer G.J. Meyer describes the planning and stockpiling before the
Feb nineteenth sixteen battle quote the Germans meanwhile were accomplishing
prodigious feats in getting everything in place held by the hilly wooden
countryside and the cloudy winter weather of the redone region.
00:38:24
They were doing an astonishingly good job of keeping the French from learning what they intended to do
or when or even exactly where. No fewer than five new railway
lines were constructed across the German held portion of the plateau immediately to the east of
the redone hills in a seven week period between late December and early February
. Thirteen hundred trains not railway cars but entire
trains hauled in two point five million shells earthmoving
equipment construction machinery and everything required to prepare the offensive and
support three hundred thousand troops in winter came rolling up to over done the
guns were positioned in the woods and covered with camouflage. A new development in warfare
made necessary by aerial reconnaissance. Underground chambers capable of holding as many
as five hundred men each were Escovedo opposite the French lines and lined with
steel and concrete in the sky above all this was the greatest concentration of aircraft
yet seen on any front. One hundred fifty aircraft a German umbrella so
impenetrable that even on the rare days when visibility was good the French pilots were
unable to get a close look at what was happening by the second week of February. Everything was in
place for an offensive with the potential to change the course of the war and co-opt
the German plan.
00:39:45
It was complicated and it was complicated because this was one of the great defensive
spots in French history for Dunne wasn't just a fortress it was a fortress zone
multiple fortresses all working together. A ground that had been
fought over since the days of Julius Caesar and the Romans
fortifications that had been upgraded even as recently as one thousand nine hundred
fourteen when the lessons of what happened to those Belgian forts were incorporated. And
then when the war started the French high command decided that fortresses
were old fashioned due to the limits of new technology or rather the lack
of limits. They decided that those Belgian forts being pounded by that artillery
signaled that these forts were nothing but a death trap and it would be better to take the
weapons on them in the troops that manned them and put them to where the hot spots were in the fighting after
all if France is in a life or death struggle what are we putting one hundred thousand or more
troops in the Verdon region to man a bunch of fortresses that are just going to trap him and get him killed by
artillery. Let's put them where they're needed. Oh yeah make sure they bring the guns and the ammunition and
everything else. So they did were done was a relatively relatively
quiet sector in one thousand sixteen before the big German build up. None the less you can't
hide preparations as extensive as the German preparations for ever. The French
become aware of it a couple weeks before the Germans launch their attack and are quickly trying to make up for lost
ground and get stuff you know to these areas because they can sense a build up in the Germans are launching
distracting attacks elsewhere to sort of you know confuse the French on where everything's coming from and on
February twenty first after a couple of postponements due to bad weather the storm
breaks. Kicked off by a giant naval
gun whose nickname by the way is long Max just like naming
swords got in the in the guns too apparently and long Max fires a shell
that travels somewhere between fifteen and twenty miles these are
enormous weapons and that becomes the first shell to drop
as part of the giant barrage that kicks off the battle of are done
and right after long Max's barrage kicks off all these enormous weapons
open up see it's not just between twelve hundred to fifteen hundred guns
. It's that half of them are huge. If you have all those guns the pounded the
forts in Belgium those giant four hundred twenty millimeter gamma mortars. You had the three hundred
eighty millimeter Skoda pieces from Austria and you have more of each of them and you have an
enormous number of two hundred ten millimeters and and one seventy S N one fifty five
and I mean my goodness. And they open up all at once and begin pounding
this relatively small area of the front. What makes this so
incredibly damaging is you have these huge weapons pounding this relatively tiny
area on a map and you fire an enormous number of shells by any
standard the First World War In a short period of time. So if you're on the
ground at some of those one thousand fifteen battles and they're firing one point seven million shells but they're doing
it over two or three or four weeks the intensity on the ground is very different than if they're
firing two million shells in six days.
00:43:06
Over a tiny area one little wood on the battlefield a thousand yards by five hundred yards
. Took eighty thousand shells in the first week. What does that
look like.
00:43:17
There's no human reference for this. When I try to picture I close my eyes and I try to picture
forests disappearing in front of my eyes this is heavily wooded and forested hilly
terrain in ber done and right after the bombardment you know twenty four hours there's no forest
left. I've watched forests be logged over weeks and months and it's still
appalling to wake up and more forest is gone.
00:43:38
What if you got to watch the entire thing churned up in front of you in a matter of hours like a giant
celestial weed whacker chewing up grass.
00:43:48
There are accounts that say that you know you'd have the shelling is so intense that if a giant tree would get
blown up in the air before it lands on the ground again another shell hits and blows right back up in the air.
Veteran said that the battlefield quickly looked like an asparagus farm with giant
chutes shooting up all over the soil everywhere which are the tree stumps and wood
everywhere.
00:44:07
Needless to say to me this is something I would
have to have some sort of video of to imagine when I was a kid I used to wonder what a tsunami looked
like and.
00:44:20
Now of course we have video of that. It was unimaginable when I was young now.
00:44:25
It's something anyone who wants to see it can go look up on You Tube something
that was a very rare sight a natural phenomenon or a manmade phenomenon for people to see.
Shelling is the same way and by the way there's a lot fewer accounts than you might
imagine of the first days shelling at the Battle of for done.
00:44:44
And that's an Englishman I'm sure there must be more German and French but
it's important to point out that there aren't a lot of people that probably survived the war
intact after those battles and the ones who did were probably not all that
excited to relive the experience. We do have some things though
even though it's forty years old Allister horns the price of glory has some
of the best accounts in English of what it was like on the ground when the shelling started he
tells one story of a corporal who is with his buddies and they're just grinding
some coffee. When the first shells start dropping He writes quote.
00:45:23
Suddenly the whole world seemed to disintegrate around him with a conditioned alacrity of old
soldiers. The two men with the coffee grinder disappeared below ground cursing an unprintable
French. Why couldn't bastards wait till I had finished my coffee in the
air in the bought a car a little forested area they are seemed solid with
whirling material to Corporal stuff Aine. It was as if it were swept by a
quote storm a hurricane a tempest growing ever stronger where it was
raining nothing but paving stones and quote cone continues
quote upon the terrible din of the explosions were superimposed the splintering
crashes of rending wood as the great two hundred ten millimeter shells lopped off
branches or uprooted the trees themselves barely had the tree trunks
fall and then they were spewed up into the air again by fresh eruptions from his own position
still relatively immune to the shelling stuff and watched its methodical progress with a certain
macabre fascination.
00:46:22
It was like a garden hose he thought and quote and then he
describes how the shells would move like away
from one location to another pounding everything in between and then
methodically go back in the direction it just came from as though it's continually mowing the
same piece of ground over and over again. It shows you what the
plan had been before the shelling started to make sure every inch of ground
was covered.
00:46:52
German aircraft are flying over the battlefield having knocked the French Air
Force out of the sky and are spotting for their guns
and keeping the French planes from locating the German guns of the French guns could shoot
at them. This leads to a very one sided initial encounter. Historian
power gen Koski compares the initial bombardment here to the one nine hundred fifteen battle of
champagne which at the time seemed momentously Titanic
that was a year ago now a year later it seems like chump change
compared to what the first day it done is sort of preceding Gen Koski
writes quote It was partly because of such air cover partly
because it enjoyed such free reign that morning that the German shelling could exceed in
intensity anything the French or anyone else had ever endured.
00:47:45
This was the bottle of champagne multiplied ten times over. But with a difference in
kind as well. The German artillery store blanketing entire zones with
their shells. They directed their fire not merely on to positions they wish to
take or on to lines they wish to obliterate. But into all that Nature had
grown and that man had erected as well making up in density for what
they lacked in persuasion that day they saturated successive zones within a twenty
five mile arc between av a car on the left bank and Etain on the right bank of the Meuse with a
million high explosive shells of the heaviest caliber known to man two hundred eighty
three hundred five three hundred eighty even four hundred twenty millimeters wide
and with lesser shells bearing toxic gases as well. Method rather than rage
. The system of the power hammer rather than the obstinacy of the battering ram
drove the destruction. The morbid calculus percentage the carpet bombing of
later wars that would raise entire cities and ignite entire landscapes.
But for now the thought was purely tactical to devastate so that the infantry
could infiltrate.
00:48:54
End quote.
00:48:56
Now as Jen Koski says the difference in this artillery barrage is not just in the amount of stuff but the way they
do it. They are employing every little trick that they've learned in the last year
year and a half of warfare including one that they probably think was a
clever and handsome and I'm sure the British and French must have thought it another example of deviousness on the
German part but the Germans start this artillery barrage you know a little after seven in the morning and they
pound these French positions all morning and into the lunchtime hour and then they stop
at midday.
00:49:26
They stop on cue all at once.
00:49:29
Now even to the punch drunk French Survivor is on the receiving
end of the worst artillery barrage in human history know what this means. It always means the same
thing. It means the German ground troops are common in an offensive that's why you stop shooting so that
you don't blow your own men up now that they're on the way right. So the French run up to their positions they
manned their defensive spots. They uncover any guns they've got hidden they get
ready to push back the German assault now that it's coming except that it isn't coming. It's a
trick and all of a sudden all the guns opened up again and start smashing the now
exposed French survivors who show those planes up in the air among other observers
Oh yeah that guy survived. Oh there's a machine gun nest we didn't see it was an
intermission to get the French to expose themselves.
00:50:17
And this shelling goes for the rest of the day until the late afternoon so from seven something in the
morning to four something in the afternoon and then the French survivors see the first
signs of German infantry activity approaching what they
see looks like something out of the time machine
from the air Larry an era.
00:50:39
Gone are the iconic Pickle how about the pointed helmets
that the German troops wear that hearken back to the greatness of Prussia in Europe at the
height of its nineteenth century sort of colonial dominance and it's symbolic and it's been replaced with
something that looks like a minor should wear it thoroughly working
class nothing romantic gentlemanly officer or aristocratic about it.
00:51:05
These tip of the spear troops here are wearing the German style
home which with a minor modification or two is the exact same helmet that
German troops will wear in the second world war.
00:51:18
These storm troopers as they're called have been known to history
look like they're mocked and they're carrying flame throwers
among other nasty surprises for anyone they might run into they got machine guns with
them. They got men who are wearing clothes that have big
bags sort of as part of the war they can stuff hand grenades because you just can't carry enough hand
grenades when you need them. They've even got in this you know shows you what they think they're up against
melee weapons with them and they're famous all these storm troop type units are famous for the
clubs they carry were the hatchet sort of the long knives or even things like
brass knuckles and stuff these are people who expect to get into physical combat at
very close range. They are using what at the
time seem like very newfangled very modern techniques on
the battlefield they're known as infiltration tactics they pretty much are the same small unit
tactics every military in the world uses today. They've been in development for a while
too it's a myth to suggest that the first time anybody sees and is with these storm troops but these
storm troops are the first to integrate everything into their system here
not only are they going to use these infiltration tactics but look at the weapons that they've armed themselves with and they train with all this
integrated all the various ideas and theories from all the militaries around the world for the last fifteen years and
are the first to put these troops out in the field whose job it is to look for weak
spots and they comb the field and when they run into you know
significant opposition they stop or move around it in places where everyone's been killed by the
artillery barrage they punch right through there.
00:53:01
Their goal is to capture bait. Remember this is
a trap.
00:53:07
The cheese in the trap has to be captured by the Germans before it can play the
role of cheese. That's what this is all about. That is if you believe you know
the standard historical approach there's quite a few historians who believe this whole idea of let's
create this meat grinder is B.S. propaganda at the time and
you know me a couple of voidness later on right. If you believe that they're not trying to
capture bait they're trying to capture overdone. Either way the point of this initial attack
is to get the heights.
00:53:39
The problem is the Germans find out to a degree exactly what the French and the British had found out the
whole year before which is that no matter how good the artillery barrage
there are just units that survive. And then when they strike back at you
it's amazing. And the casualties mount up unbelievably fast
. On the very first day as the German troops pour into an area
and begin to coalesce and sort of mustering us in a in a specific
area. French artillery opens up on him and this is an account by a French
staff officer with the artillery who first describes what the German artillery attack on
his positions is like and then describes responding in kind
. His was one of the few batteries that did by the way. He writes quote.
00:54:28
Thousands of projectiles are flying in all directions. Some whistling and others howling
others moaning low and all uniting into one infernal roar from time to time
an aerial torpedo passes making a noise like a giant motor car with a
tremendous thud a giant shell bursts quite close to our observation post
.
00:54:48
Breaking the telephone wire and interrupting all communication with our batteries. A man gets
out at once for repairs. Crawling along his stomach through all this place of bursting
mines and shells. It seems quite impossible he writes that he should
escape the rain of shells which exceeds anything imaginable. There has never been such a
bombardment in war. Our man seems to be enveloped in explosions and shelters himself
from time to time in the shell craters which Honeycomb the ground. Finally he reaches a
less stormy spot mens' his wires and then as it would be madness to try to
return settles down in a big crater and waits for the storm to pass.
00:55:26
Now he looks up and sees the German soldiers approaching
quote beyond in the valley.
00:55:33
Dark masses are moving over the snow covered ground. It is German infantry advancing
impact formation along the valley to the attack. They look like a big gray carpet
being unrolled over the country. We telephone through to the batteries and the ball
begins. The site is hellish in the distance in the valley and upon the
slopes regiment spread out and as they deploy fresh troops come pouring
in. There's a whistle over our heads it's our first shell. It falls right in the
middle of the enemy infantry. We telephone through telling our batteries of their hit and a
delusion of heavy shells is poured on the enemy their position becomes critical
through glasses we can see men maddened men covered with earth and blood falling one
upon the other. When the first wave of the assault is decimated the ground is dotted with
heaps of corpses. But the second wave is already pressing on. Once more our shells carve
awful gaps in their ranks. Nevertheless like an Army of Rats the bushes continue
to advance in spite of our Marmite is a term the French use for their shells. He says
quote then our heavy artillery burst forth in fury. The whole valley is turned into a
volcano and its exit is stopped by the barrier of the slain.
00:56:46
End quote.
00:56:48
That's a foretaste of what's to come right there. The Germans
have to be on the offensive for a little while in this battle a battle that is probably built
upon the presumption that the defense has a huge advantage on the offense. This
artillery was meant to make up for some of that but the Germans are taking higher than expected losses
from minute one.
00:57:11
This is a problem too because remember regardless of which historical school you would hear two on the
point of this battle it was always part of the plan to lose as few people as possible
so the Germans are concerned with losses and part of the reason they are suffering so many is the French are
resisting heroically on these first few days. There are units that
surrender their units that are just gone. You know from the artillery barrage. But there are
units including elite ones but also rather pedestrian ones sitting there and dying to the
last man to delay this German advance these infiltration troops are looking for places to
push through they find a couple but they find a bunch with these decimated defenders
resisting heroically to buy the country time to get fresh
troops reinforcing that area to that area ever done is actually supplied on the French
side by one little teeny road. The Germans have built multiple railway
lines and their side to supply the battlefield right. So as French reinforcements are coming up these
heroic defenders are holding the Germans off as long as they can.
00:58:13
There are more big bombardments the Germans push more troops in with more tenacity.
00:58:18
On February twenty fifth the Germans in an
almost Indiana like Jones movie kind of drama
captured the big fort in this region that sort of overlooks the whole battlefield
and we told you that the French I commanded kind of lost interest in forts after the Germans had
smashed the ones in Belgium and smashed the early ones in France.
00:58:40
But they still had people in them and there were still guns in them and slowly but surely they were starting to realize that
sometimes and in some places they were worth having didn't matter. These troops were in
this fort which is mostly below ground when a German soldier gets blown into it
somehow due to a shell exploding nearby lands down on the ground has
a pistol with him and eventually will let in some friends but by and large is walking around this
underground giant fort and as he opens doors into rooms there's a couple of French soldiers
playing cards or whatever and he captures them and lock them in a room and he does this over and over and over again
. He finally has everybody kind of captured. Nobody dies on either side
. And this major feature in the early part of the battle falls to the Germans.
00:59:24
It's one of those situations that sort of rocks the French morale
and they start to fall apart.
00:59:33
They've been through a ton and now there's this crisis
moment where all of a sudden it looks like the Germans are going to break through in the French are just going to fall apart before any
reinforcements can stiffen the line this is where things get really wiggy in this battle by the way
.
00:59:49
We get right down to what the hell the point of it is if you're Falcon
Hine and the historians who think he's trying to create a meat grinder for all that's true. You don't
want to break through. You don't want murder done. It's not really what you want.
It's the cheese in your trap. If you take it then you're just going to get counterattack
you're going to lose a lot of troops again and that then that's a nine hundred fifteen all over again what do we do differently right.
If you're from the other school of thought though the idea of breaking through too overdone at this point
is to nearly achieve what the whole bottle was designed to do.
01:00:25
Unexpectedly quickly the crown prince who's commanding this army is really excited and there's all sorts of
messages where they say I will take it I mean I did expect it this fast but will take it and then
they get within two miles of the city at one point and then the French put a new
commander in charge a guy who will be famous by the way in both world wars for different reasons
.
01:00:45
A guy named petard and Katon becomes you know it's so
hard to to separate the myth from the man when with his connection to for
Don but the narrative is that the time gets in there
and changes the French morale by himself practically.
01:01:04
There's all these and you know generals travel with their own press corps so there's going to be this guy's going to have a
bunch of people helping to pump up the myth. But he's famous for coming to the battlefield
and you know in these situations with the French just look desperate you know looking at troops and going now we
have them. You know we got him right where we want to be that kind of thing and you know maybe it's the nineteenth century
mentality but that seems to work. And he famously says or somebody says for him and then he
stands behind it. They shall not pass. And this becomes the big narrative of are done and
it turns into like a french their monopoly. But the French are going to die to the last man they're going to
win in the end.
01:01:40
Right it's again part of the overriding narrative now
morale is kind of a hard to quantify sort of thing hard to measure hard to look back in
history prove anything you don't have to prove the real world terra firma things that
tended to Tan's an artillery guy he's a defensive specialist and the first thing
he does is bring in his own artillery and consolidate it and ask
for more and slowly but surely begins to build up his own meat grinder
.
01:02:09
Two can play at that game and had time to start stocking up the
French side with artillery too and all this artillery
turns this entire area into the moon.
01:02:25
But weirder these shell holes in your head you think of something
symmetrical like a meteorite crater but it doesn't happen that way because you get these
shell holes which can be thirty feet deep with absolutely straight up and down edges
. But then they get hit with another shell at some weird angle or on an edge and then they get hit with another
one in another one and another one and it turns it into super weird formations
. It still looks weird today if you go look at modern pictures of the redone battle field.
01:02:53
It looks totally alien and it creates a battlefield is
a painting by a Frenchman blue rue I think is a name called Hell and it shows a couple of
French soldiers in one of these craters and a dead body near them and they're
wearing gas masks and the barrage is going on and giant timbers are part of this
enormous crater and craters everywhere in the distance as far as you look.
We said this is like making war worse and these craters are the grossest thing
you can imagine I mean really just awful. They fill with water very quickly
every one of them practically with a dead body or two in them.
01:03:30
They fill with water there's tons of trash tons of stuff all kinds of I mean they're mostly
used as latrines if it's close enough to where you can get to them. The water is
fetid and horrible and greasy from the bloated bodies that float in it
. And interesting enough poisonous because the gas that's used on these
battlefields.
01:03:49
I know it's tempting to think of it as vapor but it's really almost a solid
where when a gas shell explodes it covers an entire area with like a pollen
like coating and that pollen like coating is deadly. So it's
like putting insecticide on a given area to keep you out of it for a while and eventually the rain will come and
dissolve that but the dissolve runoff just goes into all the shell holes that are filled with
water and makes them just poisonous. There will be writers who will talk about how at
first in the spring the battlefield will try to recover a little of its life and they will see little green
shoots pop up for a minute before the poisonous air and soil and water and
everything just kills them right away.
01:04:30
It's a giant burnt out insecticide zone.
01:04:34
That's what ver done is and the landscape itself. It's
horrifying to a degree that's hard to describe unless you want to say that this
is more door.
01:04:46
This is J. R. R. Tolkien's conception of the darker land I mean he
was in the first world war maybe got it from there.
01:04:54
The match is perfect I mean once this artilleries been going for not even that long at this levels of
intensity you have around you on this battlefield. And we talked about
stage and all the people merely players will look at the stage these people are playing
on. You know very shortly into the battle it's a lunar landscape it's the moon.
OK. And these trenches are places where people meet their end very often I
mean lots of stories about soldiers with big heavy packs in the night losing their way falling
into one of these terrible craters and just drowning
.
01:05:28
The worst stories are these people who you know you hear stories about people drinking kneeling down and drinking out of
these green colored poisonous waters with bodies floating in it because the water isn't
making it up to the front. The people whose job it is to bring food and water to the people on the front edge of the
meat grinder are getting killed trying to bring it up. This is a terrible
battle. It's the battles of one thousand fifteen taken to the next level which is what
this war is going to be about every time the world thinks they've come to the limits of their interest surely
this is the worst battle they will ever be. The standard gets up again and
this happens continually.
01:06:06
It's a pressure cooker it's who's going to break first and you know you thought last year
was bad welcome to next year and one next year is
deadlier and while the scale is more and perhaps unsustainably Titanic
the pattern is unfortunately for the troops on the ground. Horrifically familiar
.
01:06:27
About a week into the assault the German attack ads are done
stalls just like all these other battles we've
seen and a lot more we will see the initial assault is the most tense
nail biting up in the air kind of time.
01:06:43
Once it's stopped there may be ebbs and flows and scary moments but by and
large we have descended into what Churchill called it is a prolonged
operations or extended operations.
01:06:55
We're now into combat and for the troops on the ground
it's the most horrifying environment when we want to study the idea of what
human beings can do. It seems to me you want to see them in some of the most you
want to see just like a product tested you want to put it into the most extreme stress and see how it
behaves.
01:07:15
Look at what were done becomes over the next many months for the people on
the ground who have to live this how do they endure.
01:07:26
And when you hear the stories from this place I mean start with the approach
March the French as we said spend a lot of trouble to rotate their
troops in and out of this battle because they get worn down like a pencil in a pencil sharpener so you have
to you know rotate them when the soldiers approach were done they can
see it a long way away. I mean the guns of the opening barrage were
said to be audible one hundred miles away. So when they were approaching for Don it looks like a
giant forest fire in the distance.
01:07:58
One French soldier on the way to it said that it reminded him quote of a gigantic
forge that ceased Neither day or night and quote If the
fires are mortar or like I said and then all of a sudden the air becomes smoky and
hazy and you don't see the sun clearly anymore and all the vegetation
disappears one artist said the only color in the landscape after a while because it's just overturned dirt
and bodies and debris and churned up concrete. It's a
hellish environment but there is a smear of red here or there where the horses have just been
splattered by artillery. Have I mentioned that it sounds like hell yet.
01:08:38
We mentioned earlier how hard it was to get food and water to the troops fighting at the front line
. But it was hard to get anything to the troops fighting at the front line for example
to get new troops to the front line could kill off half your troops
.
01:08:53
In his book The Price of glory Alistair Horan takes a
couple of different accounts and puts them together and quotes a few people who were there
about what it was like simply trying to get to the front of the meat grinder. Edward Dunne imagine
suffering you know forty or fifty percent casualties trying to get to the meat grinder Here's what he writes
quote a mile or two from the front line troops entered the first
communication trenches.
01:09:20
But to call them this was generally both an exaggeration and an anachronism
parapets gradually grew lower and lower until the trench became little deeper than a
roadside ditch. Shells now began to fall with increasing regularity among
closely packed men in the darkness. He says for obvious reasons approach
marches were usually made at night. The columns trampled over the howling wounded lay
underfoot. Suddenly the trench became nothing more than a track. Hardly traced
out amid the shell holes in the mud which the shelling had now turned to a consistency of
sticky butter. Troops stumbled and fell repeatedly cursing in low
undertones as if fearful of being overheard by the enemy who relentlessly pursued them
with the shells at every step. Sometimes there were duck boards around the lips of the
huge shell craters but more often they were not and heavily laden men falling
into the water filled holes remained there until they drowned unable to crawl up the
greasy sides. If a comrade paused to lend a hand he writes it
often meant that two were drowned instead of one. In the chaos of the battlefield where
all reference points had long since been obliterated relieving detachments often got
lost and wandered hopelessly all night only to be massacred by an enemy machine gun
or as Don betrayed them. It was not unusual for reliefs to reach the front line with only
half the numbers that set out.
01:10:43
Nor for this nightmare approach march to last ten hours or longer and
quote seems to me maybe I can speak for some of my
generation if I just spent ten hours struggling through
that and lost half our people while doing so just so I got
to take my turn on the front lines.
01:11:05
I'm going to be severely destabilized. Let's
put it that way is that a good way to describe it.
01:11:13
And even though these French units will be rotated maybe only spent five or six or seven days up
at the front I mean that was designed to keep them from just being decimated and being
shattered. But judging from some of the witness accounts it didn't work very
well. British historian John Keegan the late John Keegan
writes that a French officer named Gaston Cochon spent from the ninth
to the fourteenth of April on one of these important hills and Keegan writes
quoting this officer quote the last two days
soaked in icy mud under terrible bombardment without any shelter other than the
narrowness of the trench the Boche did not attack naturally it would have been too stupid.
01:11:56
Result I arrive there with one hundred seventy five men I returned with thirty four
several half mad not replying any more when I spoke to them.
01:12:06
End quote.
01:12:07
A French lieutenant described watching a unit his own unit actually coming
down and back from for a gun after being relieved and he says quote
First came the skeletons of companies occasionally led by a wounded officer
leaning on a stick all marched or rather advanced in small
steps zigzagging as if intoxicated. It was hard to tell the color of their
faces from that of their tunics mud had covered everything dried off
and then another layer had been reapplied. They said nothing. They'd even lost the
strength to complain. It seemed as if these mute faces were crying something
terrible. The unbelievable horror of their martyrdom. Some Territorials who were
standing near me became pensive. They had that air of sadness that comes over one when a
funeral passes by and I overheard one say it's no longer an
army.
01:13:00
Those are corpses too of the Territorials wept in silence like
women.
01:13:06
End quote.
01:13:08
So what's going on with those guys that they go in one way
and they come out so shattered and sometimes it only takes a couple of days to go from one reality to the
other. That's where you know these first hand accounts from these people are so
moving.
01:13:25
First of all from the perspective of these men on the ground everything seems so pointless because
they only know this little world of this big battlefield they're operating on. And a
perfect example is how you know these generals were now fighting over the same terrain
features over and over and over month after month after month they take them and then they're retaken and they
take them again and they're all fighting over the same carnage stained ground over and over again and they
develop names and one of these hills is Hill three o four becomes a famous
hill with a lot of people paying with their lives to take it and retake it again. There's
another one known as the dead man or dead man's heels another way to translate
it and that's another one of these hills. I mean they've had the tops blasted all off
them by both sides artillery. They're smoking like volcanoes pretty much at all times
. We're told sort of a dual Mount Doom if we want to keep arm more door
analogy going.
01:14:21
And when the unit really takes a position on for example one of those long fought over
terrain features. Then you have that around you
.
01:14:31
I mean for example in passing him has several quotes where he talks
about soldiers having to retake this ground that are nothing more
than sort of open cemeteries combined with butcher
shops and he writes quote on the ground soldier and writer jock Meyer
describes the real frightfulness when he noted quote everywhere there were
distended bodies that your feet sank into the stench of death hung over the jumble
of decaying corpses like some hellish perfume and quote passing and
continues quote When the Germans captured Hill three o four in May one of the first demands
of the assault troops was for a double ration of tobacco to mask the overwhelming reek
of corpses rotting around them like Jock Meyer a fellow French
soldier wrote at this time that quote quoting this French soldier now we
all had on us the stench of dead bodies the bread we ate the stagnant water we
drank everything we touched had a rotten smell owing to the fact that the earth around us was
literally stuffed with corpses.
01:15:35
End quote.
01:15:37
How do you not lose your mind.
01:15:41
French barrel maker and Corporal Louis barked us arrives at the
famous hill three o four at one point in this battle and looks up
and contemplates this piece of ground that has caused so many people on
both sides their earthly existence.
01:15:59
He writes quote I looked out upon this famous nameless Hill our trench lay at the
foot of it for several months they have been disputed as if it had diamond mines on its
slopes. Alas all it contained now with thousands of shredded pulverized corpses
nothing distinguished it from neighboring hills. It seemed to have been partly wooded at one time but no
trace of vegetation remained. The convulsed overturned earth offered nothing but a
spectacle of devastation and quote.
01:16:28
Now eventually in for reasons that we'll get into in a minute. The situation changes
at for Dunn and the Germans go from essentially a sort of an off fence
position to a defensive one as they transfer forces to another part of
their front for something else that's going on taking their attention and so the French use this
as an opportunity to retake ground and now we get the same kind of battles we had when the
Germans were moving forward in this. Now that the French are now the Germans have taken a bunch of their
artillery away so now the French have the artillery dominance and now the Germans get to experience what the
French experience on the other side and you know nine or ten months into this battle
we have human beings living on the edge of what human beings can tolerate there's an
extended pair of quotes from the same guy a German soldier who
is in one of these forts and these forts they're all over this area this is a
fortified zone there are several forts covering one another in a lot of the most terrible battles happen over
these forts and they're battered down so that they're just shells of what they were but they could
still hold hundreds of man protect them from shrapnel. So oftentimes you had tons of men in these
underground blown up.
01:17:38
Four two with blood everywhere and everything else. And here's the way the environment is described by
this German soldier. Quote His name is Private William Harman's by the way of the sixty
seventh Infantry Regiment. And I get this from Peter Hart's book The Great War.
01:17:53
He said quote The entrance was a mere hole in the scarred battlefield and the
silhouettes of cowering men constantly crawling in Iraq look like huge ants in the
dark. I descended an iron ladder some forty feet into the concrete
cavern. It was an enormous place crowded with many hundreds of soldiers. Some
lay on bunk sleeping snoring and moaning. Some cluttered the passages between the
bunks chatting or writing letters. Others sat or knelt in corners packing or
unpacking their belongings. Here a flashlight there a candle match or cigarette dotted the
dark with flickering islands of light continually shifting in brightness from this
subterranean stronghold a small patch of sky could be seen when one stood
close to the iron ladder or looked through the shaft which contained a ventilator fans a
current of warm stale air from forty feet beneath brought to my nostrils the sickening smell
of first aid medications. Every one of the chicken wire berths were filled with
mutilated muddy torn in the fall of uniforms. A dismal sight. There was a
man with closed eyes a blood soaked bandage around his head. Another beside him
lay twisting in pain. I saw some lice ridden man who would scratch their bandages off to ease
the itching. The passages between the bunks were crowded. There must have been a thousand men there
. Some had been relieved but could not withdraw to the rear and some would come to relieve the others could
not proceed to the front lines. All were imprisoned deep within the concrete and rock
entrails and quote.
01:19:22
Now that's a scene that up till that point could have happened in a lot of wars. What happens
next in that underground environment that a soldier is writing from is
something that on a large scale between great powers only
happened in this war.
01:19:39
He says quote.
01:19:40
I heard the cry of poison gas and I saw people around me putting on their gas
masks. I adjusted mine which still hung over my shoulder. There it was a
yellowish gas glimmering near the iron ladder a gas bomb must have been thrown into the
entrance shaft the crie gas masks on electrified the whole
shelter. Soldiers ran to get their masks which they had hung on the walls and in the
corners or laid on their packs. Many who had lost theirs on the battlefield began to call off
the wounded in the bunks tried to climb into the upper berths while beneath the gas crept
forward along its way extinguishing one candle after another. Soon many were
dying and the bunks and floors were filled with bodies over which the living stepped and stumbled
in search of air. The alarm surged like a wave from bank to bank. Before long it
had reached the farthest man one hundred yards away. The panic was so great that I saw a badly
wounded man throw themselves onto the floor as though they wanted to drink in the gas while
others tore their masks from their neighbors' faces. Some had a reddish foam oozing from their
mouths end quote.
01:20:46
I always try to remind myself when we're talking about these big grand battles
that what this really is is a million stories like that.
01:20:57
The pain of that incident magnified over the entire scope of the war.
And while I'm sure there are some people who are harder than I am in terms of you know saying that that's
life or that's what history is filled with and all those kinds of things it's hard not to sit
there and feel a sense of awe I think for the
people who faced this and not have any sort of
patriotic you know glorification of war or anything else.
01:21:23
As I said just sort of the unexpectedly strong limits of human
endurance.
01:21:30
How did they sustain this effort.
01:21:33
How did they when told they had to advance into this or just not
run away at top speed how did they do it. And let's acknowledge that not all of them did.
01:21:45
There were a lot of people shot in this war for running away but the large
majority of them did not and you sit there and go how did they not rebel How did they not revolt.
01:21:55
What would we do today.
01:21:58
There's a great quote from F. Scott Fitzgerald novel it's fictional
but he puts words into the mouth of a man who is showing one of these nine hundred
sixteen battlefields to his compatriots that touring the battlefield and he has a discussion with them
and he tries to explain to them the almost
soup that was required to bring up a
generation of people who could do this. In other words it's not just yours truly
wondering how people sustain this effort. Even right after the war people were
trying to figure out how people could do this.
01:22:36
And here's a section from the F. Scott Fitzgerald novel where Fitzgerald's character
explains it he points in the distance to a little body of water and says quote
See that little stream we could walk to it in two minutes.
01:22:50
It took the British a month to walk to it. The whole empire walking very slowly
dying in front and pushing forward behind and another empire walked
very slowly backward a few inches a day leaving the dead like a million
bloody rugs. No Europeans will ever do that again in this generation.
Then the other character says why they've only just quit over in Turkey and in
Morocco. The response quote that's different
this Western Front business could be done again. Not for a long time. The young men
think they could do it but they couldn't. They could fight the first Marne again but not
this. This took religion and years of plenty and tremendous
charities and the exact relation that existed between the classes the Russians and
Italians weren't good on this front. You had to have a whole sold sentimental equipment
going back further than you could remember. You had to remember Christmas and postcards
of the crown prince and his fiance and little cafe's in Vallance and beer
gardens in winter day in Linden and weddings at the Marie and going to the Derby
and your grandfather's whiskers. General Grant invented this kind of battle in
Petersburg in sixty five. Came the reply meaning General Grant in the Civil War in one thousand nine
hundred sixty five the main character says quote No he didn't he just invented mass
butchery. This kind of battle was invented by Lewis Carroll and Jules
Verne and whoever wrote Ondine and country deacons bowling
and Marianne's in Marsay and girls seduced in the back lanes of Verdun Bergen best
failure. Why this was a love battle it was a century of middle class
love spent here and quote.
01:24:37
A century of middle class love spent here. That is
profound and that's how the generation that lived through this war saw it
. So basically Fitzgerald's answer to that question of you know how
did these people endure. Is that you had to have grown up the way they did with the
same cultural influences and expectations including societal and class
based ones. You know I had to have seen the world the way they did had similar
concepts of you know duty and expectations and even
manhood. And you'd have to have in some ways
the same illusions too because in certain
circumstances having allusions could help you carry out
military operations that people who are more cynical and realistic
would never do.
01:25:31
You know when you think about the endurance to I mean it's so normal to focus on the horrific war side of
this. But the simple you know life part of this is sometimes what pushes people
over the edge you know you hear stories sometimes where they will say well they were able to adapt
to the shelling they just couldn't handle the rats or something something gets to them sometimes
above and beyond what you might think.
01:25:53
I mean a perfect example you start looking at what day to day life was like for these people
who any of us would think were focused on staying alive but sometimes it got down to even more
base level than that Louis bar to us fighting in the
inferno writes about at night being in one of these trenches when the rain just
comes pouring down he says quote We were crouching down so as not to catch a stray bullet or
shell fragment passing by.
01:26:20
And if this weren't bad enough the heavy rain started to fall. It didn't take long for the water
to fill in the ditch and to submerge our shoes our helmets were transformed into
drains spouts little waterfalls ran down our packs on to our hips off our shoulders and
along our arms. We didn't know what or whom we were waiting for the
night was pitch black. Were they just going to leave us stuck in the sewer.
01:26:43
End quote.
01:26:45
A sewer is such an apt name too besides the bodies and the
poison and the decay and the lice and the rats have not even dealt with them they are both
absolutely beyond imagination living the life living with the rats.
01:26:59
You also have the problems of men fighting in an inferno we're
getting out of your trench meant a pretty good chance of dying when you have to go to the bathroom
ui Bartos writes quote and to make it worse as I've already described
all of us one after the other suffered from an epidemic of intestinal disorders the
resulting diarrhea sure cleaned us out but in opportunely as soon as one of us got over it
his next door neighbor was afflicted with it and had the bad luck to have to climb out of the trench and
head for the shell hole which served as our latrine. Of course we did this only in the last resort
at the last moment of agony stretching our guts until they were about to burst one of us was
surprised in the latrine by one of these sudden fusillade and collapsed into his own
excrement. So as not to expose oneself to similar incidents. Some used
sardine or monkey meat Kansas chamber pots so as not to have to leave
one's hole in the ground.
01:27:53
One even sacrifices cast iron dinner plate and coat.
01:27:59
How do you keep your sanity you have to risk your life to I mean the whole
thing on the battlefield there might have been one horrible day where if you're
unlucky enough to have dysentery that day it's a horrible day in the ranks. It isn't the day after day after
day thing these people are putting up with a pounding on their psyche
.
01:28:19
But understanding what they went through is in large part what makes this story
so incredibly compelling. The extremes of human experience right I talk about it all
the time. There's a wonderful paragraph by historian Erik
Dorn Brose who tries to describe why this isn't
gratuitous to talk about this why it's part of being
astounded by your ancestors. Here's what Burroughs
says quote.
01:28:49
Most historians today depart from the traditional practice of omitting casualty
figures. What was once left out for respect of the dead and to avoid any indecent
hint of criticising or questioning the sacrifices they made is now included in order
to eliminate the magnitude of the horror men faced by citing numbers in other
words historians begin the process of turning back toward describing what war was
really like.
01:29:14
And they do this despite the understandable loathing of the veterans themselves to
remember or speak about traumatic experiences they have tried usually unsuccessfully
to suppress the problems historians encounter with casualty figures however
especially the astronomical numbers of dead and wounded in twentieth century wars.
01:29:33
Is that enough. As have a numbing quality to them. Although shocking to read initially they
quickly lose descriptive effectiveness as mines fail to grasp the horror in the
abstract in order to do historical justice to combat on the ground therefore it is
necessary to go beyond the numbers to the gruesome eyewitness accounts
shaking off criticism that to go there is gratuitous. The great war can only be fully
understood if all its aspects are exposed dimensions of the front experience that
not only affected soldiers morale and eventually the outcome of the war but also
home fronts and their critically important willingness to continue shouldering the war effort. All
wars are horrible. Rose writes tragedies for the dead
their relatives and friends hobbling sometimes disfiguring injuries for others turning
wives children and parents in the caregivers for life and psychological
minefields for veterans who may have escaped death an injury but not the terrible memories
with which loved ones too are then forced to live the Great War was especially hellacious
however because it was the first to one leash the full mechanized fury of
sophisticated industrial technology and equipped men
had never been asked to endure anything quite
like this.
01:30:54
Some of these French soldiers had to go back to Don more than one time. What does
that do to you what I read somewhere one of them said the first time you can kind of handle it you don't know what you're in for it's particularly
hard when you're going back to Mordor or after you've been to Mordor or SO HAPPY TO A survived
and now you get to take your chances all over again.
01:31:13
So the majority of the French army gets a chance to rotate through this area at least once and they never get over
it.
01:31:19
Tom himself will say about the experience to the French army
quote the constant visions of death had penetrated the French soldier with a
resignation that bordered on fatalism and quote
the fighting women for ten months.
01:31:38
About half the time the Germans were on the attack the other half the time the French were on the attack and by the time it was
over. This is disputed but about a million total casualties both
sides ended up together. Give or take two hundred thousand either way.
01:31:52
At the end of the war it will be mandated in the treaty
that when this battlefield is cleared and it will take decades just to
get the bodies off of that the shells are still there and many of these areas are cordoned off
until well probably a good hundred two hundred years from now.
01:32:12
The treaty stipulated that when French bodies were dug up and buried they need to be buried singularly and with
white crosses for purity. The Germans didn't have to be in
a single grave and their graves were to carry black crosses
signifying shame.
01:32:31
The depth of emotion that verged on created in the
immediate post-war generation but even in France today is unlike quite
any other military endeavor.
01:32:45
French armies have participated in.
01:32:48
And the myth making about this crazy battle starts before the fighting is even
done and there's a whole group of revisionist historians who've been trying
ever since the battle happened to poke holes in the myths that obscure the
reality of are done. It's got such a sacred hold on both France and Germany it's
hard to separate the facts from the fiction and there's a huge amount of
heroism and sacrifice connected to this event. It's understandable that you would get you know
some myth making and the revisionist historians often portray Falcon Holland the German
commander in the one behind this plan as an idiot as dumb plan
executed incompetently and after the war when people went to Falcon high and said What were you
thinking there he said I was trying to kill a lot of people.
01:33:34
That was my goal. Mission accomplished.
01:33:38
One of these revisionist historians Paul gin Koski is a perfect example will say something
like to make a verb done out to be any worse than any number of terrible World War one
battles is to play into the myth and he says if it's being in a trench with the rain
falling on you with your feet up to your knees in mud under shell fire and
sniper fire day after day is terrible while there is plenty of First World War battles
where as a soldier you were found yourself in that situation with bodies all around I mean that's not that abnormal in the
first world war and they're right about that too but you know maybe it's fairer to say that
there are several really unbelievably horrible and unprecedented battles in the first world
war that are equally hellacious and you would not want to beat any of them.
01:34:21
They each have their own awful unique flavor to them that makes them different
and nothing smells quite like done and if you said to me you have to be one of these horrible
battlefields for Dunn is the lowest on my list for Dunn is the last
place out of all of them that I want to be. If you ask what were
achieved again there's a wide variety of opinions on this
. The most popular is that of the Cheve nothing. One of the broad
symbols of the general wastefulness of this war. About a
million people either are killed or wounded or you know I've
never returned from the battlefield and nothing of huge importance
was gained because of that.
01:35:06
One thing that certainly didn't happen is it moved up the timetable for several other battles that
were going to happen a little bit later but when the French got pressed by the Germans and the British and
they said to the Russians you know those battles you were planning on starting Could you move up the timetable and start
him sooner. We could use the help over here.
01:35:25
And finally the one thing in one thousand sixteen you're beginning to see and we've alluded to this
before is that these people have put up already with a lot more
pounding then we would probably put up with today. But there's a breaking point for all
human beings in my mind the breaking point that's coming
was quickened by the experience I've done and we've mentioned that the
French had a policy of rotating troops during the battle to keep them fresh for Don
but what that meant was virtually the entire French army at one time or
another was rotating through that sector for Dunne
took the French and ratcheted up the discontent levels in ways
that were probably out of proportion to what you could have expected from a more normal battle. It got you closer
to the breaking point.
01:36:16
So the idea of pushing your adversary to the
point where their society literally implodes is a thoroughly
modern idea.
01:36:27
By nine hundred sixteen most of the military leaders in this conflict
see that as the end game in this conflict. The reason it's a thoroughly modern
concept isn't because people of the past didn't understand it it was because
they could never take enough damage to get to that point. As we said throughout this
series nations in the past for the most part couldn't take a punch. The
ones who could stand out like sore thumbs. The Roman Republic for example what makes it
so unusual in the military history sense.
01:36:59
They could sustain defeat after defeat after defeat
and not capitulate.
01:37:06
They could lose a battle of Kony they could lose a battle of late. Trast I mean in the same war
and keep coming back for more. Very unusual.
01:37:16
You know a generation before those defeats Alexander the Great defeats the
massive and the greatest empire the world has ever seen the air came in the Persian Empire with a
couple of big shots. There's never enough time for the society to
implode.
01:37:32
As a society collapsing at the foundations requires that they be
able to stand there and exchange enough punches to get to that point. But in one thousand nine hundred
eighteen the grinding down of nations is well underway. As author
David Frum can says the real war had become an economic and
social survival contest and the generals are beginning to organize their
strategies to quicken and hasten this outcome.
01:38:00
For example when Falcon Hein talks about you know the idea of using attrition to
bleed the French white he explains that you don't have to worry about the Russians anymore
because they're well on their way to having their entire society collapse he says
quote according to all reports the domestic difficulties of the giant
empire are multiplying rapidly. Even if we cannot perhaps expect
a revolution in the grand style we're entitled to believe that Russia's internal
troubles will compel her to give in within a relatively short period. In this
connection it may be taken for granted that she will not revive her military reputation
Meanwhile we need not be anxious about that.
01:38:43
On the contrary it is probable he writes that any such attempt and the losses it
must involve would only hasten the process of disintegration.
01:38:52
End quote.
01:38:54
I should also point out that in the nineteenth century for example that kind of disintegration
not only wasn't the goal it would have been seen as a negative byproduct
in the era where a military defeat meant that one general gave his sword to
the other general and we exchanged some provinces or some colonies or whatnot. The goal wasn't for the
society to collapse.
01:39:17
It was now.
01:39:20
And military leaders began to employ strategies designed to make that
outcome a reality. For example when the war starts the
British use their Navy to clamp down a blockade on Germany
. Now the French don't look at that as a very useful strategy because
after all something like that's going to take a long time and no one when this war starts or
you know a very small minority who turn out to be Cassandra's and prophetic. No one
thinks the war is going to go long enough for something like a blockade to actually take
effect. But by one thousand nine hundred sixteen everyone is starting to understand that
those long term Anaconda like strangling strategies are
very viable.
01:40:06
And the British are not the only ones who can do this. After all
the Germans have a fleet too. Right and this is the point in the story where it becomes
worth talking about again for a minute.
01:40:19
Do you see this German fleet was a key reason the tensions
especially with Britain increased in the pre-war years Rights called the Anglo German naval tensions
but it was considered to be worth it by a Kaiser and a government that thought it was
important to be able to hold your own at sea so these ships were built and they cost
an amazing amount of money a huge amount of industrial capacity is sucked
up into this as we said you turn to basically friendly Britain into an
enemy and now that you've got what you wanted it's
sitting in Port continually and here you've got your country straining every
fibre you know to sacrifice for the war effort Heck the civilians are starting to cut
back on their caloric intake and here's this fleet so expensive to build and every month
sucking up resources and sitting in port. This is the time in the
story where because the Germans get a new admiral
things start to happen on the surface naval front for really the only time in this war
and if you are not for this period like I am I like to call it the battleship era
. Somewhere between eighteen ninety eight one thousand nine hundred forty ish about fifty years
the era where you get these armored leviathans that are just to me they're
fascinating right and they're such incredible vehicles that you may have to fast forward
the show when I start going off on some detail tangent that you know only I find
interesting. But I think these vehicles are incredible and there is so
little evidence of them actually being used that on the few
occasions you know where it happens I tend to look at them rather deeply there's only one occasion in
history I don't think I count the Russo-Japanese War Predrag nothing only one occasion in
history where these armored ships from this era the fifty years
battleship era actually fought the way these admirals had envisioned they would
in long lines miles long lines stretching off to the horizon you know
Lord Nelson the style Pirates Of The Caribbean style and facing a fleet
similarly arrayed in shooting you know in the distance between them. That only happened once.
In this whole fifty year battleship era and only happened once in this war obviously
it's a battle in one thousand nine hundred eighteen called the Battle of Jutland. To kooks like yours
truly this is a fantastically interesting encounter.
01:42:44
When we were thinking about organizing the story you know you try to carve out places to take a
little direction change the momentum change you know you go from the carnage of are done and those
of you who know the story know what's coming up and the future of it and you take a little interlude to talk about
other elements not just the Naval you know side of this but also the fact that the Navy really is a
wonderful canvas on which to represent the technology of this era.
01:43:08
And how big of a deal that is to the people here and that's a perpetual problem
isn't it. I mean going back in time and seeing what looks to be ancient technology to
us looking at it the way the people back then are looking at it to whom it's cutting edge
stuff. I mean first of all I was trying to think about the best way to sort of explain or
create an analogy for how these people see the fleets they have in the fleets in the Navy's
along with this new thing these aircraft are the real cutting edge technology
out there and the reason why is because it's just death to be too
far behind and as I said the best Navy from one thousand nine hundred would lose to
several navies from one thousand fourteen that's a mere fourteen years I don't think those one
hundred forty navies lose a ship that's how quickly things are changing.
Robert Massey in his book Dreadnought has a great line where he says in one thousand eight hundred and that's a mere
fourteen years before the first world war breaks out every single British admiral
commanding a British battleship had been trained when they came up in the Navy in the
age of sail.
01:44:13
So that's an example of how cutting edge this is if you want to mental image think of
the Titanic the ship that struck the iceberg and went down and everything that's from this era. It's
sort of a steampunk T. Sherlock Holmes he kind of feel
I always think about it as I mean if you were in the command center one of these battleships It's
like Star Trek meets you know Sherlock Holmes or steampunk and you instead of
having a digital display you'd have one of those you know round dials with one of those
arrows that looks like the elevator arrow in a nice New York hotel that goes around on a
gold background I mean you know very very beautiful Actually the ships were
beautiful polished wood the whole thing they were just gorgeous and they were the cutting
edge technology of their day. And I had to
resist comparing them to space ships as a way to try to have us
feel like the people back then felt because you know me that would be just be so me to so it's just like a
starship but it's a little like one but not enough for the comparison right as I thought to myself I thought
you know those people saw battleships as really cutting edge but not as much as we
would spaceships with an equal number of you know crew members on board that would be a bigger deal
but then I remembered the submarines for the
people again hard for us to get all wild about them but to the people back then that is
science fiction.
01:45:35
The very definition of the word right out of Jules Verne's twenty thousand Leagues Under the sea and all of a sudden
we have ships that go underwater. It's like they have cloaking devices they become
invisible and worse if you're you know a naval official back
then is that they now carry new weapons that threaten
everything you have.
01:45:57
This is what really accounts for the cautious nature of naval warfare in this
period right why didn't the ships just all come out blazing and everything. Well there's all these
uncertainties. Part of this period's attraction is that you begin to see a
showdown in naval warfare when you haven't had any test of any of this
technology in a long time. No one knows what's going to happen when you get whole fleets
out here blazing away with this modern technology it hasn't happened before.
One of the things everyone's kind of scared about is you know these torpedoes for example in these
mines you know these floating mines that that lay in the water when the ship runs into them and boom they
explode. Because these weapons are very very cheap you can make a lot of
them and they can sink. These are massively expensive
you know ships that take years to build and whose loss is catastrophic
. They can sink those. That's a huge change because in most of naval warfare
generally there are exception but when you want to sink a massive expensive first
class ship you generally need either another massive first class ship
or a lot of other ones. They have huge survival strength right they they can
justify their cost in the investment. Now all of a sudden for example Churchill talked
about the British Admiralty just being petrified that you would turn around one day and these
great huge expensive ships that took forever to build in that you only had a limited number of were just
disappearing in the blink of an eye boom quick explosion another ship gone and then
when the war starts it like the first couple of months that happens. They lose a super
Dreadnought friend like RAM of the British battleship forces.
The H.M.S. audacious strikes a mine like you know a month or two after the war starts and that's a
that's a pretty brand new ship almost. And boom goes down one mine one battleship.
Wow. Again if you're in the admiralty you're going OK what does this mean. And
then a submarine like sinks a couple of old British cruisers boom boom boom I mean one
right after another and now all of a sudden you know these people who've got these big expensive
ships are kind of petrified about using them in military history like Martin van Creveld have
spoken about this where you just have this strange dichotomy where you spend so much
money on these vessels because they're very important but they because you spend so much money on them you don't want to risk
them and so you have the German navy in the British Navy dealing with each
other as maybe two snipers hunting each other would deal with each other waiting for
the other side to make a mistake and then when they do pouncing.
01:48:31
But the problem is that when the war starts the British clamp down that blockade
and that's all they need to do. The pressures on the Germans to do something about it
. And as we said Winston Churchill who was the civilian head of the Navy for a
while in this conflict wrote down that really while they would have been a lot of advantages to
sending the you know numerically superior British fleet to go in there just kick German
tail.
01:48:57
The downside if you failed to do that was so bad it wasn't worth
it he said yeah you know we could get all these good things if we decisively defeated the Germans because but if we
lost and remember this is all untried technology and naval comm that's
weird and unpredictable anyway. You could bring the superior fleet in there and somehow
lose or just lose enough so that you don't have the numerical advantage anymore you've got
parity with the enemy and that was unthinkable and Churchill said the chances of that happening
might not be great but if it happens it could cost us the whole war.
01:49:31
But I remember reading that and thinking to myself I don't know if I buy it but a whole lot of interesting
thoughts come to mind. If you believe what Churchill says about it
basically having the potential to end the war now here's how he explains it in his book he said
if the German Navy were even to have a nice victory against the British and cut down the numerical
superiority so that they both have the same number of big ships then the German Navy would be able
to interdict the stuff heading for Britain and Churchill so that that would result in
quote the trade in food supply of the British Isles would have been
paralyzed.
01:50:06
Our armies on the continent would have been cut off from their base by superior naval force
all the transportation of the Allies would have been jeopardized and hampered the United
States could not have intervened in the war starvation an invasion would have descended upon the
British people ruin utter and final would have overwhelmed the allied
cause. He says the great disparity of the results at stake in a battle between
the British and German navies can never be excluded from our thoughts.
01:50:35
End quote.
01:50:37
So if you buy Churchill's theory that means instead of being the most secure of the
great powers that I think most of us assume Britain is after all you're talking about an island nation
it's a country with a moat around it right and then you add the greatest Navy in the world looks pretty secure to me. But
Churchill's idea here is that. Yeah but we're one lucky punch away from that
situation changing to stay with our boxing analogy and if that's
true the Germans maybe are justified in keeping that fleet
safe in port in case you need a lucky punch maybe you're losing the war elsewhere you decide
you'll send your you know ships on a death row and take your chances maybe you get lucky
right maybe you get a knockout blow if again you buy into what Churchill saying it means that
the Germans will as long as they still have a fleet somewhere maintain the ability to win
the war with a lucky punch at any time. I find that fascinating. Don't know if I believe it but find it fascinating.
01:51:32
Now the only time in this war that the attempt at a lucky
punch happens it wasn't thrown that way but the only time that this decisive
encounter that could be potentially horrifying if it totally went the wrong way for
Britain.
01:51:47
The only time this happens is in this part of the story we're in now one thousand nine
hundred eighteen and it happens because of that ad where we mentioned earlier his name is Reinhard shear and he takes
over in early one nine hundred sixteen and he feels about the German fleet pretty much the same way everyone
else does. It's time to earn your keep and let's start acting more aggressively with it. And
so he'll start trying to the best way to put it is track the British
the British have more big ships than the Germans so sheers idea is well let's see if we can ambush
small numbers of those big ships overwhelm them and slowly but surely whittle
down the advantage in numbers that the British have and it's one of these
attempted traps that results in this really only time
for enthusiasts like yours truly to see what these fleets could do in an
all out encounter.
01:52:39
With both sides hurling steel at the horizon and with all these
weapons that you know from a spectator standpoint you're just dying to see
what the heck they can do.
01:52:50
I mean let's start with the guns the guns on the ships or the same kind of guns you saw
leveling the Belgian fortune that the Germans were using it for done. Those are the big naval
guns being used on land. Well why do you think they call them naval guns right. These
new battleships I mean for example the British are bringing in four or five
brand new ones that will fight in the Second World War two that have fifteen inch guns
and multiples I mean like eight to twelve fifteen inch guns. That's incredible
thirteen inches of armor they were like thirty thousand tons. The new Queen Elizabeth class they're
called they can do like twenty five knots if they're really smoking.
01:53:29
These are incredible incredible modern warships. And when you realize that they can hurl a
shell the size of a small Volkswagen eighteen
miles across the horizon at a target that's one hundred feet
wide.
01:53:44
While both shooter and Target are moving and hope to hit
it reasonably well that shocking I mean the Spanish-American
war less than twenty years before this time period they would fire hundreds of
shots and about just less than three miles distance. And
every now and then they'd score a hit. You know hundreds to get a few in the
Russo-Japanese war they broke all records when they opened fire at each other at eight
miles distance. That's eleven years before the Battle of Jutland
eight miles breaking all records the battle of javelin has ships that can fire eighteen miles.
01:54:24
How do you even hit anything on the horizon. Well both sides British and German are incorporating again
it's like steampunk technology maybe a rudimentary fire control computer you
might call it. And both sides have different versions and the Germans have superior optics and so they'll
score the early hits in in this encounter that happens in
large part because the British are reading the Naval communications
of the Germans.
01:54:50
See I love the Battle of Jutland for a couple of reasons not just because it's the battleship encounter of
the war but also because it's a rubber meets the road moment to put up or shut up
historical acid test where all of the
military theories in the debates and the philosophical differences amongst
experts over the proper way to build these ships and what naval battles going to be like in the next
war and all that stuff.
01:55:15
Leave the realm of the theoretical and gets you know laboratory tested on
the naval battlefield the land powers already saw this happen to them right at the start of the
war. Their military lame theories and all that the people had speculated about for
decades got their acid test in the first month.
01:55:32
Places like the battles of the frontiers where those sort of high minded all
academic debates military war college is about whether or not charging
cavalry will have any sort of a role on a modern battlefield with machine guns and everything. I mean that kind of
stuff gets tested in the first month of the war and the results are of course bloody and
decisive even if they won't be absorbed right away.
01:55:55
The naval side of this war hasn't had this kind of an acid test yet. There have been little encounters one of the
Falkland Islands another one a dog or bank between a few cruisers here in a battle cruiser or
two there but nothing like what's going to happen adjustment and when you realize how
careful these admirals are being because of the nature of naval combat I mean
you could provide an opportunity for someone to get a lucky punch if you're not careful so none of these
admirals wants to go out unless they have an edge unless they have an advantage on their side. Favorable
conditions it would be called the British don't have to do anything. Because they've got this blockade
going so worst case scenario if things just stay as they are they're wearing the Germans
down with this blockade they're going to create the disintegration of a state
just like we told you you know was the goal now of these leaders you know if the
Germans begin to starve at home and the caloric intake is
already being reduced for their civilians you will see a revolution in the streets so this British
strategy a blockade will eventually bring Germany to its knees. So it's incumbent upon the
Germans to do something about that situation when they get their new admiral Reinhard shere in one thousand nine
hundred eighty who wants to be more aggressive. He decides to create his own edge. You know the
conditions for his own advantage on the naval battle field so he set
traps in late May one thousand nine hundred sixteen he sets one for what he
hopes will be a detachment of big British warships you know get five or six battle
cruisers and entice them past your submarines or into your
minefields or into an area where they think they can feast on some of your light forces
and then pounce on them with your big fleet. And that's what she plans to do. And so
he sets out all these forces and prepares this little ambush. And what he doesn't
know is that the British as we said are reading all these naval
communications are the British the greatest cryptographers on the planet. Or is that just a
twentieth century sort of coloring my view because boy were they great the twentieth
century in the second world war they will famously be reading all the German Enigma traffic among other things
in this war in the first couple of months the German naval codes fall into their hands
and while they may not be deciphered every single message when the entire
German High Seas Fleet as it's called one hundred ships about decides to
weigh anchor and go out you know looking to play in the North Sea. The British know about that they'll be
big communication spikes and everything. So when shear decides to set this ambush the British
or even the naval codes tell the fleet guess what the Germans are out there and they don't
know that we know they're out there and so the British Grand Fleet thinks OK now we have the
advantage we will trap the trappers and so the British
Grand Fleet which is like twenty eight you know super dreadnaughts and dreadnoughts I mean it's
the biggest fleet in the world.
01:58:47
It's the most powerful fleet in world history up to this point. And in terms of size and
tonnage it may be the biggest fleet ever. It weighs anchor it starts
making its way to where this ambush point is. And it leaves so
early by the way because it's got all this advance information that it totally screws up a lot of ABOL
shearers in a Bush because his forces you know who had these submarines that were going to be outside the
British ports and they could shoot at the British ships as they left the harbor none of that stuff's ready
and so the the British ships make their way to the rendezvous point where the with the Germans
and you're setting up another Trafalgar here I mean if the British
fleet emerges into view and catches the German fleet there you could
sink half of it before they get away. And then Murphy's Law
joins the battle Murphy's Law takes center stage in this encounter by the way which would have
made a great dress rehearsal for early twentieth century naval warfare
. Unfortunately it's opening night and you know you have troubles on
opening night with all of the loose ends that haven't been fixed yet imagine instead of opening night you're doing the dress
rehearsal and yet you have two hundred fifty ships in about fifteen square miles when these things
come together I mean the things that can go wrong and do go wrong affect this battle
mightily and it's a good argument for why these admirals are so cautious they know this.
So Murphy's law intervenes while the British are about to pounce on the Germans because the
British sent a message back to their intelligence service wanting a confirmation of this or that and the
intelligence people reading the German naval codes tell them that they made a mistake
earlier they said oh yeah the German fleets not at sea like we thought they're still safely in
port. Don't worry about it. So now these admirals who five minutes ago
knew where the German fleet was and were ready to pounce on it.
02:00:37
I don't know they're there any more but of course they are
.
02:00:42
And so now we have both main fleets close to each other
in the North Sea. None of them aware of the other's existence
. So the rhythm of the Battle of Jutland
is wonderful starts off as a trap flips into a counter trap and now hit is
serendipitously morphed into an encounter battle and
that's how it gets started.
02:01:09
German light forces on one side of the horizon. British light forces on the other side of horizon.
Spot a civilian trawler between the two of them they can't see
each other because they are so far away the curvature of the earth limits their sight but they can both see the trawler. So these
light units you know converge on the trawler to investigate and discover each other start shooting and send
messages back to the main fleet saying guess what I've found over here on the other side of the horizon
.
02:01:33
The enemy fleet right. And so this creates like a war
vortex where all these naval forces start converging on this area.
The ships that arrive first are the battle cruisers. This is an
interesting side of the story because the battle cruisers are experiencing a test right
now and it's the test of whether or not the admirals that backed this entire
design. In the decades before this period were correct about it.
02:02:04
This is a theoretical argument intil there is data there hasn't been a chance to have any
data now we're going to have data. Are these ships viable.
First of all you need to know what they are a battle cruiser is a hybrid design. It's supposed to
combine the punching power of a battleship with the speed of a
cruiser. So if a battleship is like some giant
lion for example or tiger these battle cruisers are
more like the Panthers. Now this is going to be confusing because they're all named
after like giant cats and so the flagship of this battle cruiser squadron on the British
side is the Lions so don't get confused if I start talking about the lion but
that describes him pretty well. The hypothetical problem here though is that you had
to give up to get the speed of a cruiser. You had to give up the armor of the
Battleship. So what we have here is a ship with all the striking
power of a battleship. But one that can't take a punch by a
battleship or it's counterparts. Another battle
cruiser. When this was pointed out before the war the admirals who liked the
battle cruiser concept waved off this worry by saying Don't worry speed
will be their armor and that's where the argument ends because nobody knows if
speed will be their armor these battle cruisers approach this battle at twenty
six or twenty seven knots which is amazingly fast for a ship their
size there are six of them on the British side and five of them on the German side
and when they meet they begin to open fire at only about
like eight miles which is short and the British have the longer range guns by the
way but don't open fire first. This becomes the first of many things that the
British admiral of these battlecruisers a guy named Beatty will be critiqued about. You
know after this battle.
02:04:01
The battle opens up at about three forty five in the afternoon. Visually
it is hard to see these ships. If you actually see a picture of them
at full tilt are smoking like they are on fire and when you have a bunch of them they're putting
tons of this dark soot into the air. Add to that the fact that we're over by
Denmark in the North Sea There's fog. There are squalls
there is mist there is rain there's all kinds of things that inhibit the ability to
see very well and sometimes one fleet will be in a position where they see the other
fleet really well but the other fleet doesn't see them and vice versa. So the part of being a good
hammer was trying to arrange your fleet so that the other fleet is highlighted against the horizon
or in some way that makes them an easier target and your fleet is kind of obscured and hard to hit
. But ships have not tried to shoot at each other and some of the ranges they're going to try to
shoot at each other here. And when these battle cruisers start shooting at about three forty
five the British shoot long initially over the heads of the
German ships the German ships are disconcertingly accurate
they strike the battle cruiser tiger like six times in quick succession with eleven inch
shells.
02:05:17
Then at four o'clock they strike the flag ship the lion with Admiral
Beatty on board the shells penetrate the turret which is
the sort of armored bubble that contains the big guns the turret either
explodes or catches on fire and there are photographs by the way moments in the
Battle of Jutland they're not great and I always imagined them zoomed in and colorized
but you can see the lion burning and it looks bad. And Admiral
Beatty didn't realize at the time how closely he came to being blown to
kingdom come.
02:05:53
They'll find out later that a guy who was dying and who had lost
both his legs on the line and saved the ship by
flooding the magazine the last door he gave was to to flood the whole area where the
explosives were to keep them from blowing the ship up. Now if Beatty was wondering what
it would be like to see one of these modern amazing ships
explode he only had to wait about two minutes if you actually look at the
moment by moment rundown of this battle and that's part of the fun of naval battles. All the ships
kept very descriptive and detailed logs about their
movements moment by moment by moment they've reconstructed this entire battle from almost each individual
ship's viewpoint. And the part that strikes you when you read a rundown is how quickly
everything is happening so baby suffers this head on his own turret at like four o'clock two minutes
later. The H.M.S. indefatigable a somewhere in the twenty thousand
tons of battle cruiser explodes
just explodes in a moment. It's Churchill in the admiralty is a nightmare come true. I
mean in a blink of an eye you have a towering cloud reaching up
like fifteen hundred feet. Witnesses say you could see you know funnels and
guns and everything shooting up you know into the horizon and
both sides German and British watch this happen together
.
02:07:21
Out of the more than one thousand sailors on board the indefatigable to survive
. It's hard not to include an account by one of them. How do you not include an account
of a survivor of a ship whose magazine gets penetrated
and explodes with him on it I guess he was way up high in the top observational area do you still
call that a crow's nest he said he was one hundred eighty feet high. His name is
C. Follmer And here's how he describes the explosion of the H.M.S.
in the thicket of all while he was on board.
02:07:53
Quote There was a terrific explosion aboard the ship.
02:07:56
The magazines went I saw the guns go up in the air just like matchsticks twelve inch guns
they were bodies and everything.
02:08:03
She was beginning to settle down within a half a minute the ship turned right over and she was gone
I was one hundred eighty feet up and I was thrown well clear of the ship otherwise I would have been sucked under.
I was practically unconscious turning over really. At last I came on top of the
water. When I came up there was another fellow named Jimmy Greene and we got a piece of wood
he was on one end and I was on the other and a couple of minutes afterward some shells came
over and Jim was minus his head so I was left on my lonesome
end quote.
02:08:35
Now about twenty minutes after that the
H.M.S. Queen Mary another one of these battle cruisers explodes.
Same way I mean a little bit different I mean if she gets hit and then there's this pause and sailors are
jumping into the water and then she explodes. We have accounts from sailors who were in the water who
said that the sky was all of a sudden just filled with all this massively heavy debris that was now
falling down on them in the water and they were all diving under the water trying to
escape giant funnels and big metal objects falling on them. And probably a lot of them didn't
escape. Again more than one thousand of these sailors on board a small
handful rescued afterwards less than less than twenty five. And at
one point Admiral Beatty turns to a subordinate and says There seems to be something wrong with our bloody
ships today and he's right.
02:09:26
They're not passing the acid test the hypothesis that
you know was the philosophical underpinnings of this entire class of warships at least on the
British side is proving to be flawed. They don't
have enough armor. Speed is not turning out to be their
armor. And when their armor gets pierced you know the way they're
handling this ammunition and the lack of Flash protectors and some other things means that the
magazine is catching on fire an exploding way too easily and you can tell that it's
happening too easily because on the German side it's not happening. They sacrificed in
some other areas their guns are smaller for example they're a little slower in order to win a
slab some more armor over some of these vulnerable points and they're not blowing up
.
02:10:16
Again these Germans build ships like Mercedes and they're taking a pounding
while they are running away.
02:10:26
Now that's that's what you have to notice in what's happening at these battles you know the ships are not stationary they're
not anchored in staying in the same spot they're all moving and they're all moving in a specific direction
the British are chasing the Germans and the Germans are moving away. Now if you were
the British admiral This makes perfect sense to you. You've got the bigger ships right. And until they start
exploding around you you have more of them. Besides that you have a bunch of big brand new the
newest most awesome battleships in the world their Queen Elizabeth class. I've
already mentioned war spy Malaya valient all these famous ships that will all fight in the
second world war they are fresh off the docks fifteen inch guns thirty thousand
tons thirteen inches of armor and babies got them with him.
So you darn right these Germans are going to run away never mind that you know I tried to
communicate with those battleships using flags and then you
talked about Murphy's Law interposing its will on this battle. Part of it has to
do with things that just look so silly in hindsight you know these ships have radio. Sometimes these
admirals are not that cool about using it sometimes it has problems by the way so sometimes they're blameless. But a
lot of times these animals are like the old guy trying to use the
computer and they're so much more comfortable with the way they were brought up and and the things
that they did in the maneuvers in peace time are one of the ways these these ships
communicate is by running the orders of the admiral up on a flagpole they have all these
different flags and each one means something different so when the admiral wants to communicate you know to the fleet
his orders they run a flag up the flagpole on his ship the flag ship and then every other ship
is supposed to as they see it run up the same one and you get the message across. But this is a method that was
used one hundred years before in Lord Nelson's time when they're fighting
Napoleon. At ranges that are exponentially
shorter does that make sense exponentially shorter than the distances in this battle without the smoke
and all these other things and in the peace time training it seemed to work fine in the
rigors of combat. It's not working fine. And the big
battleships don't see the flag change when Beatty tells them to do
things and they're not here when this battle first happened they've been playing catch
up the whole battle but now you know they're arriving on the scene and their shells are falling sort of by the Germans and now
the British think they've got these German battlecruisers pinned down even if you know you're losing a
few of your battlecruisers while you chase them. But what they don't know is that those battle
cruisers are leading them into the Mall of the entire German
navy which is coming up from about forty miles away moving towards them.
02:13:05
What started off as the German trap flipped into the British counter trap
evolved and morphed into the encounter battle has now by
almost improvisational luck become a German
ambush again.
02:13:22
If successful the German fleet could wipe out four or
five battle cruisers and four of the newest ships in the
British Navy It would be. I'm sure Winston Churchill would say I'm sure I could speak for him
here. A catastrophe. And the Germans are on the verge of making it happen.
02:13:43
And then a light cruiser scouting for the British
sees the entire German fleet on the horizon and
radios the message back to Admiral Beatty in the Grand Fleet under Admiral Jellicoe farther
away and Beatty sees those Germans very quickly too with the naked eye
the first thing he does when he realizes he's been baited into this trap is turn his
battlecruisers one hundred eighty degrees in the other direction and start book an out of
there. Once again Murphy's Law say that many times in this battle
if I go too deeply into it once again he runs up the flag saying turn around
in the big battleships the brand new ones don't see it and they will end up exposed out there to
the entire German fleet for a while taking a pounding and dishing out to it should
be pointed out none the less. What Admiral Beatty has done by turning one hundred eighty
degrees away is turning himself into bait
and the Germans are following and Beatty is running back towards his big
fleet which is coming up from also about forty miles away so now he's flipped the ambush
once again and now the Germans are heading toward the only
fleet that is still invisible on this naval battle field to anyone. The
Germans don't know that the British Grand Fleet is up ahead of them.
02:15:07
But now the British Grand Fleet knows that the Germans are coming.
02:15:11
And Admiral Jellicoe in a very brave move I mean he's operating without enough
information once again Admiral Beatty gets blamed for not given him you know good positional information or what
not but a lot of this falls into the category of it's a dress rehearsal of these guys a lot of
their errors are the kind of things they would have corrected if they'd had a chance to practice it
in you know combat situations. Unfortunately these are a lot of you know you wouldn't
call them rookie mistakes but but you would correct these before the next battle nonetheless Jellicoe
takes a chance deploys the entire British Grand Fleet which you know
is is more than one hundred ships over fifteen twenty square miles of ocean it
takes fifteen to twenty minutes that's how well trained this fleet is. And he deploys the whole thing
and he's waiting for the Germans to arrive and the Germans are now in the midst right
this battle fields very mistie and you you run through fog banks you won't see things for a while and the
Germans can't see what's going on. And famously Admiral hipper who's the German
admiral in charge of the battlecruisers radios Admiral Shearer the head
of the entire German Navy who's with the German fleet here and he famously looks off
in the mist and tell shear something lurks in that soup.
02:16:24
We would do well not to thrust into it too deeply too late.
02:16:30
The first thing that happens is is the germans start taking some fire and they don't know from where
big guns. And then all of a sudden the missed parts for a second and it's a
nother British battle cruiser the Invincible
.
02:16:44
And as soon as the missed parts in the invincible becomes clear you know it doesn't take ninety
seconds before big German guns are opening fire the shells pouring down
on the invincible and like the other two battlecruisers the invincible explodes
.
02:17:01
So if anybody has forgotten in the intervening you know hour or two
since the earlier battlecruisers exploded that this design is proving to be somewhat
flawed. The explosion of the Invincible before the two main fleets collide is a
historical reminder. None the less it's only Soon after that that the
Germans emerge from the mist to find the entire
deployed British fleet waiting for them in like a crescent around the
horizon and Shearer says the minute that they can see what's happening the entire
horizon erupts in a sheet of flame. Now these ships are a long way from each other
almost invisible to the naked eye smudges up against the horizon you see like the
smoke of all these ships and then you see like the flash of the guns
and just like lightning and thunder where you see the lightning and then there's this delay and then the thunder arrives.
Same thing you see this flash and it's silent and then boom the boom hits you
after the shells have already passed over and you know there are destroyers in
these battles giving the talk about all the light ships running around you know sort of parrying and like like a bunch
of little gnats between the Battle Fleet and these destroyers sometimes describe what it's like when these
giant shells pass over their heads and they say they sound like locomotives
when they screech over your little ship's head but when they fall in front of your
little ship like your little destroyer they raise geysers of the water
. Sometimes one hundred sometimes two hundred feet up into the air and it's composed of
tons of liquid which then falls back down to earth and these destroyers these
little ships are sometimes beaten up pretty severely by all this water smashing back
down into them. Some people are you know splashed overboard and all these kinds of things.
None the less Admiral Jellicoe has performed a famous naval maneuver that you
never want to be on the receiving end of called crossing the t's where he's formed the
top crossbar of the T N portiere and the Germans form the
you know vertical line of the T. and every one of the British ships can fire on the
German ships individually as they come to the front of the line.
02:19:11
It's a disaster.
02:19:13
Very quickly shear gets hit with more than twenty two heavy shells fast and within ten
minutes here has quite tactically adroitly by the way
turned his fleet around and disappeared back into the mist and once again without
radar and all that kind of stuff. Hard to you know know where he is at that point he sends out a bunch of
light units and destroyers and whatnot to cover his escape so that the British can't just run after them they might
run into a bunch of torpedoes and mines and stuff and then inexplicably not too
long after the she arrives back into her visual range and you know people fire again
and then sheer escapes again because he got his teeth crossed for a second time in one battle which is almost
unheard of that shows you Jellicoe is a pretty darn good admiral and then there's a little night action between the light
units but about this time Admiral shears had enough you get your T. crossed
twice in one day it's time to call it a battle and shearing the Germans manage
to limp home.
02:20:11
When all is said and done the British lose three battlecruisers three armored cruisers and
eight destroyers while one German battle cruiser one pre Dreadnought
battleship for light cruisers and five destroyers are sent to the bottom
.
02:20:26
The casualties it just lend are not significant. They don't hurt either navy
badly. The British learned their lesson about the battle cruiser design but the
Germans are humbled you know they don't come out again in strength I mean
there will be a little encounter here a little try there but but this is it. They gave it an
attempt and they seemed permanently shaken because of it
.
02:20:51
The German surface fleet will not perform another militarily significant
move in the war.
02:20:59
The only part of the German navy that's going to be relevant for the rest of the
war is the part that uses torpedoes to go
after not military targets but economic ones
. By nineteen sixteen the economic
side of this war is coming to the fore.
02:21:23
We begin to see what a war on this
scale is like when it becomes part of the normal life of all of these
countries. You know this isn't a new phenomenon anymore by nineteen
sixteen by the middle of one thousand nine hundred sixteen we've been doing this for two years
and it's been sucking up more and more of the energy of these nation states that are
involved in the conflict. It's very unlike the way most wars by these
powers had been fought where the civilian population might not even know a war is
happening. If it was happening they certainly weren't directly or
importantly impacted. This war's different.
02:22:05
First of all it's life or death.
02:22:08
The stakes are so high that everybody's involved in the armies are requiring such
immense amounts of stuff you know the Germans will call this material schlock the
war of material that the entire civilian population and the production
capacity of all these countries gets warped trying to provide it
.
02:22:28
As historian Cohen Dyer says quote It is significant
that the phrase home front came into use during World War one when the
role of munitions workers and of civilian production more generally was becoming less
important to victory as the soldiers in the trenches without a constant flow of
supplies equal to the vast consumption at the front. The soldiers would soon be
helpless and since the mobilization of so huge a number of men left a
vast gaps in the normal workforce. France had put twenty percent of its entire
population into uniform. Germany eighteen percent and the other major powers not much
less the remaining adult civilians had to be directed by government into
whatever jobs were needed to keep production going. In effect the civilian economy
he writes was conscripted to the governments of Europe quickly took control
over labor and raw materials imposed rationing on all scarce goods and
created true war economies. Women flooded into factories to replace the
men at the front and most production beyond the basic needs of subsistence was
diverted into the war effort and corn.
02:23:38
Dyer is also the one that said By this time quote battles
had become an industrial operation in reverse in which the rates of
destruction at the front matched the rates of production in the industries at home.
02:23:53
And quote I think you guys like the British military
leader Hague or even the German military leader General Eric Von
Falcon Heim and I think about all these skills that they're required to have
now above and beyond what you would think of as a normal general's
skills and you saw this in earlier wars as famous stories of General Sherman in the
civil war in the United States being extra qualified for modern warfare because of
all these failed jobs in private industry he'd had that taught him all these lessons that
no one knew what Gen would need in modern warfare things about logistics and stuff like that
. But by nineteen sixteen a guy like eg a
cavalry commander looks like he would be totally out of his element dealing
with the modern production needs of warfare as indeed he was. Falcon Hines a bit
more scientific of a guy and he's you know I was trying to think if I were general fault
and if this were a war game and you know I played a lot of those in my time.
And I got assigned because I don't think I would take Germany if I had a choice
of which side of the war game I wanted to play. But let's say I get assigned to Germany and I command in play
Germany in this war game and I'm Falcon hein. You know the estimates
are especially during this time period that if you include the colonial subjects of the of the
powers in Europe during this time period my enemies in this war if I'm fall
behind have seven hundred fifty million people they can call
on you know for their value in their effort and in some cases their
lives. My side of the alliance has about one hundred fifty million
my enemies have the greatest fleet in the world and I just learned at the Battle of Jutland that my Navy can't
come anywhere near touching them. And they've shut down
all of my overseas trade so if I'm going to fall behind already I'm sitting
here going wow. Now you look at the lineup in
terms of the kind of countries in each Alliance for each of the British and the French and the Russians as the three big
guys in the Allied entente Alliance These are all first
rate powers best sea power best land power biggest power all three together
. Wow And then they have a bunch of other countries like Italy and and smaller powers.
That's a very powerful force. Who do I have on my side
Austria-Hungary Bulgaria and Turkey basically none of those
powers are first rate. At least the Turks aren't asking me for help all the time if I'm
Falk and I know they're putting on a pretty brave fight they've managed to kick the British French.
South Africans Indians New Zealanders and Australians out of Gallipoli in January
one thousand nine hundred sixteen.
02:26:38
That's unexpected.
02:26:40
They've managed to beat the British forces mostly Indian troops in a place called Coote in
modern day Iraq trapped them in a fortress there forced them to surrender and
took them on a death march but it really doesn't impact Falcon hind very much one way or the other. It's
just nice for him to know that the Turks are winning as opposed to losing because they are losing against the Russians but
it's a mixed bag remember the Turks are tough but they are not quite
a twentieth century Army So those are all that's gravy to Falcon Hein The bigger
problem if you're Falcon Hein is you're your close allies the Ostrom variants
there are a pain in the rear. They don't listen to you to begin with you're having fights with their main military
leaders and then they go do what they want anyway and then they screw up because they didn't follow your advice
and then they come to you and say Will you bail us out if your Falcon high and they are a pain in the rear and he's
continually having to take scarce troops from places like ver done and
instead you know taking the train sending them over east and saving the
Austrian Guerin's bacon.
02:27:41
Can't really blame them though they're in big trouble anyway. They may not have been a country in one thousand twenty
even if there hadn't been a first world war.
02:27:48
They're made up of eleven major ethnic groups in that state some of whom don't want to be
there and their army is a microcosm of their state and you've got
troops who don't even want to be in your empire at times on the front line
that you're asking to die for your empire. It's not a good situation. They're
constantly getting into trouble and as one German diplomat famously says about Germany's
situation with Austria-Hungary we are fettered to a corpse
. We're tied to a dead guy and that's the Austrian Garion force now in your
favor if you're a falcon and you probably have the best
army in the world than one thousand and sixteen German army is
fantastic. It's a combination of the best aspects of the one nine
hundred fourteen Foresta Germany went to war with. But battle hardened by
experience. Here's the way writer in passing him describes it quote
It is true that the German army on the western front by early one nine hundred sixteen was more
skilled and better equipped for trench warfare than either the British or the French. This is
not too surprising he says as the British Expeditionary Force had only just expanded its
army from around two hundred fifty thousand in one thousand fourteen to just over a
million largely inexperienced men and the French he writes had always been
uncomfortable with the notion of defensive operations rather than the offensive spirit
. He then says quote Many of the German veterans of the inconclusive the bitter
fighting it know where Chappelle Artois champagne and loose in one thousand fifteen had
survived and stiffened in awe. Or me that had been well led at the sharp end and remained
resolute against allied efforts in the West. If it come close to beating the Russian armies on the
eastern front in that year also. In short as John terrain has noted
it must never be forgotten that the German army of that period was very good indeed.
02:29:44
End quote. So that's what you bring to the table. Is
that enough.
02:29:51
Is having the best army in the world enough and by the way that's something you traditionally
think of when you think of the French. But it is safe to say I think that since about eight hundred
seventy the Germans have the best army in the world. Will that compensate for all
the downsides of the Central Powers have. Hard to know one of the
worst is the fact that the left hand and the right hand don't know what each other are doing in the Central Powers
.
02:30:16
The Austrians go off the reservation all the time don't tell anybody what they do and don't get any approval don't work
together with anyone and it's a handicap especially when
the Allies slash entente forces are pretty darn good at this. They have an
agreement that they made in one thousand fifteen to come to the aid of each other when hard pressed. When the Germans
launch for done within a month the Russians come riding to the rescue in
Lithuania trying to help.
02:30:42
If they launch an offensive that they are clearly not ready for it how could you be that would be a very
short time in this period to have planned and stocked up for and carried out an
offensive in March one thousand nine hundred eighteen the Russians throw human
wave attacks at the Germans and predictably get mowed down by the
Germans. You know looking at the corpses thought these people totally untrained cannon fodder
as though the Russians were willing to throw tons of human meat at the
Germans simply to scare them enough so they would pull some units out of are done and take some pressure off the
French. It was so inept that some of the casualties the Russian
soldiers suffered were because of being shelled by their own side's artillery which is always a
tragedy and twelve thousand Russian soldiers from
those in one night a lot of these were wounded but a bunch were
people that just you know were out there in the cold without the proper stuff I mean the Russian logistics
are traditionally pretty horrible especially in this period.
02:31:44
It shows you the nature of you know operations there the Russians are
not generally thought of as handling these sorts of things well.
And in March one thousand sixteen. They don't handle it
well.
02:31:58
Again the worst part probably from the Russian perspective though is they went to all
that trouble and it didn't take any pressure off the French had done.
02:32:08
The follow up effort though by the Russians on June fourth
one thousand nine hundred sixteen will be handled much better surprisingly
well if you're a guy like Falcon Hein and you've written off with a lot of your other generals.
02:32:23
Any chance the Russians have of doing anything significant in one thousand and
sixteen on June fourth nineteen sixteen the Russians do something very significant
led by their unquestionably best general in the First World War a guy
named Bruce a lot of we had mentioned in an earlier episode
that the Russians simply couldn't attack I mean they were they were OK sometimes on the
defense but they couldn't attack and the problem is always the same they just have such an old
fashioned not up to date logistics system that the farther you
moved away from where you started the harder it was to get the supplies necessary for a modern
army to run. But Brasil love is the most modern commander the
Russians have. He's been learning from fighting the best army in the
world the Germans all this time and even though he's a cavalry commander and they have a
reputation for always being sort of old fashioned. Reese a lot embraces the
new systems out there in the new technology for example. He does something almost no Russian
army ever does in the First World War he uses aircraft to help as spotters and
to locate positions behind the lines and for reconnaissance. Right there
he's acting in a much more modern way than Russian armies do remember we're talking about an army
that for the entire length of the first world war will still be wearing
cloth caps they never get metal helmets during the duration of the First World War
So this is a very old fashioned fashioned Army pursue love takes what he can do. That's
modern and uses it. He launches his famous
offensive named after him on June fourth and he does so with a very modern artillery
barrage intense but short he's used all sorts of camouflage
to hide his intentions he went as far as painting fake
trenches on the ground behind his lines to confuse the Germans and the Austrian
carryings on the other side.
02:34:22
And when he launches his attack he does so along with an
enormous front. The eastern front very different on the western front instead of being this really constrained
small area which they can build a wall from side to side really easily. It's a
huge area so it's much more thinly defended it would pursue love does
is he attacks across this giant front with a half million men intending to
break upon the defenses of the Central Powers like a wave breaks on a
breakwater and knowing that in many places his forces will get pushed
backwards. But where he meets weakness they should burst through.
02:35:00
Here's the way writer G.J. Meyer explains what happens
on June fifth when hours after the artillery bombardment starts the
half million Russian forces step out of their trenches and move toward the mostly
austro hungarian lines but there are German troops to quote his
infantry when it attacked on June fifth found the Austrians in confusion.
02:35:24
Its advance stunned them with its scope extending as it did along a line of
more than two hundred fifty miles. Brasil of the idea was that by attacking everywhere he
was sure to find a hole somewhere and he had moved his reserves. Scant though they were
close enough to the front so that they could exploit opportunities as soon as any appeared.
02:35:44
End quote.
02:35:46
If he continues quote and the result was from the first hour a
success of almost incredible magnitude. The Austrian Garion fourth Army
disintegrated when he hit seventy one thousand of its men more than half the army
were killed wounded or captured. The seventh was wrecked even more completely
losing one hundred thirty three thousand men. It was the same almost everywhere. After three
days Bruce the law found himself in possession of three hundred thousand prisoners
before the end of the week.
02:36:16
More than half of the Austrian defenders have become casualties and quote
pursued a lot of shattered the Austrians and then he ran
into the typical problem any Russian commander runs into the
inability of the Russian army and government to get him enough stuff
fast enough for him to not slow down and have his offensive peter out. But
this maneuver had a domino like effect on the
war because verged on Falcon high now had a crisis on his hands
in the east where he was going to have to pull troops out of or done to go
save the Austrian Garion army which was disintegrating. And let's understand
the Ostrava Garion forces we told you about those those troops who were a
microcosm of the Empire as a whole who didn't want to be there. You had
whole units and I mean battalions regiments of Slavs
throw down their weapons and surrender to the Russians who by the way are Slavs to let us not forget
that this war began when a Slavic anational assassinated the
Austrian Garion heir to the throne right. And now we're asking Slavs to fight for
that empire. Many of them threw down their weapons they didn't want to die and they certainly didn't
want to die fighting for that empire and they certainly didn't want to die fighting for that empire against
their Slavic brethren in fact some of these units are said to have jumped
into the trenches with the Russians turned around and trained their guns back on the side they
had just defected from.
02:37:51
The Germans will manage to contain with their wonderful army the Russian threat
and they will halt Persil laws advance and even deal a
defeat to the Russians. But already the single minded focus
of Falcon high and overdone has been shattered. The Russians who put in such a
wonderful effort in the Bruce a lot of offensive and did such terrible damage to the Austrians
suffered immensely though while doing so well over a million
casualties suffered in the Bruce a lot of offensive which once again takes the
Russians and begins to ratchet up the level of
dissatisfaction. Getting them closer and closer to the breaking point you can
almost feel it in the air in one nine hundred sixteen a couple of these major powers
are within one good punch of going down in the spring of one thousand nine
hundred eighteen.
02:38:44
French military leader Joseph Gelfer tells his British counterpart that
France is one of those nations.
02:38:53
Within a good shot of going down remember.
02:38:56
You know by this time they had a month or two advert done the French suffered like two hundred thousand casualties
and at least this early two months in detention but nobody knows it yet of the
battle over done it looks like the German leader Falcon Hines planned to bleed the French army white is work
and that's why you can't take your eyes off the First World War They're like two prize fighters and just
when you think one guy has taken over the fight the other guy wins a good shot and somebodies knees buckle and the spring of one
thousand sixteen Joffrey tells Sir DOUGLAS HAIG the current commander of British forces
.
02:39:27
It's France whose knees have been buckled and he urges hade to start
that summer offensive that he's been planning for a long time on the river Somme early he
says if you don't started early the French army will cease to exist
.
02:39:42
You get so worked up we're told that he can only be consoled and calm down with
lots of eighteen forty brandy you know from the year eight hundred forty Jaffer
need a good brandy to calm down. None the less.
02:39:57
Hague speeds up the big offensive plan for the summer of
one thousand nine hundred eighteen discussed with all the other allies in late one nine hundred fifteen this is a long
term plan and he's going to launch it early this long term plan
results in the most controversial piece from the British
standpoint of this whole war maybe of British military history in
its entirety.
02:40:23
First of all DOUGLAS HAIG you have to understand that the field marshal that Jennifer is talking to
is the new guy just like most of the great powers in the First
World War by one thousand nine hundred sixteen they fired the person that got them into this mess right
. The war is terrible. Everybody's you know predictions were wrong. Nobody's fighting
it well so one by one all these countries are sacking the people that got them into this mess the Russians drop theirs the
Germans have Falcon I think as they got rid of an old cat while the war was you know in its early
phases.
02:40:54
The French still have to offer a crazily enough but you know that
reputation of the miracle of the Marne in one thousand fourteen will only carry you so far. He didn't
have long to go either. And the British in late nineteen fifteen sacks or John French like
we told in the last episode the guy who gets his gig is a guy named Douglas Haig. You'll be a
Field-Marshal. He's another one of these cavalry commanders.
02:41:16
It's always weird we have a war where cavalry becomes something that you keep off to the side and don't use because it
just gets killed and the horses are more important to move stuff because
crazily enough and we haven't talked enough about this and we'll get to it. Horses are
everywhere there's millions of them in this war and there are casualties too by the way
.
02:41:37
But all these cavalry commanders French Haig all these guys have these visions that we're going to break
the German line somewhere and then the cavalry is going to go rushing in the hole we create and go into the
back and it's it's the pre you know they're mocked armor
blitzkrieg version of that.
02:41:54
That's a strategy that's been used throughout history right. Goes back to you
know pre Alexander time smash the cavalry into the hole and roll up the lines. It's blitzkrieg before you
have motor vehicles and that's what these cavalry commanders are still dreaming of. Two years into the war
that puts the final nail into the coffin. The idea that this cavalry has any
offensive role to play.
02:42:16
Well you have to remember it still is the fastest moving thing on the battlefield in large numbers
you're starting to get Motor Vehicles but you know tough for the Motor Vehicles to handle terrain and they're very
unreliable horses are still the fastest mobility you have so they're valuable just for that
point alone they're very vulnerable though and the stories of dead
horses and the suffering of animals in the story is under
discussed nonetheless.
02:42:43
DOUGLAS HAIG the new British cavalry commander has at his disposal
some of the largest really the largest armies that Britain has ever had ready to go to war
because those volunteers that started joining when Lord Horatio
Kitchener you'll remember the British military leader from the beginning the war the guy who when you see his picture
screen is a nineteenth century man on it I mean you know with a giant
mustache from another era you could almost see him in a British red coat and he's the big face on the
recruiting poster telling Britain's patriotic Britons to sign up for king and country in a shilling.
02:43:18
There's another one of these pre-war early war generals and military leaders who's
been tarred by you know their conduct in the war they know they don't end up lookin so
genius like when the first world war gets done with you right. So as Kitchener's reputation is
starting to wane he's still got you know one real feather in his cap and that's that
those armies that he helped recruit in one thousand fourteen in one hundred fifteen and that he is
protected like a proud parent. You know don't send it to glibly don't some of the Western Front early
don't throw them in the meat grinder like everything else save them and really make use of their
patriotic contribution if people want to win the war let's put them in a position where they can do that.
He's done an admirable job of that about three weeks before those soldiers
known sometimes as the Kitchener armies or the Kitchener divisions after him are going to lose the
guy that was probably most responsible for seeing that they weren't used up
already in the first place.
02:44:13
Kitchener dies about three weeks before his legions are thrown into the fray.
02:44:18
It's a crazy story. I'm told that it is the same as
any one of those big modern death so.
02:44:25
So the same as a princess or a Lady Diana dying or a Winston Churchill
dying or J.F.K. dying in the United States you say to yourself you remember when that happened and Britons of the
period remember where they were when they heard that Lord Horatio Kitchener British military
leader and almost a demigod at least at the beginning of the war has gone
down at sea.
02:44:46
Well I don't warship on the way to Russia on some military mission and if
the boat goes down at night in a force nine gale
after hitting a mine and there are survivors who say take this with a
grain of salt that they saw Kitchener on the deck as the ship went down impassively
sort of accepting his fate and just standing on the deck as the ship goes you know beneath the waves
.
02:45:11
That really works for that whole nineteenth century military leader reputation doesn't it.
Nonetheless there have been conspiracy theories ever since about this believe it or not.
It's one of the great conspiracy. In a fountain and it's to come out of the first world war.
Nonetheless it meant that three weeks later when Kitchener's you know parentally
preserved armies are finally thrown into the fray. He's not there to have any say in it.
02:45:35
If the guy who is is Douglas Haig the new guy now known to
some in history as the butcher. So that should give you an idea of
what we're about to get into here on a wide variety of fronts.
02:45:50
This battle is one that Sir DOUGLAS HAIG have been preparing for since
the year before when the French told him that they were in danger of
disintegrating.
02:46:01
He's moving up something he's been working on for a while now and everyone knows it
.
02:46:07
The big nine hundred sixteen offensive is no secret heck it's in newspapers
basically meaning that when you find out all the ways that everybody knew this was coming
. It makes you wonder right again how intelligent it is to be launching something that
everybody knows is coming but it couldn't really be helped if you're going to fight at this
spot on the Somme river where the British and the French forces meet on the
western front where where the British line ends and the French line begins. That's where they're going to hold
this joint offensive maybe for the sole reason that that's where both armies are
. That would be really silly reason to attack the greatest
defenses on the western front which are the greatest offenses ever in the world right now these
are defenses that make the old Roman you know lines that you would cross
Europe with these giant wall I mean minor there's never been
defenses like this the Germans are at the point now where they're building creature comforts into
their.
02:47:05
Four or five line I mean they're putting wallpaper on and they've got electric lights and ventilation and they're
no running water I mean it's crazy that the trenches are in some cases all lined with wood
boards done with about as much fair on this as the Germans are known for.
02:47:19
These are huge modern fortifications in some sense and these Germans on the other side of this line
where the French and the British are thinking about launching this big nine hundred sixteen offensive have bunkers there are
thirty and forty feet underground cut into the chalk of these
hills that the Germans occupy. They are looking down
for months as the British load up all the stuff you now need for a
modern offensive all that stuff we said that the Germans needed it for done.
02:47:47
The British need at the song right the French to you by the way they've laid five
railroad lines you know new tracks to the battlefield because that's how often and
how many trains are going to be running just unloading stuff for months
. Three million shells millions of tons of food I
mean crazy I'm an engineering corps that are building things you know full on permanent
structures while the Germans watch the whole thing and plan for it and train for it.
They're having drills every day and how quickly can we get up from our underground bunker and get up to the
trench and man the machine guns before the British soldiers are on top of us right. Everybody knows this is coming
and everybody knows how it's going to be fought. The British take these armies with many
many many green troops that have never been in a battle puts them in the trenches opposite
these German lines.
02:48:37
Again a position so strong that Winston Churchill says
it was quote undoubtedly the strongest and most perfectly defended position in the
world and quote and start
bombarding it with artillery starts June twenty fourth one thousand six hundred
early by the way a lot of artillery.
02:49:02
As a matter of fact the Somme becomes one of about four or five First World War battles
that compete for like the Guinness Book of World Records for the biggest
largest wurst more intense most numerous you know Picture category artillery
bombardment of the war.
02:49:19
There are you know as a history geek I would be arguing it with my other history geek friends and and it's always about
criteria right are we talking about the largest number of shells fought through an entire battle you know
forty sixty million ever done maybe. Or are we talking about the most number of shells used in the
initial part of the battle or the most number of shells dropped in the shortest period of time or the
smallest space I mean there's literally a measurement of how many tons of shells
fell on each square meter of these battlefields and by the way if you use that as your
criterion for Don is the worst artillery bombardment in
history.
02:49:54
Nonetheless the fact that the Somme is in this argument shows you the level of artillery we're
talking about here.
02:50:00
And when it opens up on the twenty fourth It's it's incredible in its
volume but the Germans laugh a little when it's a huge bombardment
.
02:50:10
But the Germans are mostly underground and under cover and most of the bombardment is once
again. Shrapnel shells sounds like a little teeny point doesn't it from a battle
to turn on but had those shells been high explosive instead or maybe even
gas. This battle may go another direction. And every historian brings up that the
shrapnel was pretty much pointless.
02:50:33
It's Remember it's like a giant hand grenade or shotgun shell exploding in the air and all these little pellets hit the
ground it's devastating to infantry out in the open but the Germans run in the open right.
02:50:42
In addition the artillery is meant to do more than just kill Germans. The artillery
has to clear the battlefield of all the stuff that's there is defences
so that the troops on the British side can actually get to the German trenches. It's full of barbed
wire no man's land.
02:51:00
Another trench then another no man's land then another trench. The trenches are all going
uphill and these no man's land areas besides being filled with concrete bunkers and everything we
told you about before the killing zones. They have yards of barbed wires
thick as your finger.
02:51:17
It's a physical impediment. It has to be overcome by the generals the generals have figured
out in their minds that an artillery barrage of this you know caliber the amounts we're
talking about here the barbed wire will just explode into pieces. It will not be an impediment when
the artillery barrage is over except the shrapnel shells don't really affect it.
02:51:37
Now there was a benefit to the artillery barrage though as we've quoted
before Napoleon has this great line that comes in handy all the time that quantity has a quality
all its own and the sheer intensity of this barrage began to have an effect on the
Germans even though they were physically protected from being you know injured by it. It
began to play on them first of all. They know they've got something really nasty
awaiting them in their future. You try to put yourself in their shoes. OK they
know that when this artillery barrage is over the British are going to be on them. They've been
training for this moment for months right run up the stairs How quickly can you get you know in front of the machine gun
in time to stop the British from taking over your trench. So they're going to either be killed or
be grievously wounded. See a friend killed or wounded or have to kill somebody they're going to have
a really nasty day in their very near future.
02:52:28
In the mean time you're going to have one of the greatest artillery barrages in history going on
around you. Ernst Junger who will be at this battlefield in about a month and C. A an
artillery barrage that is not as bad as this one. He will compare it to the roar
of the ocean.
02:52:45
He will say that there are no individual sounds and he says it will it will achieve the
times and last for hours. A demented intensity that he says when it
eventually calms down calms down to mere drama fire
which is you know the sound of of a drum roll. That's how fast the artillery shells are dropping he says. Even when
it's the drum roll you can't pick out any individual explosions it's just one big loud sound
but the demented fury that it reaches sometimes blows that away literally and
that's the kind of intensity these soldiers are living with knowing that they've got this horrible
moment in their future and it goes on for days. And we're told that the German
soldiers who were kind of laughing at the fact that the British were using like seventy percent shrapnel shells
on them aren't laughing anymore.
02:53:33
They're getting tired and stressed and you know put yourself in the position of just not sleeping for five days
and now you know I had all the other things on top of that. So there is an effect that
this artillery is having on the Germans all right about it. The British commander
this is part of the controversy. We are told that there were lots of people saying that this
artillery barrage was going to make this a cakewalk and you've heard that before right. Don't
all these battles begin to sound alike isn't there repetitiveness to the story. If there
is you're getting the right feeling out of it because that's how you know it's
always been played and it seems like the people at the time felt too.
02:54:10
Oh no not again. Haven't we seen this movie before the generals seem to always just
want more stuff give us more artillery give us more men give us deeper defenses you know will fix the
situation. So here's the biggest artillery barrage the British have ever launched. They shoot off
two million shells in no time and just for comparison purposes one hundred years before this
time at the Battle of Waterloo Napoleon is estimated to have about twenty thousand cannon balls
with the French army. So you know two million shells in a week or two versus twenty thousand.
It's it's crazy the level of artillery we're going to see here and it it lulls
the commanders into this sense that it's going to accomplish so much more than it does.
It's the soldiers on the ground know that produce the you know historical reminders
that most of them were too realistic and too savvy and too cynical to buy into any of that rosy
thinking that generals could afford to be rosy. The guys on the ground going in for example the
first wave of this assault that the Germans have been waiting for you for
months. They know better and you can tell because they are absolutely
heartbreaking. Last Letters Home that have made it into the history books
Peter Hart's wonderful book on the Great War has one of these letters from
a Captain Charles may fight in the twenty second Manchester regiment and he's writing
to his wife right before he goes over the top in this battle.
And again imagine how it affects
you to be in the position of writing a letter like this I always think that that's that's a
permanent scar on your soul even if you get the proverbial reprieve from the
governor right from Captain Charles May the twenty second Manchester regiment
who's about to go over the top on the first day of the psalm and writes his wife quote.
02:55:59
I must not allow myself to dwell on the personal. There's no room for it here.
Also it is demoralizing but I do not want to die. Not that I
mind for myself if it be that I am to go I'm ready but the thought that I may never
see you or our darling baby again turns my bowels to water. I
cannot think of it with even the semblance of equanimity. My one consolation is the happiness
that's been ours also. My conscience is clear that I've always tried to make life a joy
to you. I know at least that if I go you will not want. That is
something but it is the thought that we may be cut off from one another which is so terrible
and that our baby may grow up without my knowing her and without her knowing
me.
02:56:43
It's difficult to face and I know your life without me would be a dull blank. You
must never let it become wholly so for to you will be left the greatest charge in all the
world. The upbringing of our baby. God bless that child she's the hope of life to
me my darling our of our it may be that you will only have to read these
lines as ones of passing interest on the other hand they may well be my
last message to you if they are you know through all your life that I loved you and
baby with all my heart and soul and that you too sweet things were just all the world
to me. I pray God I may do my duty for I know that whatever that may
entail you would not have it otherwise.
02:57:25
End quote.
02:57:27
And Peter Hart with remarkable sensitivity adds a postscript and says
quote Charles may the loving husband of Bessie Mae and father to his baby
Pauline would indeed be killed the next day he is buried in the dance a
galley British cemetery. Small scale tragedies litter the history of war
.
02:57:46
Sad reminders that the necessities of the war ruin the lives of millions
and quote It's as we said all this pain
from this war are like pebbles dropped in water and the ripples outward affect the
rest of these societies when you have millions of people impacted like this the ripple effect
affects tens or maybe even hundreds of millions of people.
For a while you know the song becomes one of these pebbles that's like ground zero for
a huge ripple effect that will affect Britain to this
day.
02:58:23
I try to think about what mental state I would be in after writing a letter like
that. And when you think about millions of people young
people mostly being in situations where they're writing a letter like that
how does that change you. I mean there are going to be noticeable
changes in this generation of people in the four years during this first World
War I have been comparing this period to historical estuary right where one generation in
another generation sort of mingle the old world in the New World
but maybe it's more of a wormhole through time.
02:59:01
And when this nineteenth century group of people you know transitions through to the twentieth
century it's not going to make it intact it's going to suffer damage on the way
through it's like a birthing process to the modern era. And that can be bloody and painful and potentially
fatal too.
02:59:19
The British have thought throughout this war that they've taken large casualties
battles nine hundred fifteen places like the liberally. Those are large casualties for the British which
are a traditionally naval power and employing relatively by Continental standards
small armies. This is the first time they've had a large enough army to
suffer the kind of casualties that some nations like the French or the Germans or the Russians have been
suffering this whole time. On July first one thousand sixteen
. The shelling subsides the whistles blow and these troops
in the morning are told to get out of their trenches and head across into No Man's Land
and continued to take the German defenses. Then this is where
they find out that the assumptions made in the planning stages of this
conflict haven't come to pass the way the military experts assumed they
would.
03:00:14
And because of that British forces on the very first day
of the battle of the Somme will suffer sixty thousand casualties
twenty thousand dead.
03:00:27
There's never been a day like it in British history and now all of a sudden they can understand how the
French felt. You know on that August day in one thousand fourteen when they suffered twenty two
thousand dead in an afternoon.
03:00:40
These are thoroughly modern casualties and to people not accustomed to them they are stunning
. And the fingers start pointing immediately. What the heck happened
. A generation of people who felt this viscerally have kept
this debate going and it continues between historians even today.
03:00:58
What the hell happened. Who's responsible for this.
03:01:03
What happened to the troops when they got out of the trenches only to find that in most areas
the assumption that this artillery would smash up the wire wasn't true and the
wire was there it was a physical impediment in no man's land
trapping troops in the open so they could be raked by machine gun fire
artillery fire too but mainly machine gun fire from those Germans who were not as badly affected
by the artillery either as the planners had assumed they would be.
03:01:33
Tens of thousands of British soldiers are being mowed down all the time one German on the
other side of this human tragedy at the Battle of the Somme on the first day is quoted in
in passing in his book All the Kaiser's men. And he says quote The leading
wave of British troops was now halfway across No Man's Land.
03:01:51
Get ready was passed along our front and heads appeared over each shell crater
just final positions were taken up for the best view and machine guns mounted firmly in place
.
03:02:02
A moment later when the first British line was within one hundred yards the rattle of machine gun and
rifle fire broke out along our whole line of shell holes followed soon after by
deadly accurate shell fire.
03:02:13
The advance rapidly crumbled under this hail of shell and bullets all along the line
men could be seen throwing up their arms and collapsing never to move again. The
extended lines though badly shaken with many gaps now came on all the faster
. Instead of a leisurely walk they covered the ground in short rushes at the double and within a few
minutes the leading troops had advanced to within a stone's throw of our front trench
again and again in the extended lines of British infantry broke against the German defence like waves
against a cliff only to be beaten back. It was an amazing spectacle of an
example gallantry courage and Bulldog determination on both sides
and quote.
03:02:54
Now those are the troops who made it through the wire. There were places where gaps had been
blown in the wire. The problem was is the troops would congregate at those gaps because they're the only
way to the other side and then get stuck in Giant back up just as a small stream
of troops made it through the corridor and those those back ups in those globs of soldiers just
waiting for their chance to get through the cord or the wire would be mowed down by shellfire and machine gun
fire.
03:03:20
This day has so affected the British in fact it's their version of or done
what they've done is to the French soul the Psalmist of the British one and it has divided
historians ever since and you can see normally comments to date rather
cold sometimes British historians lose their head over this subject. I mean
John Keegan who as I've said is not my favorite but but the two World Wars
I think are are his strong point.
03:03:46
And you can tell he's a guy who's hung out with some of the enlisted troops that were
trapped that day at the Somme because they're continually anger
and incredulously about this whole thing has rubbed off on him and by the way if
you were trapped there like a sitting duck on you know an open plane in no
man's land watching your buddies get blown to bits and you're freaking out you would be thinking too who the hell put me
here who's worse. It's a bill for this if I ever get out of these heads will roll.
03:04:14
And of course most of these British troops at this battle are not of a class and very society they
could have made much of a fuss but they got loyal defenders who will when this
is over.
03:04:25
Keegan's one of them by the way you think you can just feel the anger
when he writes quote in all the British had lost about sixty
thousand one hundred twenty one thousand have been killed most in the first hour of the
attack. Perhaps the first minutes the trenches wrote Robert KY fifty years
later. Now he's quoting Robert Key quote where the concentration camps of the First
World War now Keegan talks again.
03:04:52
And though the analogy is what an academic reviewer would call an historical there
is something Treblinka like about almost all accounts of the first of July
about these long Di Sila lines of young men shot only uniformed
heavily burdened numbered about their necks to identify after they were killed.
Plodding forward across a featureless landscape to their own extermination inside
the barbed wire accounts of the song. He writes producing the readers an audience
is much the same range of emotions as do descriptions of the running of Auschwitz
. Guilty fascination incredulity horror disgust pity
and anger.
03:05:32
End quote. And then he goes on to say that this is not just from the
peaceniks and tender hearted out there.
03:05:41
Not just from the military historians where you get it from here but he goes but from the professional troops
too.
03:05:48
He says quote anger is the response which the story of the song most commonly
evokes among professionals meaning soldiers. Why did the commanders not do something about it.
Why did they let the attack go on. Why did they not stop one battalion following the wake
of another to join it in death.
03:06:05
End quote.
03:06:07
He then goes on to say that some tell us were stopped but that's one of the things that so many people got angry about
is that once you saw for example that the wire was still there why did you
let more lines of troops get up out of the trenches and follow the people who just got
destroyed in front of them.
03:06:25
This is how someone like Haig gets a reputation for a
butcher.
03:06:32
Now I've gone out of my way in this program I think you probably notice too. In one thousand
fifteen cut these general slack because they're learning right this is all new
stuff and until you experiment a little you know how to use it. You don't know you know what it can
do but at what point can you start holding these people accountable
for not learning.
03:06:55
There was a great line from the civilian political leader
Germany a guy named Desmond holding and he was telling the
Kaiser by the end of nine hundred sixteen he's talking about Falcon nine here the German military leader but it
could equally apply to a lot of military leaders in this war especially
at this time.
03:07:15
He asked the Kaiser quote where does incompetency end and
criminality begin.
03:07:22
End quote.
03:07:24
How many lives are you allowed to lose experimenting before you learn your lessons. But there are a
great many military historians today who are trying once again to say listen that's what they're
doing. We're still holding them to too high a standard too much hindsight
going on here. Here's what Peter Hart writes quote.
03:07:42
For many people the Somme and the equally ugly ver done have come to symbolize the
Great War futile battles fought with other peoples lives by incompetent and
uncaring generals in particular for the British he says the disaster of the first of
July on the Somme has become the sole prism through which the conduct of the whole of the great
war has been viewed. There is no light and shade here just a dark
despair at the numbing horror of the teeming casualties. Explanations of what
went wrong and why they are thrust aside indeed in the past subdued
references to a quote unquote learning curve for the generals had been
seen as an insult to the dead. There remains a widespread belief he writes that there must have
been a better way. Something else could or should have been done. Someone must be
blamed. Much of this opprobrium has fallen on the head of Douglas Haig who has at
times been reviled as a mass murderer. Yet this was the inevitable price of
engaging in continental warfare on the main field of battle.
03:08:42
Against the primary enemy France was well accustomed to the pain of continental warfare.
But for Britain it was a new experience. Germany had no exposed flanks just the
imposing fortifications of the western front defending their one thousand and fourteen gains
wrested from France and Belgium.
03:08:58
Unfortunately for all their tactical improvement and technical innovations the British were just
simply not able to breach those defenses or kill sufficient Germans or even in
concert with the French at for done to bring Germany to its knees
and quote.
03:09:15
It also makes you wonder a little about the quality of the human beings
who are commanding these endeavors who are making these plans and who are
watching all these people die and be wounded because of
these plans in other words how bad does the general feel the next day. Well
it's not something you can easily figure out.
03:09:36
Again John Keegan seems to be so angry at the field marshal here.
Still for this conflict that he he he writes an answer to that
question kind of what kind of man do you have to be to suffer those kind of casualties and the next day think about
continuing.
03:09:53
KAGAN writes quote Haig whom his contemporaries found difficult to know
has become today in the name of the successful generals of the First World War
those who did not crack outright or decline gradually into pessimism were a
hard lot as they had to be with the casualty figures accumulating on their desk
some nonetheless managed to combine toughness of mind with some striking human
characteristic.
03:10:18
For he says imperturbability Hinde in burgh
gravity fire come out all certainty
.
03:10:28
Hague he says in whose public manner and private diaries no concern for
human suffering was or is discernible compensated for his
aloofness with nothing whatsoever of the common touch. He seemed to move through the
horrors of the First World War as if guided by some inner voice speaking of
a higher purpose and a personal destiny that we now know he says was
not just appearance.
03:10:53
Haig was a devoted to both of spiritualist practices and a fundamentalist religion.
As a young officer he had taken to attending seances where the medium put him in
touch with Napoleon as commander in chief he fell under the influence of a Presbyterian
chaplain whose sermons confirmed him in his belief that he was in direct
communication with God and had a major part to play in a divine plan for the
world. His own simple religion Keegan says he was convinced was
shared by his soldiers who were inspired thereby to bear the dangers and
sufferings which were their part of the war.
03:11:29
He was directing. End quote. Wow
.
03:11:35
Welcome to the controversy and the heat the battle of the Somme has
generated amongst those who write about it but justifiably so I think.
03:11:47
I'm truthfully I think there were military people who were certainly willing to forgive
Douglas Haig for suffering sixty thousand casualties on the first day of the battle of the Somme
. If he'd inflicted something like sixty thousand on the Germans.
03:12:01
Instead the British suffer those kind of casualties in the German casualties may have been as low
as six thousand and twelve thousand is the high number you sometimes see
split the difference say eight thousand so take sixty give you get your face ripped
off.
03:12:17
Not exactly the position you want your brand new general the new blood the person is going to bring
a new sense of success to the war on the Western front of a sudden Douglas
Hagan look a whole lot better than the people who came before him.
03:12:31
Heck John French could have just suffered sixty thousand casualties on the first day of the Somme right. The previous
commander.
03:12:38
Now to put those numbers in perspective because I was at the do this for myself
. Sixty thousand as an amorphous number what does that compare to if that is down at the
British for one hundred one years by the Battle of the Psalms time had been talking about a
horrible day they'd suffered you know finishing off Napoleon at Waterloo right in eight hundred
fifteen when the Bolian killed eighty four hundred British soldiers eighty four
hundred compared to twenty or twenty one or nineteen thousand that's a huge difference right
.
03:13:08
But how about the Second World War You always think of the Second World War as being worse than the first
when the British and Americans landed on the beaches of Normandy on June sixth one hundred
forty four for the famous D.-Day landings and then pushed inland a not enough
attention paid to keep part of that whole thing you know winding up the bridge and it was
hard combat it was historically hard combat. But it took the British and the Americans
combined twenty days to reach twenty thousand
casualties.
03:13:37
So it took them twenty days combined British and Americans to reach one
third of the amount of casualties the British alone suffered on the first day of the battle of the
song. That's wild.
03:13:49
That's crazy.
03:13:51
And it sounds like we're done doesn't it. Those numbers start to sound like what the French are suffering that
horrible you know battle to bleed their army white.
03:14:01
Well David Frum can and his book A Peace to End All Peace quotes Norman Stone
about you know how large these battles were compared to what the people in Europe were
used to and he says quote It has been estimated that the total of
military and civilian casualties in all of Europe's
domestic and international conflicts in one hundred years between eighteen
fifteen and nineteen fifteen was no greater than a single
day's combat losses in any of the great battles of one thousand nine hundred eighteen
.
03:14:35
End quote.
03:14:37
That's an incredible statistic when you think of all of the battles that Europeans fought in
Europe and in colonies and all of that put together and all the
European countries for one hundred years doesn't equal one of the bad
days ever done or the Somme.
03:14:56
For societies that could handle these kind of casualties were remarkable but they
took their toll.
03:15:02
As you might imagine by the time five months of the song
is over you have another million casualties basically in five months.
03:15:12
So overdone gives you roughly about a million and the psalm gives you
roughly about a million all at the same time
.
03:15:22
The burn rate on the Western Front is horrifying in one thousand nine hundred eighteen.
03:15:26
And remember all of these battles are like a lot of little little battles
sort of lumped together at the Somme for example the Germans will
counterattack in that five month period more than three hundred times a ton of those
counterattacks in ancient times would have been a battle all by itself right. Part of the reason why it's
so hard to follow the nature of these battles.
03:15:49
Churchill has an overall description that is just horrifying of
a conceptual view of this that makes you understand what was really going on. If you could
view it sort of from space and he writes about both the song and verse done.
03:16:04
Quote The anatomy of the battles of are done in the psalm was the
same a battlefield had been selected around this battlefield walls were
built double triple quadruple of enormous cannon behind
these railways were constructed to feed them and mountains or shells were built up
. All this was the work of months. Thus the battle field was completely encircled
by thousands of guns of all sizes and a wide oval space prepared in their
midst through this awful arena. All the divisions of each army
battered ceaselessly by the enveloping artillery were made to pass in
succession as if they were in the teeth of interlocking cogwheels grinding
each other. As for month after month he writes the ceaseless cannonade
continued at its utmost intensity and month after month the gallant
divisions of heroic human beings were torn to pieces in this terrible
rotation. Then came the winter pouring down rain from the sky to clogged
the feet of men and drawing veils of mist before the hawk eyes of their
artillery the arena as used to happen in the coliseum in those miniature Roman
days was flooded with water a vast sea of and sanguine mud
churned by thousands of the poles by hundreds of thousands of men and millions
of shells replaced the blasted dust. Still the struggle
continued still the remorseless wheels revolved still the
auditorium of artillery roared. At last the legs of men could no
longer move. They wallowed and floundered helplessly in the slime. Their food and
ammunition lagged behind them along the smashed and choked roadways
and cold.
03:17:51
I keep quoting Churchill because wasn't that positively
Tolkien esque by the way there are people who
you know say that Tolkien's experiences with the First World War influenced
his way of writing and thinking.
03:18:07
But if it did he would have been just one of the millions of other people that had their outlook
transformed by this conflict and how could you not.
03:18:17
As we said you imagine writing that last letter home where it's essentially a goodbye
letter that can change you can't it I don't know a lot of people who've had terminal illnesses
had months to know that death was in their near future. It often
changes them. It often creates this introspective mood where all of a
sudden they're focusing on subjects that people don't usually spend
hour after hour day after day focusing on but it's right in front of the right if you have terminal
cancer. It's going to be on your mind and the thinking about
it changes you. What if you had a terminal disease and all of a sudden at the last minute the
doctors figured out a way to cure you when you were dragged back from the brink. But you'd spend a couple of months
thinking intensely about life and death and the meaning of things and what
you would have done differently and all these really heavy duty thoughts that most people can only stand to
think about in short little burst Usually there are exceptions.
03:19:16
Now imagine millions of people during this nine hundred fourteen one
thousand nine hundred period who would have found themselves in a similar sort of a
situation.
03:19:27
Pretty much sure they were going to die in the near future or be horribly disfigured thinking about the
heaviest of subjects writing letters home to loved ones saying you know I'm going to miss not
knowing my baby daughter and then some of them getting a reprieve
and getting a chance to live this life they were all but writing off during the
worst of these war experiences.
03:19:49
That is a searing personal experience that millions of
individual persons went through. How does that not change the
society when they go home.
03:20:01
And you know one of the things about battles especially these First World War battles is they're so
dark aren't they and they're so industrial and they're so unbelievably horrifying the
charnel house zombie graveyard feel of the battlefield in the First World War
make that particularly you know mind bending.
03:20:20
You'll see a lot of art around the first world war that shows corpses
decaying and it's not so you feel sympathy with the dead figure. It's
so that you understand what it was like for those people living amongst all those decaying
corpses to deal with that reality. Mind bending battles mind bending enough right
. You had all the incredible artillery which is disorienting as as all
get out and then throw in bodies and pieces of bodies everywhere when you're living as we've said
it's a unique experience.
03:20:52
It's a form of hell.
03:20:55
And yet to someone like yours truly that creates the
circumstances where human
brotherly love appears. So like a light in the
darkness part of why battles are interesting to study is because as
you probably figured out you can see the worst of human behavior and man's inhumanity to
man in them.
03:21:19
But you can also see these pieces of humanity slip through
and when they do they are all the more bright and noticeable because they're
happening in hell as opposed to something that happens in your neighborhood right little piece of humanity
not that surprising in your neighborhood. Probably make your day a little brighter. A piece of humanity in the
hell of these battlefields has a rejuvenating effect for
ones feel about man.
03:21:47
Take for example the sacrifice.
03:21:50
These no man's land mines in between the fighting lines of the
two sides on the Western Front created something that the battles have had forever in the Second World War You've had
these cross roads for example was a machine gunner had set up and now all of a sudden you know it was death
to cross this crossroads but the Western Front is hundreds of miles of
trench lines all of them with this dead zone in between and on the really big
fronts where a lot was happening there was tons of drama in those dead
zones. Things would happen that would challenge men's more
ality. And what you're willing to do a perfect example is in the battle of the
Somme when the sixty thousand casualties and a lot of other casualties over the
course of that battle are happening. The Germans are often taking pity on their
fellow human beings and the British right about it. I mean when these
British attacks would break against the German defenses and the wounded would start
back toward the safety of their own trenches grabbing even worse wounded people with them and trying
to under machine gun and artillery fire get back to their own trenches. A lot of times these
Germans would just stop shooting.
03:23:01
I'm the first terrible day.
03:23:03
There were often times where the machine gunners and the officers would just say Stop let me get back to the
human thing to do right. On the other hand if they had just machine gun them that
winda surprised anybody either.
03:23:15
But what do you do now about those people who are stuck out there
in no man's land after the attack is over. There are all sorts of stories about
people who will simply if they can drag themselves to the nearest shell hole or wrap
themselves up in the TARP they keep to keep the rain out. You know open up a Bible and just die
in the shell holes when they don't they can often have a terrible
effect on the men in the trenches on both sides. The Apaches in the American
Southwest used to be able to make such good use of hostages and if you
threaten to torture a hostage or you did torture a hostage you could get all kinds of
concessions from the other side. Well there are hostages that fate is
holding in the middle of those no man's land areas. And what do you do when one of them
starts asking for help and they're basically calling to you and your buddies
from no man's land.
03:24:10
If you want to see the heroism and the sacrifice that human beings can
show in in these hellish situations. Read the accounts over and over about how
men dealt with the screams for help from no man's land.
03:24:26
A perfect example of the kind of moral dilemmas and self-sacrifice that these
situations you know create is the story that Robert Graves tells in
Goodbye all that when he was serving at the Somme on the western front and a soldier named
Samson gets hit in the wave before Graves's wave goes over the
top so Graves is just getting ready for this intense experience himself and going over the top of the trench
with other human beings right into the teeth of machine gun fire and all of a sudden you hear the sound of
somebody from the last attack from no man's land you know where it's
death to stand up and move around asking for help or screaming
out and here's what Graves writes Remember he's he's in the state himself thinking OK I've got it.
03:25:11
Walk in the machine gun fire and I've just seen all these other people die in front of me quote my
mouth was dry my eyes out of focus and my legs quaking under me.
03:25:21
I found a water bottle full of rum and drank about half a pint. It quieted me and my head
remained clear. Samson lay groaning about twenty yards beyond the front
trench several attempts were made to rescue him he'd been very badly hit.
03:25:35
Three men got killed in those attempts. Two officers and two men wounded in the
end. His own orderly managed to crawl out to him. Sampson waved him back
saying he was riddled through and not worth rescuing.
03:25:48
He sent his apologies to the company for making such a noise and quote
In other words this guy is out there screaming and it's so driving his own comrades
crazy that they keep running out there to do something and everyone runs out there to do
something gets killed.
03:26:04
At what point if you're the wounded person do you try to just stop making
noise so that they don't keep trying to help you out of sympathy when you probably are dying anyway
and now you've lost three people or more simply trying to you know prevent the inevitable
you're going through so. At night when we were told the no
man's land area comes to life and you know where it appears deserted
during the daytime at night the trench patrols go out the people who you know fix the
barbed wire the intelligence folks the people conducting trench raids I
mean supposedly there's a lot of activity in the dark even though star shells light up the sky all the
time at dark grays and his unit
moves out to go clear of any wounded in front of their trenches and he writes quote At
dusk we all went out to get the wounded leaving only sentries in the line. The first dead
body I came upon was Sampson's hit in seventeen places. I found that he'd
forced his knuckles into his mouth to stop himself crying out and attracting any more men to their
death.
03:27:08
End quote.
03:27:11
So this poor man out there hit seventeen times suffering horribly unable to
keep from crying out.
03:27:17
Can't stand the thought of attracting any more men to rescue him and
dies with his hand in his mouth to keep from crying I mean it it
it's it's the beauty that finds its way into the horrific ness of
this war. If you're that person's parent there's nothing that consoles you that doesn't make you feel any better
but as a human being you look at that and say there's something about that man sacrifice that's
beautiful. Now graves tells another story which not only
shows the heroism and the beauty of one of his compatriots but the same
sort of an attitude on the part of the people the British start where the bad guys.
03:27:56
The Germans as we said the Germans have been holding their fire quite a bit you know during this battle.
And you see it on the French side of the British side too I mean this is not abnormal.
It's a little bit like that Christmas truce we talked about in the one nine hundred fourteen
error of this war were spontaneously troops got up and sort of gave each
other a little Christmas love in between the showings right.
03:28:20
You see this humanity appear even in this Hal graves talks about.
03:28:26
Another soldier in no man's land who wakes up you know seemingly
dead and then all of a sudden is crying for help. And when this happens every
man in his trench feels like he's going through some sort of a moral
test. And one man passes it with flying colors.
03:28:44
Graves writes quote on the morning of the twenty seventh a
cry arose from no man's land a wounded soldier of the Middlesex unit had
recovered consciousness after two days. He lay close to the German wire our
man heard it and looked at each other. We had a tender hearted Lance Corporal named
Baxter he was the man to boil up a special Dixie for the sentries of his section when they
came off duty. Made him a little soup pretty as soon as he heard the wounded Middlesex
man. He ran along the trench calling for a volunteer to help fetch him in. Of
course no one would go. It was death to put one's head over the parapet when he
came running to ask me. I excused myself as being the only officer in the company I would
come out with him at dusk.
03:29:29
I said not now. So he went alone. He jumped quickly over the
parapet and then strolled across No Man's Land waving a handkerchief. The
Germans fire to frighten him but since he persisted they let him come close.
Baxter continued toward them and when he got to the Middlesex a man stopped
and pointed to show the Germans what he was asked meaning what he was up to.
03:29:52
Then he dressed the man's wounds gave him a drink of rum and some biscuit that he had with him
and promised to be back again at nightfall. He did come back. Graves writes with a
stretcher party and the man eventually recovered. I recommended Baxter for the Victoria
Cross being the only officer who would witness the action but the authorities thought it worth no more than a
distinguished conduct medal and quote sounds worthy of
a Victoria Cross to me.
03:30:19
And that's one of those incidents where you see the opposite of man's inhumanity to
man in an environment designed to foster the former
.
03:30:29
It stands out all the more doesn't it.
03:30:32
That Baxter could have easily been mowed down and if you don't think it happens remember three people
were mowed down trying to save that wounded Samson character in the first graves story
. I can't help but wonder how my generation would handle
what these people were forced to do you think of the first day on the battle of the Somme.
Think of yourself in the second wave or the third wave
and you hear all this stuff from the officers about all the artillery will destroy everybody that nobody be
left alive. And then the first wave in front of you units that you know go over the
top and don't even get near their objective before they're cut to ribbons. It's an absolute
catastrophe and screw up and everybody can see it happening. And then they
turn into the next wave maybe that's not you maybe you're in the third and tell them to go do the same
thing and they doing the same thing happens right. It's suicide. Now they turn to
you and they say OK it's your unit's turn what do you do. Forget
cowardice for a second because there are people who simply ran away or whose nerves
failed him or whatever.
03:31:36
This is not a question of you know what could you do. Physically this
is a question of what would you do. So
I think a lot of us would think to ourselves there's no way
I'm surviving going out on to that battlefield.
03:31:54
But if this officer wasn't here telling me to do this and my buddies and I just sort of decided
all together we're not doing this. Maybe something would change you know one of the first
war novels to come out of the First World War actually came out during the First World War for
French name Henri barbless and he wrote something where he as
a soldier had served already he was a disabled veteran he wrote this piece while the war was still
going on and it's surprisingly anti-war for the government to put up with it. During the
conflict and he implied that the soldiers on both sides the common soldiers
should just agree with each other that they're not going to fight anymore. You know what if they gave a war and no one
came right what if the soldiers on both sides say the government can tell us to fight without fighting anymore
. And Barbara said that in the book that truthfully the only people who really understood what the
French soldier and a British soldier were going through in these hellish conditions where the
German soldiers on the other side of the no man's land living under the exact same
hellish conditions. When the Germans don't fire on the British who are
getting their wounded and a lot of time just because there's this unwritten deal that says
I'm going to leave you alone right now to get your wounded people out of there in the hopes that when it's my
wounded people in No Man's Land and I'm trying to get them out of there you'll let me.
03:33:16
One of the real phenomenons of this war is the fact that when left
alone a lot of soldiers on both sides decided to adopt what's what's
officially known as a live and let live attitude in this war and it was it was
common everywhere but the Western Front more than any other where for example
soldiers would be required and they hated this job to go out at night
and put more barbed wire up in the middle of a no man's land so you sneak out because it's dark and
you bring wire with you and wire cutters and all these things you have to go hang new wire.
03:33:49
It's an extremely dangerous job and both sides hated it right. So a lot of times they
just wouldn't shoot at the other people who were putting wire. Now the officers hated
this and one of the big scandals was after the Christmas Truce the
so-called Christmas truce in one thousand fourteen when both sides would fraternize the officers had to make all these
you know arrangements so that next Christmas nothing like this happened again and the men preserved a proper
fighting spirit would be the way most of these militaries would phrase it but the troops often
found a lot more to like about each other than their own officers.
03:34:24
Corporal Louis Brock toss in the French army writes about this incident where a flood
occurs and all of a sudden the trenches on both sides of no man's land have to
clear and how you have one of those moments where you just look at your enemy and he looks at you and you
realize this sucks.
03:34:41
And who put us into this mess and why are we doing this and he almost writes you know Marcos is a
socialist like a lot of these troops in the trenches are so he has a worldview that kind of
sees the upper classes the corporate groups and all that is the problem and
that the average soldiers in the trenches were all just kind of common workers being exploited by the
man and he writes about this famous flood that he
experiences and what it does and how it freaks out.
03:35:08
You know in his mind of the upper classes in the officer corps that all of a sudden you know both
sides in this combat are starting to have some sympathy for each other and he writes
quote.
03:35:20
But one night when the rain came down in torrents the tide invaded our dugout
and cascaded down both sets of steps at the height of the storm. Some of the
men had to devote all their efforts to building a dam which the water then broke through in
three or four places. We spent the rest of the night battling the floodwaters. The next
day December tenth at many places along the front line the soldiers had to come out of their
trenches so as not to drown. The Germans had to do the same. We therefore had
the singular spectacle of the two enemy armies facing each other without
firing a shot. Our common sufferings brought our hearts together
melted the hatreds nurtured sympathy between strangers and
adversaries those who deny it are ignoring human psychology. Frenchmen and
Germans he writes looked at each other and saw that they were all men no different from
one another. They smiled exchanged comments hands reached out and
grasped. We shared tobacco a canteen of coffee or wine if
only we spoke the same language. One day he writes a huge
devil of a German stood up on a mound and gave a speech which only the Germans could understand word
for word. But everyone knew what it meant because he smashed his rifle on a tree
stump breaking it into in a gesture of anger applause broke out on both
sides and the international was sunk.
03:36:43
He says that's the national anthem of the socialist cause I guess you could say the workers' colony.
03:36:49
He says quote well if only you'd been there. Mad Kings bloody
generals fanatical ministers jingoistic journalists rear
echelon Patriots to contemplate the sublime spectacle. But it wasn't
enough. He says that the soldiers refused to fight one another. What was needed was for them to
turn back on the monsters who were pushing them one against the other and to cut them down like
wild beasts for not having done so. How much longer would the killing go on
. Meanwhile he says are big shot leaders were in a fury or what
in the Lord's name would happen if the soldiers refused to kill each other our artillery men
received orders to fire on any assemblies of men which were pointed out to them and to mow
down indiscriminately both Frenchmen and Germans. Just like when in ancient circuses
they slaughtered wild beasts who were too intelligent to tear each other's throats out and devour
each other. Furthermore he says once the From line was established again for better
or worse it was forbidden under penalty of death to leave the trench. Any act of
familiarity with the Germans had to cease. It was over what was really needed was a
second biblical flood a universal Deleuze to stop the war to appease
all the anger in the bloody madness of our leaders. Who knows he says maybe
one day in this corner of Artois they will raise a monument to commemorate this
spirit of fraternity among men who shared a horror of war and who were forced to
kill each other against their will and quote.
03:38:20
There are multiple accounts from socialist soldiers that sound like
that but it's more complex than that and Philip Gibbs tries to make this
statement in now it can be told where he talks about this horrible life these poor
soldiers are forced to endure.
03:38:36
But then about the complexity involved in trying to make some statement that the soldiers are all of
one mind or viewpoint about anything.
03:38:45
We told you Ernst Junger the German goes through all this terrible stuff and kind of finds
it uplifting. Gibbs writes these horror stories and then says this
about the song and the soldiers their quote.
03:38:59
But however deep the knowledge of tragedy a man would be a liar if he refused
to admit the heroism the gallantry of youth even the gayety of men in these
infernal months. Psychology on the Somme was not simple and straightforward.
Many were afraid. But fear was not their dominating emotion except in the worst hours
. Men hated this fighting but found excitement in it often exultation.
Sometimes an intense stimulus of all their senses and passions before reaction and
exhaustion. Men became jibbering idiots with shell shock as I saw some of
them but others rejoiced when they saw our shells plowing into the enemy's
earthworks laughed at their own narrow escapes and it grotesque comicality
use of this monstrous devil tree. The officers he writes were proud of their men eager
for their honor and achievement. The men themselves were in rivalries with other bodies of
troops and proud of their own prowess. They were scornful of all that the enemy might do to
them yet acknowledged his courage and power. They were quick to kill him and yet also
quick to give him a chance of life by surrender. And after that we're nine times out of
ten. Chivalrous and kindly but incredibly brutal on the rare occasions
when passion overcame them and some tale of treachery. They had the pride of
a skilled laborer he writes in his own craft as machine gunners
bombers Raider trench mortar men and we are all keen to show their
skill whatever the risks they were healthy animals with animal courage as well
as animal fear and they had some of them a spiritual and moral fervor
which bade them risk death to save a comrade or to save a position or to
kill the fear that tried to fetter them or lead men with greater fear than theirs
.
03:40:46
They live from hour to hour and forgot the peril or the misery that had passed
and did not forestall the future by apprehension unless they were a sensitive mind with the
worst quality men might have in modern warfare.
03:40:59
Imagination and quote.
03:41:04
Well imagination I can see being a downside if you are in the trenches under
fire.
03:41:10
You know looking at your watch as some of these troops in the trenches did saying I have fifteen
minutes left to live. Now I have ten minutes left to live. Now I have five minutes left to live is the
countdown to going over the top. And yes I can see how that would drive you
crazy.
03:41:25
On the other hand we're getting to the part of the war where the really
imaginative minds can begin to you know start to have an
impact on these brand new twentieth century problems that only became apparent
about two years ago when this war started. Some of the solutions to the problems the First
World War you know brings into play debuted during the Battle of the Somme
and they look once again this is going to maybe be a sub theme of the show unintentionally. They look
like something out of science fiction in this case.
03:41:57
H.G. Wells or if you want to believe some people go all the way back to Leonardo da Vinci
people who first come up with the concept of if you
will a land ship. Churchill and the
Navy called them land battleships. Sometimes we know them
by the term tank and tank is supposedly simply
something that caught on. It was supposed to be a cover word so that no one knew
what was being worked on in secret in the you know laboratories of the allies.
03:42:31
They would suggest that this giant armored tractor
was intended to bring up supply chain like water to the front line troops
under fire so a tank if you will a water tank
on a battle one of these little battles that make up all these giant battles are part of the
battle of the Somme on September fifteenth and offensive to take a particular part of the
battlefield is launched and debuting are a bunch of these tanks you know
thirty or forty something like that a bunch of them broke down on the way.
If you can instantly see you know that this is the solution to the problem right if you go
to your engineers when the war starts and say listen we've got this barbed wire machine gun
artillery situation with no man's land in these big trenches you got to get past
put your mind to it come back with a design they did. They've got a giant tractor and it's
so long that it can span most of these trenches. So
it can go in and not get trapped most of the time.
03:43:34
It only goes about the speed of a walking human being but the point isn't to you
know drive around real fast everywhere the point is to not get killed while you're
crossing no man's land and not get held up by a barbed wire these things are
designed to simply run over barbed wire and machine gun bullets won't
hurt them shrapnel won't hurt them and they'll get to the other side and they'll wipe out strong points and when
they debut nobody has any idea what that's going to be like.
03:44:03
It's another one of those moments where you kind of bite your nails and then you watch the new technology. In this
case not stuff developed in the last hundred years that never had a chance to be tested in
this case stuff developed specifically in response to problems the first world war
. You know brings up like no man's land and
they perform astoundingly well.
03:44:26
Now they break down a lot and they're terribly uncomfortable for the
people inside these are large too just like fifteen people in these things I mean they're like almost a
boss and they don't have a turret.
03:44:39
They have either a machine gun coming out of the side or a couple a six pounder guns which are about fifty seven
millimeter and yet the Germans don't know what they're dealing with here and we've had stories of them
surrendering to tanks and the reaction on the part of the British troops is either really
excited and happy or they are almost laughing because it looks kind of comical
. But in a sense this is what we talked about earlier this is the
Star Wars team conk Imperial Walker thing for real
. Now Churchill and the people who had backed this
idea from the time trench warfare got started that's when the first plans were drawn up in
the ideas brainstormed for something like this and the French were working on it too by the way
Churchill was mad in forever afterwards yelled and screamed that this concept could
have really done a time if they had just waited till there were enough of these land battleships
to unleash and have had to make a difference.
03:45:35
The counter-argument which we also understand right is that what if they don't work what if we don't know
how they work how do we do this if we don't have a dress rehearsal before opening
night so Churchill and the people on his side are saying no you wasted it it should have been one big opening night that.
03:45:50
You know broke the Western Front and the other side saying Are you kidding me there is an open invitation to
Murphy's Law but if you were looking to try to decide how you like your
land battleship concept in practice after it was debuted at the
Battle of the Somme Well all you have to know is cavalry commander Douglas Haig radioed
back to you know corporate headquarters and the British army and said we want
more of those tanks now.
03:46:18
Other things happened because of the battle of the song two and one was it was
just yet for poor Eric Von Falcon Hein The head of the German military Remember
he's a guy who took over after they sacked Von Moltke the guy who they started the war with. And now
like a bunch of leaders who own a football team and continually like
to change coaches. Falcon Hines going to lose he's good.
03:46:43
He's got ver done on his scorecard now he's got the song and then there's this Bruce
love offensive and then the last straw is everybody's whispering that Romania is going to get in the
war which doesn't sound like a big deal to us now but if you actually look at the literature
especially German are stronger in the stuff from that side of Europe.
03:47:01
Or they really like biting their nails about this are Romania to get in the war half a million bayonets Oh my
goodness.
03:47:06
And everybody's really worried and apparently Kaiser Wilhelm the German Emperor is really worried Falcon I said Now don't worry
about it they're not going to come in anytime soon maybe later but no time soon and then boom almost
right after he issues the they won't be coming in they come in
August twenty seventh and that's it.
03:47:24
Falcon hind get sacked the last card by the way
I love how he knows his Emperor William and William's little quirks about power and
Falcon Hines last car that he places you know if you replace me with the people
everyone knew they were going to replace him with.
03:47:40
If you replace me with end in Bergen Luden. If that's it they're not going to listen to you I am the
last chance you have of having an influence.
03:47:47
My words but that's basically what he said to the Kaiser you won't have any role in this at all. You better stick with me
because if you put Hindu Bergen Luden or if in charge they're going to tell you to go play with your toys in the corner
.
03:47:58
Apparently the Kaiser felt like he had no choice.
03:48:01
Saxe Von Falcon Hein who asks for a military command
is given. Some people think almost as an insult the command to go attack
remaining which he didn't first see them coming into the war.
03:48:14
He takes over a military command and conducts a brilliant
campaign against Romania conquering them quickly
which makes you turn around to go now why were you so scared of those remaining bayonets.
03:48:27
It's not the rainiest fault by the way folks I mean think about how that's like a minor league
team jumping into the middle of a game against the perhaps best army in
the twentieth century so if I'm injured remain iest So I want to quit for this without a ramp up period and they
just got smashed and the worst part about the whole thing from the Allied standpoint again the Allies
worked so hard to get Romania in the conflict is that once Germany takes over or mania they're going
to loot that country of every bit of wheat and oil anything they can take to
offset the damage that the British blockade is doing so in a sense it's like they
come upon this Romanian store room and they loot the whole thing so it sort of
backfires on the allied cause.
03:49:10
None the less. And in Bergen Lindorff this new command team the people who had been in
charge on the eastern front for so long and sort of being the armchair quarterbacks from over
there tell on the rest of the German command what they were doing wrong on the Western Front are now in charge of
among other things the Western Front and they're going to bring a new
perspective in a different way of looking at things and they
will essentially command this German army for the rest of the war
.
03:49:41
Now how long the rest of the war is going to be able to go is an open question
as one thousand nine hundred ten begins to wind if you begin to see the discontent ramping up
everywhere and on many different fronts when you begin to see for example hunger really bite.
03:49:56
They'll be a winter the famous winter of one thousand sixteen in Germany that's called the turnip winter
which tells you right there what's going on all the all the exports from Romania you can get aren't
going to you know make up for the overseas important needs of Germany.
03:50:13
The Russians are in terrible trouble remember this is a regime that
almost got overthrown ten years before this time period. They didn't have
exactly the greatest most solid foundation.
03:50:25
Anyway these million casualties they suffering one thousand sixteen at the recent off offensive
among other things are taking its toll. French soldiers are
beginning to bleat like sheep when they passed by their
officers these replacements will come up marching by and they'll just hear bleeding
sounds like sheep and lambs being led to the slaughter a sort of as one author puts it
a way that the troops can silently protest what they feel is being done to them
on the home front.
03:50:58
You can you know the tragedy is beginning to really seep in as more and more people are
personally affected for life by this conflict and obviously while this isn't
the textbook example I don't think most people find themselves in the
same situation as this German couple.
03:51:16
But there's a story from the time period from our British observer in Germany
during the war who was describing a train trip where she saw a couple a man and a
woman on the train and the stories absolutely heartbreaking but in so many ways
shows where we are by the end of one thousand nine hundred eighteen in this conflict.
03:51:38
The Observer says quote A poor woman the other day on the train was
holding up her hand and counting the fingers on it slowly.
03:51:46
One two three four five.
03:51:51
Over and over again the passengers gradually began to smile at her until at
last the man sitting next to her said simply don't laugh at my wife ladies and gentleman I'm
taking her to the asylum.
03:52:02
Her wits are gone. She's lost her five sons all killed in action
.
03:52:08
End quote.
03:52:11
When you really examine what's already happened since August one thousand fourteen
. You come away with the feeling that if you had bet
on a short war like so many did you are amazed at the
staying power of all these states many of whom didn't look that particularly
stable when the war broke out.
03:52:33
Nonetheless as we've been saying throughout this whole program there's a limit to the endurance
of anyone and we're about to enter the point where nations crack
and break. And in the not too distant future. Get knocked
out.
03:52:56
Audible is the Internet's leading provider of spoken audio entertainment and of course I think we've
talked about Audible a few times on this program. Audio books are
obviously great speeches in history old time radio
programs periodicals and magazines. It's quite astounding
how much stuff is being transmitted to the digital form these days and you can certainly understand why
we in podcasting get it better than most perhaps we understand how much people are
incorporating audio entertainment to their lifestyle. Things
you have to do anyway well why not you know hear a good book or maybe a halfway decent
podcast at the same time I mean audibles got so many good offerings
right now you know there's really no good excuse I mean why wouldn't you if you were interested in the First World
War And I assume you are because you listened to this program. Why would you pick up Peter Hart and
we've mentioned Peter Hart a few times in the program how can we what. One of the few books we didn't use for the show why would you pick up
his book The song from the darkest hour on the western front
and one of the things that's great about heart is he's one of these historians that puts together a lot of first hand
accounts from oral testimony and remembrances of the people who were there
. So when something like this on the darkest hour in the western front you get firsthand accounts from
people who were experiencing what was going on there and believe me I don't use his book I
hardly touched those accounts because it was getting dark enough as it was wasn't it
. If it wasn't dark enough for you where you'd like a little bit more you know testimony
from the people who had to experience this. Well why not go to audible and pick up the song The
darkest hour on the western front by historian Peter Hart and if you go to audible
podcast dot com forward slash hardcore history you can get your free audio book download when you
sign up.
03:54:48
If you think the show you just heard is worth a dollar. Dan and Ben would love to have it back and
show it's all we ask. Go to Dan Carlin dot com for information on how to
donate to the show.
03:55:00
One of the justifiable criticisms you can level at the show we just did
was that a focus is inordinately on the western front
.
03:55:10
I did that on purpose because to me when you're talking about the extremes of human
experience the first thing that comes to my mind when I think of the First World War is the situation on the Western Front in the trench war
and all that. And in that sense I'm not that different than most British French and German
historians who are focused inordinately on the western front. But I think we all know
that there's a lot of other things going on in this conflict in a bunch of other theaters.
And in the same way I was able to avoid talking about those other
theaters for a while. My goodness the jumping around we would do with if we try to get everything
in there would be more confusing than what we're already giving you which is more confusing than I like already
. Nonetheless you could ignore just like most people in Britain France
or heck even in New York City in the United States when you open up a newspaper in the far corner of like Page
eight there's a little blurb about maybe some obscure Arab
tribe uprising in some out of the way Ottoman
district or something doesn't mean that much to you you're not thinking that much about it after all the
Western Front is grinding up a whole generation of Europeans.
03:56:16
And then in one thousand nine hundred seventeen events in far away peripheral
places is the way a lot of people in the West might see them rise up and demand
to be taken seriously. Whether it's the
Middle East in one thousand seventeen and events that we are still shaking out
to this day that are in your headlines daily or whether it's the
collapse of an ancient European regime which opens the
door to the twentieth century's
most radical regime taking over in a major country
.
03:56:56
It's also one thousand nine hundred seventeen that the vortex of the First World War manages
to suck in and outside major power that for
almost one hundred fifty years has managed to stay out of direct
involvement in European affairs as one of their early presidents had said
the United States of America doesn't go abroad in search of foreign monsters to
slay.
03:57:22
And in one thousand nine hundred seventeen they decide well maybe just this once
you know how to make the world safe for democracy
. Yes indeed many of our modern
situations had the seeds for them planted in
one thousand nine hundred seventeen and we'll get to all that
and more. In part five a blueprint for Armageddon.

Earlier in the story we brought up the often quoted
phrase that one man's terrorist is another man's freedom fighter
. And we brought it up in relation to the man who actually launched
the incident that sparked the First World War The Serbian nationalist
guerilla printshop who killed the heir to the austral hung
Garion throne the Archduke Franz Ferdinand there by precipitating the
crisis that actually started the war. The Austrian Garion saw a print ship
unequivocally as a terrorist his Serbian nationalist
brethren revered him. In fact not that long ago a
statue was unveiled in Syria a vote where the assassination happened
honoring the assassin. So your view of
the motives of these people really depends on you know who's doing
the viewing at the time. Print chip is far from the only figure in this story who falls
into a similar category. The United States is dealing with one
themselves. In one thousand sixteen.
00:02:55
For example in January one thousand nine hundred eighteen just as the German military is putting the finishing touches
on what will become the quintessentially horrible battle over
done the quintessentially twentieth century style battle the
killing field created by mass artillery the meat grinder that will be for done
the United States is that tension is taken off European affairs by events going on in northern
Mexico and Mexico has been convulsed by
revolution since one thousand and ten. Northern Mexico often becomes one of
these hotbeds of unrest and instability. And in January one thousand nine hundred
sixteen gunmen waylay a train in northern Mexico
.
00:03:41
Now this is at the tail end of the era where train robberies are not
uncommon but these gunmen aren't there to rob the train in fact as they go up and down the aisles
they leave the Mexican nationals the locals alone
but they pull off every American from the train that they find
and they find sixteen to eighteen workers employees of a U.S.
corporation operating in northern Mexico.
00:04:11
They take these Americans off the train line them up in front of the
tracks. Force them to strip and then execute them
.
00:04:22
We know this because one of the Americans feigned death and got away and told his
story. I believe he said that the bodies were also mutilated. This may very
well may have been an attempt to provoke a response on the part of the US government and
if so the mutilation is just part of adding fuel to the fire. A little something to make the
U.S. government even angrier at this event. And things have been escalating to
this point in northern Mexico for some time groups affiliated with the same gunman had been
attacking isolated Americans a murder here a murder there a rape here or there but this was
upping the ante significantly. Nonetheless the maneuver
accomplished nothing concrete of note. So a couple of
months later in March one thousand nine hundred sixteen this group
of gunmen or outlaws or revolutionaries if you're looking at it from another point of
view upped the ante again and crossed the US Mexican
border in strength. More than one hundred
. Go after American interests on the U.S. side of the
border culminating in that in an attack on a U.S. city
Columbus New Mexico in the middle of the night. They roar through this town
shooting looting killing and burning. Eighteen Americans
will be killed the town will be burned down and the
bandits or terrorists or revolutionaries depending on your point of
view will escape back into Mexico. Now as a
side note then as now Americans are heavily armed people and those bandits paid a
high price for what they did to that town. Many more of them died
than Americans died. Nonetheless the idea that you were safe and
protected within the confines of the U.S. borders was shattered in a
way that hadn't happened since the Apache wars in that region had ended thirty years
previously the attackers of Columbus New Mexico were affiliated
with a Mexican revolutionary leader known to history not his
actual name as poncho the now almost certainly wasn't in
Columbus New Mexico he had been hurt not that long before but these gunmen
were part of you know his man.
00:06:46
And if you look at this superficially there's a lot of
similarities between poncho V. and Osama bin Laden. Now this is
not said to insult Mexican folks who still in some cases revere poncho
vs memory but it's hard to avoid that at least from the American side of things. There are rough
analogies that you can you know point to for example like Ben Ladan
the head once upon a time been a friend of the United States
someone we thought we could work with and use and an arm and train and
help. In fact after that
attack in Columbus New Mexico when it was obvious that some response had to be put together.
President Woodrow Wilson the American leader launches an
expedition a military expedition into northern Mexico sends about
five thousand men across the border. There was
a an official leader but he wasn't the guy who actually led things on the ground the guy who lived things on the ground
was an American general named John Pershing whose nickname by the way was
black jack and a year before to show you how
close the United States had been to the at one time the year before Pershing
launches this expedition to go capture this terrorist punch of the year. He loses his whole
family in a terrible house fire. A person's
wife and his little girls they were little children died in the
fire and as he was wallowing
in almost soul crushing grief amongst the
condolence letters he received was one from this poncho via
person that he would be chasing about a year later
.
00:08:36
There are a lot of interesting things that this expedition across the border
shows not just Mexicans not just Americans but European
observers everywhere all throughout this war have wondered what the
United States is going to do and what their capabilities are.
All of a sudden they have a U.S. military force in the field to have a look at and measure up against the
standards of early twentieth century warfare and to be honest the
American endeavor looks like a disaster.
00:09:08
It doesn't look a whole lot different than efforts thirty years ago to the
year that were launched to go after the last Apache leader to
break off the U.S. reservation system with forty warriors and go into
some of the same country that V. and his men were hiding in.
00:09:29
Looks like a very similar army just add some motor cars which is what the U.S.
military was employing to give them some mobility and some airplanes that
look like they were invented by the Wright brothers themselves in fact the pilots
were trained in some cases by Orville and Wilbur Wright. That's how recent you know
airplane development is. And the U.S. planes are so rickety and so new that none of
them survived the first week or two of operation down there
.
00:10:01
One of the more interesting aspects to the U.S. operations in northern Mexico to go get punch of
the air is the U.S. doesn't know northern Mexico in their maps are all wrong. And so they
have leading their army as scouts.
00:10:14
Apaches and these Apaches include
allegedly some Apache scouts who were among the Apache scouts
that hunted down Geronimo thirty years before. In fact there's quite a connection to a lot
of these people involved in this conflict. John General John Blackjack Pershing
was a junior officer trailing Geronimo thirty years before these events.
00:10:41
It's believe the poncho via wanted to get the U.S. to attack northern
Mexico and bog them down in this insane country to fight in
insane terrain insane weather conditions and thereby raise
his standing amongst several revolutionary leaders vying for
control of the instability in Mexico that have been going on since the one
thousand and ten revolution began. But if Europeans
already had a stereo typical view of the United
States as a nation of cowboys and an army mired in an almost old west
sort of approach the expedition into northern Mexico to capture
poncho via did nothing to disabuse them of that stereotype
.
00:11:30
To many European observers it wasn't just a frontier army that the
United States of America look like they possessed. It was kind of a frontier mentality to go
along with it.
00:11:42
And one of the things that was really hard for European planners is that on both sides of the war by the way
is that it began to look more and more like the United States was going to play this huge role in the war but what did
that even mean.
00:11:54
United States had never sent over lots of men to go fight in some European
war.
00:12:00
It was alien to the American experience so what they actually do that
there were a lot of European observers that thought that even if the US got into the war they wouldn't send troops
.
00:12:10
Americans don't do that and that's part of what makes that
pre First World War United States of America. Hard for modern Americans
to understand you know if you know your grandparents if you're lucky enough to have met your grandparents you can
explain them to other people. You begin to get a real feel for what they are about even if they
are very different than you are but they're real you can relate to them
. United States of nine hundred sixteen is like a great great great grandparent you can
read all about it you want but those people are different from you and you don't understand them and you never knew them you never knew
anyone like them. The modern United States of America is the most
interventionist great power in the world in one thousand nine hundred sixteen
it was the opposite.
00:12:56
An you had had a long mythology connected to its very founding
that reinforced the idea that that's the way American foreign policy should
be before the United States could involve itself in the first world
war.
00:13:11
It had to somehow deal with this lasting legacy dating all the way back
to you know pretty revolutionary days but why don't you just start with the farewell
speech of the first American president George Washington a speech
that was read read aloud once a year in patriotic fervor
a speech that told Americans to stay out of Europe's wars
.
00:13:38
In the middle of his goodbye speech to the American people in his resigning from
public life he said quote.
00:13:46
The great rule of conduct for us in regard to foreign nations
is in extending our commercial relations to have with them as little
political connection as possible. So far as we've already formed engagements let
them be fulfilled with perfect good faith here. Let us stop.
Europe has a set of primary interest which to us have none or very remote
relation hence she must be engaged in frequent controversies. The
causes of which are essentially foreign to our concerns. Hence therefore
it must be unwise in us to implicate ourselves by artificial ties in the
ordinary. This attitude of her politics or the ordinary combinations and
collisions of her friendships or enmities are detached and distant
situation invites and enables us to pursue a different course. If we remain
one people under an efficient government that period is not far off when we need to
five material injury from external annoyance when we may take such
an attitude as will cause the neutrality we may at any time resolve upon to be
scrupulously respected when belligerent nations under the impossibility of making
acquisitions upon us will not lightly hazard the giving us
provocation which we may choose peace or war as our interest guided by Justice
shall counsel. Why forgo all the advantages of so peculiar a
situation. Why quit our own to stand upon foreign ground. Why
by interweaving our destiny with out of any part of Europe and tangle our peace
and prosperity in the toils of European ambition. Rival ship interest
humour or caprice it is our true policy to steer clear of permanent
alliances with any portion of the foreign world.
00:15:33
End quote.
00:15:35
When Americans revere those people like demi gods and that speech is really red to
American schoolchildren and re read publicly once a year on the anniversary you can see
that if you were an American who thought the United States should enter the First World War
you have a lot of methodology to overcome a lot of ingrained ideological training.
00:15:57
Unless you think that those are revolutionary sentiments. You know from the beginning of a nation a lot of
times people are very emotional and sentimental and lofty and idealistic when
a nation is founded and that cools over time.
00:16:10
Forty five years after Washington gave that speech the current president of the United States
a second generation guy like George W. Bush kind of
John Quincy Adams gave another one of these foreign policy
speeches coining a famous phrase that Americans would use ever
sense you know going abroad in search of monsters to slay the
very antithesis of the idea that the United States government is going to use
as the slogan to get the United States into the First World War John Quincy Adams in the
middle of one of his speeches dealing with what the country's foreign policy should be forty five years
after Washington gave his speech said quote.
00:16:53
Speaking about the United States here in the feminine pronoun by the way quote Wherever the
standard of freedom and independence has been or shall be unfurled
there will her heart her benedictions and her prayers be. But she goes not abroad
in search of monsters to destroy. She is the well wisher to the freedom and independence
of all. She is the champion and vindicator only of her own. She will recommend the
general cause by the countenance of her voice and the bin Laden in sympathy of her
example. She well knows that by once enlisting under other banners than her own
where they even the banners of foreign independence she would involve herself beyond
the power of extrication in all the wars of interest and intrigue of individual
avarice envy and ambition which assume the colors and usurp the standard of
freedom. The fundamental maxims of her policy would insensibly change from Liberty
to force the front light upon her brows would no longer being with the ineffable
splendor of freedom and independence but in its stead would soon be substituted an
imperial diadem flashing in false and tarnished luster the murky
radiance of dominion and power she might become the dictators of the world.
She would be no longer the ruler of her own spirit and quote.
00:18:11
This kind of historical legacy of idealism this mythology if you will that
Americans you know had reinforced all the time provided a natural counterweight
for Patriots to choose a side that seemed to be you know opposite of
what patriotism normally implied in Europe patriotism was a key part of
nationalism it's you know grabbing of the flag sometimes and pushing your nation's glory
and borders farther. That was true in the United States to
everybody's human the same sorts of you know rallying cries often work on Americans that work
on other people.
00:18:47
But you also had this refuge for people who were patriotic and who could take an anti
interventionist position and couch it as much in the flag as those who were
suggesting that real patriots you know joined up and fought the Spanish in Cuba for example
as the you know Roosevelt the former president of the United States and
volunteer for that Spanish American War you know kept taking the opposite
viewpoint that the United States of America lived in a different time than those founding fathers and that real
patriotism in real men would be ready to join the First World War in the United
States is in looking like a coward by not being involved.
00:19:27
But Theodore Roosevelt is not the president in one thousand sixteen.
00:19:30
But he's needling the guy who is a guy from the other party a Democrat named Woodrow
Wilson one of the most enigmatic and hard to get your mind
around figures in this story.
00:19:44
And part of the reason that Wilson is so hard to figure out is because the historians don't
agree.
00:19:50
The majority of historians have always taken Wilson sort of at face value and
portray him as one of the most if not the most idealistic president in
American history a guy who is so peace loving he's virtually gone the
ask and a man who did everything he could to keep the
United States out of war and to fight for this wonderful just fair piece
afterwards that's the sort of the good will and I divide them into the good Wilson and the evil Woodrow
Wilson in terms of how some historians see them.
00:20:22
The other historical campus smaller but very vociferous very loud and growing. And those are the
people who for a lot of domestic reasons it should be pointed out don't like Woodrow Wilson at all. And
often you know ascribe sinister or venal motives for him
doing what he was doing.
00:20:38
And see a man who wanted to get involved with the allies who sought
peace for his own vainglorious reasons who was a
schemer and a person who hid behind a mask that promised you know
idealism and peace and there were German generals for example who were never falling for that
story that Wilson was some Bambi deer in the headlights on the world stage and always thought
that that was just a really good mask that his Macchiavelli and schemings hid
behind making him even more dangerous right disguise was better than the US I'm
not going to wait as a fan of history in which Wilson I believe was the real Wilson.
00:21:17
But look at how it adds to the uncertainty of the whole thing. What is this guy all about.
00:21:24
Now I personally think that the air of mystery that surrounds Woodrow Wilson
makes him a more interesting character and he's a giant a nig Now that's quickly becoming
perhaps the most important single individual in the story by the end of nine hundred
sixteen but you know I didn't have to live with him to the people in this
tale he's not a character he's a world leader. And what the United States does in
this war might decide the conflict. So the stakes couldn't be higher
.
00:21:53
Winston Churchill writing after the First World War He's got a very
interesting view on Wilson It's hard to describe you can see he's he's walking on eggshells sometimes
but he says this guy we didn't know anything about him and he comes out of academia
basically and he says only in the American system do you get these people that can come from
totally outside politics has complete unknown goes in Britain such a
prime minister would have spent years in the in the House of Commons or what have you you know working their way up
they would be in the public eye the whole time they would be a known quantity by the time they got the top job.
He marvels at the fact that Woodrow Wilson is an unknown.
00:22:30
You know the most powerful man in the United States and quickly
becoming the most important single figure in the war Churchill writes about Wilson
quote.
00:22:41
In all his strength and in all his weakness in his nobility and in this boy Abel's he
was in spite of his long academic record in brief governorship and unknown
and then measured quantity to the mighty people who made him their ruler in one nine hundred twelve.
Still more Was he a mystery to the world at large. Writing With every sense of respect it
seems no exaggeration to pronounce that the action of the United States with its
repercussions on the history of the world depended during the awful period of
Armageddon upon the workings of this man's mind and spirit to the exclusion
of almost every other factor. And then he played a part in the fate of nations in
comparable the more direct and personal than any other man end quote
.
00:23:25
That's why we're talking about the United States so much in this episode.
00:23:30
And one of the other parts of the Wilson story that are interesting is when you get human
beings in positions of great power and authority often times they are little
quirks or idiosyncrasies or characteristics
can make or break history. I mean we all have little things about
us that might be quirky or idiosyncratic but because we're not in positions of power and authority they don't
really make much of a difference if if at all Hitler leaves the military after the First World
War as a decorated corporal and goes and opens up a sausage shop in Munich
his quirks and idiosyncrasies and characteristics don't make a big
difference on the world stage you probably never hear about them they only affect you know the people he has contact
with.
00:24:14
But you take that same figure and you make him the iron fisted dictator of one of the
great twentieth century nations on the planet and all of a sudden that man's quirks and
idiosyncrasies and characteristics can create a deadly Holocaust
. Now Wilson didn't have those kinds of characteristics at least I haven't heard
that even from the evil Wilson camp but he did have characteristics that impacted this whole situation
one was he was almost always convinced that he was right.
No paraphrasing here but he said something to the effect of once that he felt pity for people who had
different opinions than him because he knew they were wrong. You can watch the way he operates in
government and he's a supremely gifted politician. But a lot of times those
people are unwilling to let other men carry out you know their
policies and their programs because they know they could do it better and you can see that from
Wilson too. After the war the man is going to become the British prime
minister again. David Lloyd George will have to sit by the French military leader on one
side and the president of the United States on the other and he said it was like sitting between
Napoleon on one side of that was the French leader and Jesus on the other
.
00:25:26
That was Woodrow Wilson and Jesus was probably more the way
Wilson saw himself as what George was trying to convey than the
way others saw him negotiating with the Saviour
can require a deft touch.
00:25:44
And Wilson's demeanour and sort of professorial air of
superiority and that I'm always right kind of savior air about him
sometimes rubbed some people the wrong way and certainly influenced the
way that Wilson handled things.
00:26:01
And there were several big challenges to American neutrality that Wilson had to deal
with and all were especially acute in one thousand sixteen.
00:26:11
One involved American lives. The other involved American money and the last
involved in American election.
00:26:19
Start with perhaps the number one most obvious things sucking the
United States into the whirlpool the vortex of the First World War and it was something
that was so obviously doing that you can feel the momentum even now
reading the history books about this sort of slide into a war because the Germans
use of this thoroughly modern science fiction almost weapon the submarine and how the
submarine was creating conditions where a couple of Americans here and there every now and
then were dying on ships every now and then it was worse than that.
00:26:51
When the Lusitania went down which was a titanic like liner
to a submarine torpedo more than one hundred Americans went down with that ship.
00:27:01
How long would any nation put up with that. And the problem is is that the US will
complain and work something out with the Germans. Tensions would drop and then a month later a month and a half
later boom it happens again.
00:27:13
It's like a civil war that kept getting poked with a needle before it was able to heal
. And yet Wilson kept making the conditions more and
more impossible to fulfill so those anti Wilsonian
historians who say no no you misunderstand Wilson was trying to create the conditions that the Germans couldn't
help but violate and then get the United States into the war and then claim it was forced upon
the Americans.
00:27:38
For example Wilson at one point his administration with high minded rhetoric and
speeches was defending the right of an American passenger. And remember
Americans could travel on American ships or neutral ships and at certain
times the Germans had had sworn they wouldn't go after those. But Wilson was defending the right of an
American to travel on a British ship or a French ship right a
belligerent ship and defending their right to travel on a belligerent
ship even if it was carrying munitions and defending their right to travel on a
belligerent ship carrying munitions. That also was carrying defensive guns on it that could hurt a
submarine.
00:28:18
That's when the Germans would throw up their hands and say that to them Wilson
didn't look like an honest broker that's the kind of guy you're going to trust with peace. I mean
look he did. And their attitude was he doesn't hold the British to any of these same rules he's
trying to hold us to the British had a blockade going that he knew submarines they use mine
they would mine the North Sea They create these zones where they would stop every line or they could get their hands on make it go
to a British port search it you know decide it was contraband and Wilson and his
administration were pretty darn quiet about that.
00:28:51
DK did no protest and nothing more to the Germans this looked like rank hypocrisy and
too anti Wilsonian historians' to them it looks like a perfect example to show
that really these ideals that Wilson professed were very
conveniently ignored when they ran against what he wanted.
There were other complications that affected what he wanted to do.
00:29:14
One had to do with perhaps the most ancient of motivations
of all economic ones the United States was
making a killing on the First World War by one thousand nine hundred sixteen pardon the pun
and it began to affect its entire outlook toward the conflict.
00:29:36
It's one of the longest term impacts by the way of the first world war. The results of
which we live with every day in our modern world. But it sort of sinks beneath the radar it's a lot
easier to understand the submarine warfare question than it is the economic transfer of
wealth from Europe to the United States. This
war was so total in its stakes that these
sides fighting it found no good reason not to spend every bit of
capital they had to win it. When Britain started this war in one hundred
fourteen she was the richest country in the world. It was not long after the era where the phrase the
sun never sets on the British Empire was in vogue. The British Empire
controlled directly or indirectly about a third of the planet. She was wealthy
and she'd been sucking up a lot of the wealth of Europe for one hundred years during
Europe's most dominant time period on the world stage the era
of you know colonies and post Napoleonic splendor right the
Victorian age. And yet when one thousand nine hundred eighteen started the British didn't just have
their own bills to pay in this most expensive of all human conflicts they underwrote their dominions the
Canadas the Australians the New Zealand they underwrote countries like Italy and paid for
almost all their cost during the war the Russians too and a lot of other small powers. The amounts of
money that were changing hands I have seen so many different attempts to come up with it all you have to know
though is it's ungodly. At one point it was like seventy five million dollars a
week in nineteen sixteen money I mean
it's incredible the wealth transfer and when Britain started buying stuff from places like the United States
. When the war started they used cash and gold. By nine hundred
sixteen we're talking about credit and debt and if you wanted
to think of New York as being like a giant vacuum cleaner with a sucking hose. And in
London just sucking out one hundred years of civilizational wealth
acquirement that's not a bad image in four years the
center of world banking as we said in an earlier episode is transferred from London to
New York.
00:31:48
Same thing for the center of world trade.
00:31:51
And all of a sudden by nine hundred sixteen Wilson is acquiring a huge amount of
power because the United States is the banker. And these people are
beginning to owe it money. The British realized it at the same time
. Historian justice Donaghy writes
about Wilson's new ability because he controls the purse
strings of the Allied side in this war to dictate any sort of outcome he might want
to make he writes quote If Wilson desired to force the allies to the peace table
the opportunity had come and he knew it.
00:32:29
On October third one thousand nine hundred eighteen a British interdepartmental conference
noted the nation's utter dependence upon American munitions steal
foodstuffs oil wheat cotton and lubricants where the United States to
engage in economic reprisals. Britain's war effort would practically stop.
Of the five million pounds sterling needed to prosecute the war reported to government
economist John Maynard Keynes later that week two million must come from North
America quote in a few months time claimed the treasury official the
American public will be in a position to dictate to this country on matters that affect us more
nearly than them and quote the author continues quote Reginald McKenna
chancellor of the Exchequer concurred with Keynes telling the cabinet in late October
quote by next June or earlier the president of the American Republic will
be in a position if he wishes to dictate his own terms to us and quote
the author says at the end of December McKenna told an American journalist that Wilson could quote
force the allies to their knees any time in a moment.
00:33:35
End quote.
00:33:38
If the United States in late one nine hundred sixteen is like a bank in Europe especially
Great Britain who is the financial underwriter of the whole allied war effort basically owes the bank
money that gives the bank a lot of power.
00:33:51
But there's an old line in banking that if you owe the bank a little bit
of money it's the bank who has the power but if you owe a bank a lot of money that
power goes back to the person that owns the money because the bank now has a vested interest in seeing
that that person survives. So that they can pay them back. The United
States is beginning to worry about what happens if we can't sell this war
material anymore or if we can't get paid for the credit we're loaning out
the U.S. has had a very uncomfortable sort of prosperity descend on it
in the past two years. In one thousand fourteen when the first world war breaks out the American economy is not
doing well at all. My nine hundred sixteen halfway through the year the American
economy is humming along nicely thank you. Some historians have actually
called the United States a nation of war profiteers at this point. If
Wilson was successful in creating a negotiated peace at the end of one thousand nine hundred eighteen somehow and
you wanted at that point declared the winner in the first world war. Do you know which
two powers I'd nominate. I nominate Japan and the United States
and the Japanese hardly fought in the war at all. And by the end in one thousand nine hundred eighteen United States
hadn't fought in the war at all. Those are the victors the Japanese get involved in one thousand nine hundred eighteen for
purely opportunistic reasons. They can take over all the German holdings in their neck of
the woods and the Germans can't do anything to get all this territory for basically nothing
. The United States is selling stuff amazing
amounts of stuff. Both sides need everything and the Americans will sell to anybody but they
can't get their stuff to Germany. They still made loans and tried to get stuff to them. But by and
large the British blockade it shut that down but you could still trade with the British and we did.
And the idea that that trade might somehow go away
began to filter into the halls of government. The prosperity that this war brought the United
States created another vested interest. And there are economic historians and
historians who look more at economic motivations for why countries do things that
pointed this is the most important undercurrent of why the war was really going the way
it was. Now there's another reason too and this is very pedestrian
but Woodrow Wilson in one thousand sixteen was an American president that faced an election
campaign. And this is where the the real
uniqueness of the American situation is demonstrated. What does a
president do who's running for reelection. And the big elephant in the living
room situation is this war in Europe when he's facing an electorate made up
of immigrants.
00:36:37
People on both sides of that conflict in the Old World.
00:36:42
Historian David Stevenson does a great job of breaking down you know the
ethnic makeup of the United States and showing you all these weird problems that the United
States would have if it got into this conflict that other nations wouldn't. For example he
points out that large chunks of the United States is made up of immigrants from some
of these countries. The two main groups that are that are problematic for
anyone who wants to talk about siding with the allies in this first world war are German Americans
and Irish Americans. Here's what Stevenson writes quote support
for American neutrality was strongest in the interior and especially the Middle
West where the German Americans were concentrated only an insignificant
minority favored intervention on the side of the Central Powers over US population
in one thousand nine hundred ninety two million.
00:37:32
He writes Two and a half million had been born in Germany and five point seven
eight million had one or two German born parents in one thousand seven thousand
five hundred twenty two German language newspapers and journals were published in the United
States and German Americans were the largest ethnic group in Baltimore
Pittsburgh Chicago Detroit Los Angeles and San Francisco
and quote.
00:37:58
He then goes on to talk about Irish Americans who and we didn't even get into this as a
person of partly Irish American descent. I would have just gone
off on the whole Irish uprising in the Easter uprising that
happened during this conflict of which the Germans may have had a role. The
British considered this an especially nasty stab in the bank back since it happened during
war time reacted by killing a lot of Irish. Or it depends on if you're British or not
killing Irish leaders in the uprising. Infuriating
Americans of Irish descent of which there were a ton and so if you're a politician like Woodrow
Wilson you have to deal with the fact that you have a ton of voters who are the only people that can keep
you in power who are really interested in not joining the side
of the allies maybe you or anyone. The slogan for the one nine hundred sixteen
campaign that's most remembered on the Woodrow Wilson side is the one that said
quote He kept us out of war and the quote
that was a slogan that appealed to most Americans.
00:39:05
Wilson's peace oriented Secretary of State William Jennings Bryan had
said at one point that New York and the major newspapers want war. The rest of the
country wants peace.
00:39:18
And if you're an American planner it's interesting how many times you can open up the history books and see
references to the uncertainty of what these large immigrant
descendant populations would do if the US joined the Allied side in the
war. If you have two point five million Americans born in Germany what are they
going to do when war breaks out of these potential terrorists. And so it became
quite an interesting issue before the conflict involve the United States as to whether or not the
United States was unified in the idea that it would go fight on any side in this conflict
. Now what do you do if you're one of these American figures perhaps one
of the top politicians who wants the United States to get into the first world war
. What's your strategy for dealing with these Americans who don't want to go
who want to stay neutral. It may be a huge majority of the country during this time
period. If you're a politician and you're used to sort of putting your finger in the wind and going in the
direction the people want to go but they don't want to go in the direction you want to go. You know what's your
strategy for dealing with that. So the strategy of several of the top political figures in this
period was to play the super patriot card and to accuse
Americans who disagreed with the idea of getting into the war as being
disloyal. I mean take for example the former president Theodore
Roosevelt in one thousand nine hundred eighteen. Roosevelt is not running for president but he's
campaigning and helping the guy who is from his own party to the Republican that's
challenging Woodrow Wilson in the November one thousand nine hundred sixteen elections.
00:40:54
Now Roosevelt is in an interesting position here. He desperately wants to get into the first world
war. He thinks it's cowardly that the U.S. is staying out. He's publicly
slamming Woodrow Wilson from pillar to post for not wanting to get involved in the conflict.
He compares him on the campaign trail to punches pilot in fact he says Wilson's
neutrality is worse than ponchos pilot remember punches pilot. He's the Roman
official who in the Bible sentences Jesus to be crucified
. That's a pretty good political slam at the president isn't it.
But then Roosevelt makes a point to go after what at the time were referred to as
hyphenated Americans. You know people who had a hyphen between their description of their
nationality German hyphen Americans Irish hyphen
Americans Jewish hyphen Americans. And there was a feeling
amongst a lot of Americans that these people weren't real Americans that they had
conflicted loyalties and there was also this idea that you had to have one hundred percent
loyalty to the United States and any consideration with what the ancestral home might
want was equivalent in Roosevelt's own words to being a moral
trader. And so how do you deal with the fact that you want
the United States to do something that most Americans don't want to do. You slam is
traitorous. Those who oppose it now.
00:42:19
Wilson was in a bit of a different position because not only many historians think did he not want to
get in the war maybe but he certainly had a public persona of not wanting to get into the war.
00:42:30
But Wilson didn't like anyone who disagreed with them. And you can see
Wilson's attitude about those who would oppose his policies even in peace
time. In his response to a telegram he received from an Irish American there's
that hyphenation right Irish hyphen American leader in September one thousand nine hundred
sixteen a guy named Jeremiah O'Leary and O'Leary was telling Wilson something that's that's
perfectly logical he's explaining to him that all of these moves that seem to lean toward the
Allied side of the war are going to be issues in the campaign right there's nothing controversial about that.
00:43:04
Only Rees Cable said quote your foreign policy is your failure to
secure compliance with all American rights. Your leniency with the British
Empire.
00:43:14
Your approval of the war loans the ammunition traffic are issues in this campaign
and quote most American political figures would understand that that's just someone
from the opposition explaining that that's how the American political system works or something wrong with that especially not in
peacetime. Wilson wrote back to Jeremiah O'Leary quote
your telegram received.
00:43:35
I would feel deeply mortified to have you or anybody like you vote for me
since you have access to many disloyal Americans and I have not.
00:43:45
I will ask you to convey this message to them and quote.
In other words to simply oppose Woodrow Wilson's policies in peace
time doesn't make you part of the loyal opposition. It makes you
disloyal.
00:44:00
What is a president who feels that peacetime opposition to peacetime
policies is disloyal what's a guy like that going to do when it's no longer peace
time. Well here's a little preview to think about. We still have
laws on the books that we're currently enforcing and using in the war on terror that are
President Wilson's response to critics who addressed him negatively
in war time. And lest you think that this is an overreaction
though or maybe misplaced priorities it's worth noticing
that in the late one nine hundred sixteen. There are several belligerents in this war
who are most threatened not by foreign armies defeating their armies on the
battlefield but by their own populations collapsing from within.
Morally or in terms of their unity and support for the government
in an era where more and more of the armies of these modern
twentieth century States could take a punch and stay on the battlefield fighting year after
year the chink in the national armor for some of these states was proving to
be the home front.
00:45:13
And no where by the way do you see a better example of the sweeping away of the
nineteenth century mentality than in how the home front is viewed the Home Front
of course is a shorthand word for the people back living their civilian lives and you know
supporting the war economy and helping to make munitions and all the stuff that helps support those troops at the
front in the nineteenth century in Europe's more genteel sort of
era there were all sorts of peace conventions and and laws of war meetings
to do it to help spare civilians and keep them as far away from the suffering of war as
possible that was considered to be a civilizational advance.
00:45:51
It's interesting and telling I think to watch that sort of genteel
peace time mentality crash into the rocks of reality that are the twentieth
century where all of those rules look like rainbows and
unicorns I mean from another time we're gassing each other with you know insecticide he met
human decide can we say that he met design something you used to spray on human beings like
they're ants you know there go the nineteenth century genteel conventions right there and the
same applied to civilians we have the Germans you know using the Zeppelin raids to drop
bombs on British cities I mean there goes those one thousand century conventions right there and
the German bombers who do it you know cite this idea that everyone's a combatant now.
00:46:35
If the home front is a legitimate target. In total war then so are the
civilians going about their daily lives in places like Germany and Austria Hungary when the British cut off
trade to those places they begin to do the equivalent. Put an
entire nation or an entire alliance under siege
and one British official actually said you know what's the difference between you know putting a
city under siege which has been done throughout history in the civilian population in that besieged city always
suffers and putting a nation under siege. The British clamp down this
blockade at the beginning of the war by the middle and latter parts of nine hundred sixteen
at long term Anaconda like strategy really begins to bite. And
part of the reason why is these societies are already straining to the
maximum to just keep their militaries in the field.
00:47:29
And I think it's easy to forget exactly what the strain on the societies you know
was because you look at that we don't we've often compared the size of these modern armies to
what Alexander the Great conquered the known world with back in the you know the three thirty's B.C.E.
Alexander the Great is a Cold War in one of these modern armies
. Listen to what a German Army Corps of which they had dozens in the
Army requires to sustain itself.
00:47:57
Imagine an ancient economy trying to provide this. This is from
Holger her vag and his book on the First World War quote
the army consumed copious amounts of food and fodder.
00:48:11
A single core of thirty five thousand soldiers monthly
devoured one million pounds of meat six hundred thousand loaves of
bread. A hundred eighty nine thousand pounds of fat or he says two hundred
forty two thousand pounds of canned meat and one hundred twenty one thousand pounds of marmalade
and he says seventy three thousand pounds of coffee. It's horses herbing
says needed seven million pounds of oats and more than four million pounds of
hay. The eighteenth Army Corps he says for example estimated that it
needed one thousand wagons extending from nine miles to haul its monthly
allotment of bread. It's butchers slaughtered thirteen hundred twenty cows.
Eleven hundred hogs and forty one hundred fifty eight sheep. Every month
taken as a whole he says. The German army weekly demolished
sixteen million pounds of bread one hundred thirty one million pounds of
potatoes and seventeen million pounds of meat. No one in the government or the
general staff he writes had given serious consideration to such mammoth needs for a
period of four years and quote No no one saw that
coming.
00:49:22
Someone from the ancient world I mean this could never have been sustained before the modern era
but sustaining it took all of those
necessary foodstuffs out of the civilian populations mouth's
and they were beginning to starve because of it.
00:49:41
So the winter of one thousand nine hundred sixty nine hundred seventeen will be remembered by Germans forever as the
turn up winter and that's the winter where the hunger blockade
really bit historian Eric Dorn Brose writes quote
as one thousand sixteen turns in one thousand seventeen caloric intake which had already
begun to fall in late one nine hundred fourteen slid to about a third of pre-war consumption
levels. Money connections and the black market help the lucky ones. But even the
upper crust suffered. Now quoting a noble woman we are all gaunt and
Bony now we have dark shadows around our eyes and our thoughts are chiefly taken up
with wondering where our next meal will be. Brose continues quote pork
had almost disappeared from dinner tables and restaurants where Crow was now served milk
was reserved almost exclusively for young children. Butter and sugar could be purchased only in very
small quantities. Eggs were rationed at two per person per month and turnips
and rutabagas had begun to replace potatoes and quote Bros goes
into a couple of reminisces from Germans about what those tasted like and then says
quote inevitably as nutrition levels fell bodies succumb to a variety of
ailments like rickets scurvy dysentery tuberculosis an
influenza estimates place the number of blockade related deaths by war's end
at seven hundred thirty thousand which makes popular outrage understandable
.
00:51:09
End quote.
00:51:12
Now as with everything in the First World War There are historical dissenters who will challenge
every aspect of what's known as The Hunger blockade affecting the Central Powers. But
nonetheless the important thing to understand is that it creates a dynamic in this
conflict that forces the German side to do
something.
00:51:33
They are the ones continually getting less food. Their adversaries the
British and the French do not have a food insecurity problem. That dynamic
forces the Germans to do something to change their situation or they'll just strangled to death I mean if you're
already living through what Germans are calling the turnip winter in one thousand sixteen
in one thousand seventeen. What are they going to call the next winter of one thousand seven hundred nineteen
eighteen. You don't have to be a genius to see that you now have to do
something to change the state of affairs. A
German public opinion begins to demand it. You know I should point out that that
just pretty much makes them the equal of all the other populations of all the other belligerent
seemingly doesn't seem like anyone's particularly happy with the way their
government is prosecuting the war. Regardless of which country you're talking about at least amongst the
major states in Britain at the end of one thousand nine hundred
eighteen their government falls and the new prime minister who rises
is the very embodiment of what voters would vote for if they wanted to shake things up
and get somebody different in there. His name is David Lloyd George.
Usually just called Lloyd George or feisty Welshman of a much more working
class background than you normally see in these sorts of positions might be exactly what you
know the average dissatisfied with the way the war is going British citizen wanted
.
00:53:00
Now it is a little interesting that only a couple of weeks before Lloyd George gets the job
he's recorded as having said about the allies in Britain we've lost this
war and now he's in charge of Britain's war effort.
00:53:15
It's also interesting to note that you could tell how up in the air the outcome of the First World War
is in one thousand nine hundred eighteen where you could find leading figures on both sides who think their
side has lost the war.
00:53:28
None the less the French also get into the game one thousand six hundred in a terrible year for them too just as
it has been for the British and they finally find the courage to get
rid of their longtime military leader the legend Josef Joffe
. He's been living off the fumes of his reputation from the Battle of the Marne
a long time I think it's safe to say been underperforming and the French finally they can't fire and
he's too much of a legend but they finally sort of kick him upstairs and promote him to a ceremonial post to
replace him with the first new French leader since the war started a guy name and
he's now the Russian population public opinion which isn't really
supposed to have much of a sway. Supposedly because they live in a in a strange sort of
autocracy with a part time legislature but they're making their feelings known
to more on that in a minute. And in Germany the population just
wants a way out of this trap. Some people would like to see efforts made
towards figuring out a way out of the war which they have people who say this
in all the belligerent countries but you have to be careful. A little while ago we talked about
Woodrow Wilson suggesting that people who might oppose his policies were
disloyal. It could get you thrown in the jails in a lot of these belligerent
countries if you appear to be disloyal So too much peace talk could get you in a lot of trouble.
Nonetheless there was a body of German public opinion that was pushing for another outcome
. They wanted their government to take the gloves off or stop
playing nice with the adversary. They wanted
their government to unleash the submarines and to heck with what the Americans would do
to some Germans the American policy looked to be a very conniving way to simply deny
Germany the use of the submarines if you make the rules too restrictive and in the Americans'
case the rule basically was that an American traveling on some ship gives it some
magical protection simply by stepping on board you can't sink that ship now there's an American on it
that pretty much nullifies the submarine for Germany at all. But if that's the
only way you see a chance to end the war with a German victory over the
British What does that mean. Can you let the Americans hamstring you like
that. Add to that the fact that a lot of Germans don't really see the Americans as all that neutral
already and think that maybe Britain could be defeated for six months before the Americans
have a chance to do much of anything.
00:55:56
Add to that the fact that when public opinion veers in that direction there are
Germans in the military high command a majority of them that were already thinking that themselves. Now they
have public opinion on their side. Unleash the submarines.
00:56:09
But what if the Americans come in the war.
00:56:13
There were German leaders though that didn't like this choice and wanted to find
another option rather than you know use the subs get the United States into the war
chief among them was the chancellor of Germany the top political guy his name was Beth in the holding and
we discussed him before this is all by the way very controversy a very complicated very
convoluted you're getting the Dan Carlin condensed potentially unreliable version
of this but it's a fascinating time in the conflict because the
politicians are led by a whole big think they find a way to throw a monkey wrench
into that terrible choice that the allies have sort of foisted the Germans on with the hunger blockade and
everything else they've got to make a move so they make a very unexpected one
.
00:56:59
On December twelfth one thousand nine hundred eighteen Bettman whole vague and the Germans
announce that they are prepared to enter into
negotiations to end the war.
00:57:14
Now it should be pointed out that such calls for peace and discussions about peace have gone
on since the war started. Woodrow Wilson had stepped up pretty much right at the beginning and said
I'll mediate any time you want. There were attempts by both sides in the war to
try to make a separate peace with somebody else and maybe get you know one of the allies of your
enemy to drop out of the war but those are peace terms just to get an edge in the conflict there not peace
terms to end the war. The Germans were making the first apparently serious.
Certainly public offer to sit down and start talking about the issues that
kept the conflict going.
00:57:51
This was a huge shock.
00:57:55
Not exactly to the Wilson administration they've been getting some information fed through some back
channels that the Germans might be ready to do this but the Americans thought that they were going to unleash this big
peace proposal when the Germans do it they preempt Woodrow Wilson's version and he has to
rushes out you know about a week later a little bit miffed that the Germans stole his thunder a
little bit but all of a sudden in December one thousand nine hundred eighteen after this horrible year there were
peace proposals on the table and it puts everybody into a really uncomfortable position.
00:58:25
Now the Germans are taking a real chance by the way by trying this peace proposal route. If
this is a high stakes card game and I often think of the war in in terms like that the Germans
because of the hunger blockade everything else are forced to play a card and everyone thinks they're going to play that really high risk
high reward dangerous car they have the unrestricted submarine warfare card.
00:58:45
Instead they play a potentially equally perilous card but one that no
one's expecting may play the peace card but the peace card can blow up in your face if you don't play it
deftly. Case in point what are your enemies going to think when you become the first
power to come forward and start talking about stopping the war. They're going to think you
need to. What's more there is a danger your own people might think that
too and you spend a lot of effort in this war to stiffen their backbone and keep their resolve in
place. How much are you going to undercut it if you become the first power to seek peace
. So this whole thing has to be worded very carefully and it
is almost in such a way to give you your you know to
give you whiplash as you're moving your neck between the humanitarian side of the
German chancellor's proposals and the side This filled with overwhelming
hubris. The Germans talk about what this war is doing to civilization
and how they'd be willing to get into conversations about ending it but that they're still invincible and they're going to win the
war and they don't need to do this and what would the terms be on the other side maybe you could say
that allies. Historians have argued about the motives
behind this ever since but the truth of the matter is if you look at this like a card game there were
some good reasons for the Germans to play that piece card. Whether or not it was
realistic and whether or not the other side accepted it and some
historians say this was what it was intended to do the whole time provide some diplomatic
cover for the start of the unleashing of the submarines to go and say
hey we'll talk about peace then when it's rejected be able to turn around to your
own people and say you know you better give up those hopes of uneasy peace we just tried
they won't do it this is a fight to the end stiffing yourself and also to show the world including the
neutrals and including the people on the other side of the war's population that we're not the ones keeping this
carnage going.
01:00:43
It could have been over but your side wants to keep fighting it most
especially is an attempt to maybe influence public
opinion in the neutral countries especially the most important neutral country the United States which has
so many German Americans in it that there are more than five hundred in twenty German
language newspapers as we said. What do you think the editorials are going to be in
those newspapers after Germany makes a peace proposal and the Allies swat it
down.
01:01:13
That's going to put some pressure on the U.S. government to stay out of the war too and that's going to influence American
public opinion over who the bad guys and who the good guys are. That may have been the overriding
intention of this German peace effort but nobody knows.
01:01:26
It may have been a serious attempt to at least start negotiations
going and to take a position that didn't make you seem too vulnerable at the outset.
01:01:35
The Germans picked the right time to do it it was right after the capital mania fell to the Central Powers So
they're they're negotiating from a position of strength here and the Allies swat it
down they have to.
01:01:49
The problem with asking these powers to state publicly what their war aims are
in order to create a peace is to show that the war aims of these powers have gotten
so out of hand that they bear no resemblance to anything that could be negotiated
.
01:02:05
As historian Gwynne Dyer wrote and as we may have called it already on this program quote
what the governments of Europe found themselves trapped in the first total war discovered to their
dismay was that if the means used to fight the war are total then so must be the
engines. It was almost impossible to stop short of total victory for one side and
unconditional surrender for the other and quote the old.
A territorial exchanges and the paying of reparations
and the you know giving up or acquiring of colonies was a
nineteenth century sort of war aim it sounded out of place in the twentieth century
if the British or the French or the Germans or anyone had said that their war aims involve a little
change a territory and a little reparations money or what have you it would have seemed so out of
proportion to the cost that there would be real danger that the public would
think that what the country was fighting for wasn't worth what the public was paying for it
. In addition to that of course there were some
Craven territorial ambitions involved and no one wanted to state those in
fact both sides had promised other peoples territories to allies
of theirs. For example the Italians were promised territory
from the Austrian Garion Empire once the war was over. The British couldn't very well say that
was a war aim and still not look like cynical games been in this war when
everyone by the way on all these sides is a cynical game. But you can't
show that to the public what's more the idea of war aims that stopped short of defeating
the enemy unconditionally clashed with your propaganda.
This is a war that using such twentieth century ideas as a war to
end all wars and a war to make the world
safe for democracy. It's not a war to acquire a few colonies on the Mediterranean and
some oil in the Middle East in the break up of the Australia Garion empire. It's a war for these
high minded ideals the problem is if your propaganda portrays the Germans as the second coming of
the Mongols. Well actually the Huns is the word the propaganda use and they're baby
killers and nurse executioners and nun Raper is and all the things the
propaganda makes them out to be. How can you possibly sit down and sign a piece of paper to
compromise with them and have peace again when the Vatican
was at this time trying to help create the conditions where peace could happen.
The Vatican kept telling the powers to live up to those pre-war agreements to make war
less horrible and they were saying that they were favoring this not because
they were idealists but because if these powers kept doing
everything in their you know might to destroy one another they were going to hate each other so much that there
was going to be no space unrest mutual respect left to carve out a piece later
. The Germans were no happier by the way to state their war aims
publicly for the exact same reasons. Now there was an
implied threat included when the Germans came forward with this attempt to get negotiations
started and the implied threat was if negotiations didn't happen and weren't
fruitful they would play the unrestricted submarine warfare card
. The peace negotiations are over by the end of
January in the middle of January actually on January twentieth. Wilson makes a
famous speech a speech where he calls for peace without
victory in his so-called peace without
victory speech on the twenty second of January when essentially he already knew
that it wasn't going to happen. Wilson lays down the kind of peace that Europe will have to broker to end the
first world war if it's to be a lasting peace it can't be one of those pieces you know where
the knife is turned and one side is left hating the other when you think about how the First
World War ended and how it sowed the seeds for the second world war. Wilson sounds
like Nostradamus was some of the things he says in this part of the speech where he talks about you know
having to have this kind of peace. He says quote. I'm seeking only to face
realities and to face them without soft concealments. Victory would mean
peace forced upon the loser of Victor's terms imposed upon the
vanquished.
01:06:27
It would be accepted in humiliation under duress at an intolerable
sacrifice and would leave a sting a resentment a bitter memory upon which
terms of peace would rest not permanently but only as upon quicksand.
Only a peace between equals can last only a peace the very principle of which is
equality and a common participation in a common benefit the right state of
mind the right feeling between nations. It is necessary for a lasting peace
as is a just settlement a vexed questions of territory or of racial and national
allegiance.
01:07:02
End quote.
01:07:04
So he's not only calling for a peace where nobody can claim a
victory we just stop fighting and begin negotiating for a
post-war world in which Wilson and envisions a new
international global structure to enforce
global peace and harmony so that we never have a first world war again as I said for
those historians who suggest that Wilson is out to make Wilson the biggest historical figure
he came in. That would be a heck of a legacy if he could pull that off.
01:07:38
But instead within a couple of months the United States will be in the war
. And from the Allied perspective not a moment too
soon.
01:07:50
The end of one thousand sixteen early one nine hundred seventeen and we've been spending quite a bit
of time setting this period in the war but this period
in the war is probably the most important six months in the last hundred years
.
01:08:06
People talk about the First World War as this transformative moment and the after effects that we're living with
you know even now all around us. But the most transformative moment in that
conflict is what's about to happen now. And you know I can't
help but find some sort of metaphor or analogy approach to looking at it but I mean it's like we have this tree
and they've been shopping that it for two years and at the end in one thousand nine hundred sixty finally the tree falls over
. Winston Churchill says three ingredients acting together create what he
calls the second climax of the war. In this period
we've dealt with two of those ingredients the Americans and the submarine question. The
third ingredient involves Russia.
01:08:50
Up till now I think it's pretty obvious in this episode we've been dealing with what you could safely call the
first great powers the countries that were at the top of everything
when the war started. The rich powerful cohesive unified you know top of the
line states the Frances the Britains The Germany's. But if they're worn
down by you know this many years of this war to this
point to where they are now where the Germans are undernourished for lack of a
more provocative term what must be the situation that the
countries that want first rate powers in the war started the ones that had challenges and were struggling in
various areas. How are two years of war treating them
. Well the Italians have open disagreements
about peace in their government in the trenches there
are pamphlets distributed by socialists that say next winter
not another man in the trenches.
01:09:50
The generals are not very pleased with that but it's hard to blame the Italians they're on like their tenth or eleventh
battle of the sons of a river fighting over this torture rist mountainous terrain
which creates an environment you know it's a little teeny horrible war in enough itself with
all these unique things I mean just to give you one example. In the mountain war that the Italians are
fighting the Austrian carries when shells hit they were all carved into rock I mean instead of
trenches a lot of times they've blown out like chasms for cover but when the
shells hit the rocks the rocks just splinter creating like a secondary amount of
shrapnel that's just horrifying and then when you get wounded your way up at six seven thousand
feet you've got to be brought down through you know mountainous Alpine conditions to the nearest weigh station that
they still find frozen things up there even today. It's a horrible conflict and
by nine hundred sixteen The Italians are on like their tenth or eleventh version of it
and all they have to show for it is more and more dead people. They wouldn't be human if they weren't starting to get
a little fed up with this in fact that just puts them on par with how it seems. The
populations of all the belligerent countries are doing now House Austria-Hungary doing
Remember they're the ones that you know kind of are at ground zero when this whole war got started.
They're the ones who had the Archduke they got himself assassinated they're the ones that you know sent that
uncompromising letter to the Serbians they're the ones that sparked this war how are they doing.
Well I bet they wish they hadn't. They're in terrible shape. The venerable emperor
that ruled there for so long the benign face of stability had finally died to
be succeeded by the next emperor who's a much
younger man and who looks at his country and says to the Germans this war has to end in one thousand
seventeen.
01:11:33
I mean Austria-Hungary is worse than done
.
01:11:39
This new emperor during this coming year we'll go behind the Germans back to the Allies
reportedly and try to sort of sell them out and the Germans find out
about it and then they're never going to take their eyes off Austria-Hungary again all of a sudden you know these brothers in arms don't
trust each other anymore. It was a very interesting move that a lot of people talked about. It's
it's almost like World War one's version of Rudolf Hess flying to Great Britain you know to make a
separate piece for you know Nazi Germany in the Second World War just this weird little endeavor and all it does is
earn Austria-Hungary Germany's mistrust and then you have
the Russians.
01:12:17
Now the Russians from the very start of this war even before this war for a very long time
have been this contradiction in power in one sense they are
massively powerful in the military sense theoretically they are terrifying
and yet they are at the same time so fatally flawed in the
underpinnings that anything Russia is doing in this war always seems to be like riding some
rail or or walking a tight rope and disaster loomed at any moment it just it
was an unsteady sort of situation. There's a story that sort of shows
this this contradiction in terms of the military leader the Russian military leader
Brasil off you'll have an offensive named after him in one thousand sixteen we talked about it
nowhere near as much as it deserves. In the last program this
once again puts the Russians out there in a good light shows you what they can do when they get
their act together and they are devastating seven hundred fifty thousand casualties on
the Austrian Darian army.
01:13:17
I mean essentially mortally wounded them. It is frightening what the Russians can do
you know when things go the right way. But Brazil love tells a story that shows you just how
fatally in a compromised everything is you know how rotten the insides are he says
.
01:13:32
At the height of this offensive when everything's going so well he's receiving unsigned
letters from his own soldiers telling him that if the fighting doesn't stop
soon they're going to kill him.
Russia has been having internal problems for
decades now.
01:13:54
The current Czar Nicholas the second bizarre bizarre is not even
his writing he's the Emperor of Russia bizarre as the old name that goes back hundreds of years but they still call him
that because that's essentially what the office still is in his name.
01:14:08
His official long title it says he's the autocrat and even if the
Russian Duma has been given one percent and the Tsar still has ninety nine percent of the power
he is a an example of the old world at its most
royal and yet he knows how
frightfully fragile the underpinnings are.
01:14:31
When he was a mere adolescent he saw his grandfather
carried into the royal palace with his legs torn to
shreds is growing on his stomach ripped out and his face mangled
and he's bleeding out on the royal carpet and the royal family including
Nicholas the second the man who will be Nicholas the second watch their grandfather die it takes about
fifteen minutes.
01:14:57
He had been killed in an assassination.
01:15:01
Another one of these stories where you know the Czar is out in his bulletproof sled
and an M. a bomber throws a bomb it sounds a little like the whole Sarajevo thing that kicked out the first floor. A
bomber throws a bomb the bomb goes off kills people who are not the target the target comes
out in this case the Czar comes out to look around and there's another bomber in the crowd
supposedly bizarre at the time it said something about you know thank God that nothing happened and
the other assassin as he's throwing the bomb at him saying it's a little too early to thank God.
Boom and he bleeds out in the Royal Palace floor while the czar who
will be commanding Russia as the autocrat in the First World War
as a thirteen or fourteen year old boy watches he knows how dangerous the job
is and he knows that there's a violent current
of rottenness that opposes his system and he's dealing with it all the time.
01:15:57
One of the things that makes this story so interesting though is when you're dealing with one person
with almost total power as we said earlier there are little
idiosyncrasies make a big impact on history
.
01:16:12
In the case of Nicholas the second the Autocrat of all the Russian was right
his idiosyncrasies involve some things that I think
most people out there who have children can at least relate to a little bit
of.
01:16:28
It's interesting that there's a part to this story that just has a
personal tragedy wrapped up in it. I mean this is an example why you
can't reduce history to some sort of mathematical equation or some
sort of predictable set of rules or there are human beings involved here
.
01:16:48
In the case of the Czar It's a fascinating story the man just so you know I
mean this is how Europe was this is the old Europe that's being destroyed. He's the first or second
cousin with everybody.
01:17:00
He's the first cousin with the king of England he's the second cousin with the Emperor of Germany
and he's related to everybody and his wife is the first cousin of the King
of England I mean a little incestuous Maybe but
that explains why the Czar and his wife mourn her in a
second who only have one son give birth to a son
who's a hemophiliac.
01:17:28
It runs in the family. Queen Victoria who's sort of the descendant that all these
people can trace their heritage back to said that this did not run in her family but it seemed
to Victoria of course was German in her roots.
01:17:42
So it was the Czar's wife the czarina.
01:17:45
Alexandra both of them loved each other
and I say this because you know you would think today well of course they did but listen this is an era where
especially among its nobility you often had very political marriages. You also had these very old
fashioned things that were very common back then with a husband or wife really didn't love each other when the husband was out you know with all the
girls although it wasn't like that with Nicholas and Alexandra this is what this was a love story and it
really was and not just between the two of them but with their children too.
01:18:14
They loved their children the way we think of every modern person loving their children or the
way they should and that is not to say that people in the past didn't. Although you find a lot of
examples in the royal families throughout history where the father hardly sees the sun It's not like
that with these guys. They take an active day to day role in their parenting
and they wrote letters to each other constantly and they wrote in English which
they both spoke well the Czarina was German but but she spoke Russian she spoke
English bizzar spoke everything and they communicated in more than a thousand letters with each other where
you get a real feel for these people. And one of the things that they are absolutely terrified
about is their son who's got hemophilia. He's their
only son he's the next czar and he is almost
certainly going to die young from this disease.
01:19:06
And I just you know hemophilia is a disease where your blood doesn't clot not to get too technical because I
couldn't explain it anyway but basically any little cut or
bruise has the potential to spiral out of control the normal in a rough and
tumble of a of a young child's life will kill you.
01:19:25
And in this era especially parents just assumed almost a death sentence
. And these two parents as any parents we would think of today probably could hardly handle that
thought and they were looking around for cures and trying to find them and eventually
they found someone who seemed to be able to fix their son
. And because of the little idiosyncrasy connected to who this person
tended to be world history is completely altered.
01:19:55
And the funny part about it is I don't know it's a tragic story it's an interesting story the
very human story but there are elements to it that would make a good in a
sitcom or a good movie premise and as I walked in to talk about this
today I remembered a movie that was kind of based on that premise and it had Nick Nolte in it it was called Down and
Out in Beverly Hills and the story is about a vagrant kind of homeless kind of guy who by
hook or by crook ends up you know in living with a rich family in Beverly Hills a few
really fabulously rich family and of course because of the dichotomy in their lifestyles in the way they view the
world hilarity ensues right.
01:20:31
But that's kind of what happened with Azhar and his wife and their hemophiliac son
when they found somebody who seemed to be able to heal him that somebody was basically the
equivalent of the vagrant in Down and Out in Beverly Hills.
01:20:46
They were bringing a peasant in to have a look at their
sick son.
01:20:53
It has its name was Grigori Rasputin and history has always
been I mean he's a hardcore history personality if you've ever found one.
01:21:04
And the fact that this government was run ninety nine percent
by one guy and his wife opens up the door to a
Grigori Rasputin being able to have the effect on history he had
.
01:21:19
Historian Peter Hart does a good job of framing all the various things that seem to be going on at
once including what I just talked about the way Russia is sort of a giant but
hamstrung by this this ancient system of theirs so that a guy like Rasputin could make
a difference in the secrecies of a single individual or two could come to the fore.
01:21:38
He writes quote The Russian home front was gradually collapsing under the
intolerable strain of war. The czarist government did not have the flexibility
necessary to cope with the plague of economic political and social problems
that infected the land. The Czar himself perceived any form of democracy as a threat to
his regime. And rather than introducing an increased measure of liberalism I was
more attracted to the idea of a total dissolution of even the tokenistic Duma.
The appointments to positions of considerable authority were routinely assigned by the Czar
on the grounds of either naked favoritism or the authoritarian credentials of the
candidate. Spies scares rage through society with particular suspicion falling
on any Russian general. I'm fortunate enough to have a Germanic name. Meanwhile
incompetence and corruption blossomed unfettered while at the center the czar was publicly
embarrassed by the adherence of the Czarina Alexandra to the ludicrous cult of
Rasputin's and unhinged religious mystic with a penchant for a religious
pursuit. The whole despotic system of government was resting on just a few
weak individuals. Russia was being hollowed out from within and the vacuum at
the center was creating dangerous instability.
01:22:53
End quote.
01:22:56
You know everything that Peter Hart says right there could have applied to several other countries
in the story. Everything except one thing.
01:23:05
The part dealing with Rasputin Grigori Rasputin is a great
wild card in the story in a quintessentially Russian figure and he's it's hard to
imagine him anywhere else and he is outrageous and larger than life
and I think Peter Hart as great a historian as he is he sounds a little bit like he can't understand
you know the Czarina the wife of the Czar kind of falling for this guy and his shtick he calls
it the ludicrous Rasputin cult.
01:23:33
I mean if you had her here to ask her she would probably say to you but I saw him do
it multiple times do what save my son's
life. If you saw somebody save your kids' life multiple
times don't you think it would be hard to have your logic override
what you think you saw. I've seen cold
hearted total realists turn into people seeking quack
remedies when they were dying of cancer. They were looking for hope. If your
kid is dying you're looking for hope. What if somebody actually comes through.
I mean what if that quack treatment for your relative's
terminal cancer cure the cancer.
01:24:22
That's the weirdness in this story that the royal family the emperor and his wife
run into this guy Grigori Rasputin first in one thousand or five
ten years before the time period we are in the story and there's an entry by the
Czar in his diary we met a man of God today and so starts this
relationship between this person who was born a poor peasant in
Siberia you know an educated everything and his relationship
with two of the most royal figures in the world. I mean when you think of the king and queen of England
that's the level we're talking about with the Czar and Czarina imagine today's Queen of England who has no power
at all. Picking up some person off the street who's almost homeless and not even a London homeless
person someone from the sticks up in the north of England somewhere some small town bringing them in the
palace and having them live with you for a while and sort of questioning them on the state of
things and what are the people saying and and oh yeah letting the minister
medicinally to your child.
01:25:23
It's a crazy story and the only reason Rasputin becomes important you can hardly imagine him
important in most of the other systems of government. But because Russia is so
autocratic.
01:25:33
If you captured Azhar you capture the country.
Putin made the royal family emotional hostages
.
01:25:44
Now whether that was intentional or otherwise is debatable historians disagree
. There are some historians who think this is a person who thought he was a blessed man of God with
these special powers to do you know religious oriented things. And others say he's a charlatan and he
knew he had the royal couple sort of emotionally blackmail but there was nothing anyone could do about
it. There's a great quote from Azhar. You know in the middle of the story with Rasputin where
one of his advisors says something to the effect of you've got to get rid of this guy. And the czars answer is
there's nothing I can do about it.
01:26:16
And a lot of historians have always interpreted that to mean that the Czar is basically saying he can't
stand up to his wife you know that she wants him and there's nothing that the Czar can do we won't stand up to this
wife. But you know some historians have come out recently and said you know it could easily mean there's
nothing he can do about it because there's only one person who can save their son's life the heir to the throne
by the way if you really believe that this rescue guy's got you in a weird
position. Between one thousand and five when the Zarin Rasputin first meet
and where we are in this story right now. Late one nine hundred sixteen Rasputin has
been worming his way into the Czar's family pretty
consistently now his circle of friends his family bizarre while these get together
sometimes ruins him and his wife and his kids and Rasputin.
Now there are back steps. Sometimes the relationship goes sour for a while usually because Rasputin
it was a surreal misbehaves or does something particularly outrageous
either embarrassing the Tsar so much that that he does what his underlings are continually
telling him to do and sends Rasputin away or legitimately upsetting him
. Nonetheless every time he manages to break the relation break up. I guess you could say with
Rasputin inevitably alexy his son the heir to the throne will get sick
again necessitating a return of Rasputin. He's like a cigarette
habit you can't kick. Now this Rasputin character is fascinating on so
many levels. You know you have to think you were dealt some interesting cards by fate
to be able to parlay your gifts from his upbringing as a
as and an educated peasant with no money in the middle of nowhere to where
you are in the royal family and when you see a
picture of him you see a little bit of it. I mean he was five foot nine inches
tall pretty normal. He had dark black
oily hair parted in the middle unkempt
moustache unkempt beard interesting way of dressing. I mean if you if you would photoshop his picture
on to the back of any number of one nine hundred seventy S. heavy metal albums I don't think I would be able to
look at the band's photo on the back and know that you did it he would have fit in perfectly as the bassist of
any number of bands from back then. Heck if he were a lead singer and you named the band
after him it would fit in on any lineup you could think of it as the heavy metal
festival when did I mean you know this weekend only Black Sabbath Iron Maiden Motorhead and
Rasputin's.
01:28:48
He had the most amazing eyes and you can tell because normally you can't tell
from photos one hundred years ago you know certain qualities of individuals it just gets lost
through the layers of fuzziness and black and white and all that but if you catch the
right photo arrest Puni had to be here to be caught just the right time you can see what the
eyes were like because they jump out of the black and white photo from one hundred years ago at you even
now the whites of his eyes were said by witnesses to be extra white. And
again it kind of looks that way in some of the photos. His eye color dazzle people to the point where we have
multiple descriptions that all contradict each other. Some people say blue Some people say BROWN Some people say gray
Some people say multi-colored.
01:29:29
When you read about his sort of tic like way of
walking moving his nervous habits the way he wouldn't talk for a while then all of a sudden you get this
this stream of sometimes unrelated conversation spiced with sexual
innuendos. I mean there's a party that things I mean I just read a book on the late writer Hunter Thompson. They
sound like in a room together they would look like they were impersonating each other
Rasputin's a combination of a person who looks to be a very
devout religious figure from Russia's
Christianity an Orthodox Christian and a drunken Al raiser.
01:30:08
And apparently that's not that unusual in in the Russian tradition especially in the
Siberian tradition where rescues from there are some offshoots
and sects and cults who have these interesting beliefs and I don't understand them and we would try to
explain them but apparently it involves needing to seen sometimes in order to get the right kind
of repentance working for you and there are rumors of orgies that
take place as part of the rights for these religions and some historians not most but some have
tied rescue into some of those strange sex and strange beliefs and it
would make sense in one in one sense though because there's there are conversations that have been recorded
with his wife and yes he was married you know when she would walk past him and in the middle of a town
with other women and they would all see him having sex in the open with some towns woman she would say
something to the effect of Oh that's just his cross to bear.
01:30:59
He's got to do that you know I mean like he didn't want to just he has to do that that's that's
why he's helping those people.
01:31:07
I'm sure if I was rescued and I would want to sell it that way let's put it that way
to gossip column type offenses that he's always
tarred with are are extreme drunkenness and sexual outrageousness
and usually in combination with each other. There are rape charges
that are brought to the Zarin Zareen as attention with a household staff is accusing him of going after them.
01:31:32
He's absolutely brazen he will sit down next to a figure from the royal family
and put his arm around her at a party with all the aristocrats there and start moving in on her
. There are stories that you have to know that the Tsar's Arina knew he was this way because at these
family gatherings I mentioned earlier where they're all sitting there and it's just him in the family he'll sit next to the
princesses who are all adolescent girls during this time period and they will jump up like they've
been you know prodded with a hot needle because he's goosing them and feeling
them in front of the Czar and czarina.
01:32:05
And yet at the same time some of this stuff is passed off as
just part of his rustic peasant charm isn't it cute that he doesn't know how inappropriate that
is. Like I said some of these people in Russia's aristocracy hated him but those who
didn't kind of had a reaction like he was some sort of exotic thing that the zoo brought in
and you have to make allowances for what he doesn't understand. He might not know you can't just walk up and touch some
noble woman's breast at dinner and how how funny and interesting it is. Isn't he
outrageous you know that kind of an attitude.
01:32:36
But he was fun and historian Joseph Ermine has written two books on Rasputin points that out
quote Rasputin was fun it was a pleasure to be in his company.
He gave people nicknames and they were often cutting and quite appropriate. He might double
woman hot stuff Boss Lady sexy girl or good
looking while a man would be called Fancy Pants big breeches long
hair or fella. People accepted this is a charming characteristic. The
humor of a peasant who meant no disrespect.
01:33:08
End quote.
01:33:10
So the people that didn't hate Rasputin would often you know overlook his
outrageousness and consider that part of you know his charm his rustic peasant
Charmin. Nonetheless sometimes it was a little too much even for the Czar there's
been famous incidents and they all end up in the local media believe it or not Russia had a tabloid
media during this time period and Rasputin was one of their staple you
know figures. I mean back in my day everyone of them had to have an Elizabeth Taylor story or a
Michael Jackson story or something like that. Kim Kardashian probably did a
back then in Russia if you didn't have a rescue the story you know every so often
I mean you were worried about circulation dropping.
01:33:51
And just when you think there'd be no new news you get roaring drunk in a in a high falutin restaurant in the
capital city starts yelling about how he knows the Czar and then pulls his pants down and whip
his genitals out of the restaurant. Word like that gets around in the tabloids heated up at
one point the Czar had to tell the tabloids that they couldn't mention his name anymore so they just started
referring to him as the guy who lives on. So in some street whatever street he lived on
and everyone in the public just knew who they meant.
There were cartoons that made the rounds showing Rasputin
with his hand on the naked breast of the Czarina implying with a lot
of people wondered about this relationship although it's almost certainly not true. If
rescue is going around town sleeping with everything that moves from peasants to royal women as
well. What's he doing with the czarina.
01:34:46
There are even whisperings and one public charge made that the
heir to the throne the Czar's son is really Rasputin son
almost certainly not true but the more gossip circulated with that kind of talk the more
undermined you know people's trust in the Czar and czarina.
01:35:06
Remember this arena is already German at a time when the Russian people are hounding
Russian generals who just have German last names.
01:35:13
What happens if you are German and the Czar is not around and this strange
Russian peasant who seems like a Svengali is I mean there were protests in one thousand nine
hundred fifteen where the people were saying down with Rasputin down with Alexandra
. He's not an unknown quantity. Everyone realizes he's almost a public figure
. They debate him in the legislature and the powers that be want him
gone. There's a story during this time period about one of the ways they tried to get him
out. It's a famous story one day Rasputin hears a knock at his door
. He goes to the door and there's a man standing there with a package and he gives Rasputin the package and
Rasputin opens the package and it's full of photos and our street looks at the photos and there are photos
of him unconscious insensible due to drink
and there are naked women all around him. Night photos
of the man at the door gave him the package says either you leave town and go back to where you came from and
stop talking and influencing bizarre or we're going to give these pictures to him
it was an extortion attempt and I'm one of the Knights apparently that rescued and had passed out
from drink his enemies have hired prostitutes and position them around him naked and started
taking photos to blackmail him.
01:36:31
In typical unexpected fashion Rasputin took the photos straight to bizarre and sort
of you know threw myself on the mercy of the court.
01:36:40
Now a lot of the time Rasputin's able to skate away with no real repercussions
. Sometimes he's not as we said occasional riffs would develop between Mazhar and
Rasputin's. One of them for example that went on in one thousand twelve is a perfect example of how
hard it was for the Czar to stay away from Rasputin in one thousand twelve they have one of
these disagreements others are Sens Rasputin back to Siberia. The royal family goes on a
vacation in September one thousand twelve to their country Palace. They're playing around in the
young heir to the throne alexy jumps in a boat. He's about seven or eight years old. Not
unusual not unusual for seven or eight year old to land wrong and hurt themselves but most
of the seven or eight year olds Of course not hemophiliac so it instantly becomes a problem there's a giant
Hema Tama in his lower abdomen they take him back to the palace and they had a terrible scare
. He gets very ill very bad takes about a month for him to
start to recover. And as he's just starting to turn the corner and I've never understood this. His
mother there's are enough things to be great to take him a little carriage ride and it's a bumpy road and they hit
some bump and he cries out in pain and something's happened inside him. They take him back to the palace
and now they have one of the most horrific periods of their life starting
because this kid starts to die and it takes a while and it's
very painful and the parents are watching it. When the kids'
fever skyrockets the pain becomes so terrible he's delirious and slipping in and out of
consciousness I read somewhere that opium is used in the past sometimes
for people in the heir to the throne's condition but they don't use it for him and the screams are so
terrible that we're told the palace staff has to stuff cotton in their ears to walk around to deal with it
. The parents like I said loving real hands on parents take their
turn at his bedside and he's begging for help Yes he's
saying Lord have mercy on me was one of the things recorded over and over and over again.
Help me the pain. And we're told that when the parents
shifted the beds I was over they would walk out of the room just burst into tears. Bizarre said
that. Zarina handled the ordeal better than he did. At a
certain point the doctors run out of things to do. They tell the parents there's nothing more they can do.
It becomes apparent to the parents and to the patient that he's dying and he
starts talking about those things that destroy parents I mean that you never want to hear
your little kid saying he's he's saying when I die will the pain be gone to his mother. He asked
that after he dies they build this little shrine in the woods for him at a Stones
and then the reality of the situation sets in and they start putting together a public statement to tell the
Russian people that the heir to the throne has died the last
rites are performed. And while at a
meeting the Czar gets a hands scrawled note from his wife saying Come
quickly I think it's time the boys about to die at the last minute
the Czarina pens a note to arrest Putin off in Siberia essentially saying
help. And she gets a cable the next morning. It's a famous cable and it
lets a little air out of the tires that it's not as good according to historian Joseph erm And as we
always thought it was the cable was always thought to say God
is seeing your tears and heard your prayers.
01:40:01
Do not grieve the little one will not die. Do not allow the doctors to bother him
too much.
01:40:07
End quote.
01:40:09
The Russians Doreen Alexander spirit of age apparently says there was there were two
notes but the one that was misquoted really said quote fear nothing. The illness
is not as dangerous as they're saying. See that the doctors do not bother him and quote
by that afternoon the boy is out of pain and is able to sleep in
the fever starts dropping the doctors are stunned that it should be pointed out they
hate Rasputin but they were forced I mean there are several of them quoted in the infirm ans
latest book is written two books on Rasputin and they're just they don't know what to even make of
it and and it wasn't just this time they would be trying to stop the boy from bleeding in past incidents
and Rasputin would come up and they would watch him stop it and historians have been trying
to find explanations for this ever since. I mean I've heard everything from
hypnosis to the power of suggestion to drugs too. One theory is
that they were giving the young Tsar aspirin which was like the new wonder drug back then
and that of course would have been the worst thing to give them and when Rasputin's says don't let the doctors bother him too
much they stop giving him the aspirin. Some people have suggested that there was some potion Rasputin
had that sort of kept the boy you know in a bad state any time he wanted to you know put a
little emotional pressure on the royal family there's all kinds of theories but.
01:41:27
If you're the Czarina and you've already seen rescued and save your son's life
several times and he just pulled him back from the brink of death by
telegram. Don't you think you'd stop caring about the
wherefores and the what ifs and just not want this guy to leave your side
.
01:41:47
Czar of Russia was in the process of kicking his Rasputin's habit he fell off the
wagon after that nine hundred twelve you know pull your son back from the brink of death
moment.
01:41:59
Now here's the thing rest puton wasn't a problem
because he kept healing the heir to the throne. If he had stuck to that.
01:42:09
Probably we don't even talk about him very much. Of course the reason we do talk about him
the reason he's a famous figure the reason half of Russia wants him dead is because he's not sticking to
fixing the air. He's meddling in policy. In a funny way
too. I can see how that happened. I'm not so appalled I mean if you if you if you look at this from the
Czar and Czarina his vantage point and you think this guy has something there's a
reason I think he's a man of God that God favors him in the prophetic and if you'd
seen what she'd seen Wouldn't you think so maybe to win if you thought that. Wouldn't you want to
use this guy like a magic eight ball especially with the
stakes as high as they are for the czar at this time I mean when the first world war breaks out when the
Romanov Dynasty is threatened when millions of lives hinge on the decision Azhar
makes. How tempting would it be you know to just sort of ask Rasputin what
he thought about this appointment or that idea. Should I go to the front and command
from the front line sources say yes. And that's the event by the way
the Czar going to command at the front lines which opens up the door to turbo
charging Rasputin's influence and really assuring Russia into the terminal
phase of the end of the Romanov Dynasty is what happens is you know the terrible losses
against the Central Powers that the Russians had suffered the Czar thought the
people might need a scapegoat and he altruistically offered himself up as a
sacrificial lamb. He thinks he's going to go to the front his advisors think this is a terrible idea with
lots of downsides but Rasputin likes the idea. Therefore by the way the Czarina likes the
idea at one point the czars wavering and thinks maybe he shouldn't do it Rasputin you know bolsters his
confidence that it's a good idea and so bizarre leaves the capital and goes to kind of close to the
front lines and all of a sudden the Czarina is left in charge of the day to day activities
and she's using rest Putin like a magic eight ball like you wouldn't believe.
01:44:07
You can read it in the letters back and forth between the Tsar and his wife because she'll inform him what's going on
she calls Rasputin our friend.
01:44:13
That's the code name for him and she'll say to the Czar our friend thinks we should do this our
friend doesn't like that legislator our friend thinks that appointment job should go to this person and they'll debate it
back and forth and Rasputin is making huge decisions for
Russia's future in war time when things are deteriorating badly in bread
riots are happening and and dissatisfaction is is palpably on the rise and demonstrations are
occurring and he's drinking twelve bottles of wine a day at Wake up
.
01:44:44
Don't think the belligerent powers of the other countries aren't aware of it either. The British Secret
Service is monitoring according to stories like Joseph Erman monitoring
Rasputin. They have a nickname for him a code name they call him dark forces and
many things about Rasputin troubled and they're not sure he's not a German agent.
01:45:03
They think he's unstable certainly they think he is in favor of some sort of
peace deal to get Russia out of the war there's a lot of reasons they don't kind of like him but this
problem is becoming acute and some noblemen apparently take it
upon themselves to rid Russia of this cancer which is the
way they see Rasputin. They decide to kill him.
01:45:27
Now when we reach this point we're actually caught up with the story timeline
again. It's December nine hundred sixteen where we left off before our little Russian
digression. You know that time with the submarines and the peace deals on the table and the
questions about the U.S. getting into the war or not.
01:45:45
In December one thousand sixteen rumors are flying in the capital
that rest of Putin's going to be killed and there's so pervasive
Rasputin's hears them allegedly his children hear them too and they hide his clothes so
he can't go out. Nonetheless even with those rumors flying
he can't resist and this is the traditional story this is a Kennedy assassination type thing. And
good luck finding the truth I'm just giving you the most common story here.
Apparently a nobleman offers his wife to arrest
Putin you know nice little clandestine arrangement after a party or something like that.
Rest Putin takes the guy up on the offer he's a nobleman Felix you sell pot is his name
I think he's so rich he has more money than the ruling dynasty and he's working with a bunch of other
men it's a true conspiracy nobody knows how deeply there are some who think the British Secret Service was even
in on it. The majority don't you stop off meets
Rasputin kind of at his door brings him down into the basement of Yankee Doodle to
tie this story together wonderfully is playing on the phonograph upstairs that they can
hear. So you get this little American tune playing in this story as as Russia
reaches the terminal phase here in the Romanov dynasty. There's food on the
table there's wine. The rendezvous is a little pushback you stop
obsessively sit there and eat the food they drink the wine and after a while you stop
off begins to freak out because he's laced all these
things with cyanide.
01:47:21
And this guy does not die.
01:47:24
He says he has throats bothering him a little stomach's bothering him a little but he says he's sitting there
drinking more eating more and asking Is so after seeing for him I like your singing voice you
so Bob excuses himself goes upstairs to where the other conspirators are and freaks out what are we going to
do. Finally one of them decides they should shoot him and you suppose got a
pistol. So you sort of goes down there. Tells rescue to look at something on the wall over
there and then when Rasputin turns around the pistols pointed at him. You support says he said you know
say your prayers or something like that shot him in the chest he screams and he falls down on the rug
frothing at the mouth convulsions dies. The
assassins all come downstairs have a look at the body the blood everything. Go
upstairs to commiserate about it for a while and then we're told that the assassin you sort of
wants to have another look at the body and so he goes downstairs and
Joseph Irving the historian quoting some original sources in his quote talks about
what happened when you sort of went down there to just make sure that nothing was
amiss.
01:48:27
Furman writes quote.
01:48:29
He found Rasputin lying in the same position on the floor. Overcome with a terrible
inner rage. You sort of grabbed arrest Putin by the shoulders and shook him as he
stared into rest Putin's face. First one eye and then the other suddenly opened
and in the source he's quoting says greenish and snake guide. They fix the prince with an
expression of satanic hatred Rasputin's stumbled to his feet foaming at
the mouth roaring in anger and wildly clawing at the air as he rushed toward you saw
full of blood dripping from his mouth. He grabbed the prince by the shoulder ripping in a
pellet from his uniform. Rest Butin was reportedly growling his tormentors name in
a low guttural voice.
01:49:10
End quote.
01:49:11
It's like a zombie and you stop office screaming.
01:49:15
I mean everybody runs downstairs when they hear the struggle going on and you stop of the screaming about the time everybody gets
downstairs Rasputin has lurched into the snowbound courtyard and is running
away and he's yelling you so fast first name who is also the prince it's Prince use up
of Felix Felix. I'll tell the story to everything. You know he's going to
tattle on the prince for trying to kill him and people open
fire the prince among others at rescue and as he flees misses him a couple times then hits him
somewhere in the back and then they run up to the you know body that's on the ground and they put a
bullet through his forehead.
01:49:51
Then we're told they wrap him up in a tie him up then wrap him up in a carpet then go to a nearby
river where there's ice and throw him through a hole in the ice and you know hope he
floats to Finland.
01:50:03
Of course he does and they find him in a few days.
01:50:06
They dragged the body out and the myth of this story and again it's so much better with the myth
is that during the autopsy they found water in his lungs and his body untied as
though he had freed himself and only at the end drowned so the cyanide edema didn't work they
shot him multiple times it didn't work. They threw him in the river and it almost didn't work
.
01:50:28
Historians say that the shot to his forehead almost certainly killed him it's right in the middle of his forehead
.
01:50:35
And it's possible that the cyanide was old or that never got put in his drinks or who
knows but it adds to the legend of Rasputin.
01:50:44
There's a warning before he dies that he gives to the royal family supposedly. That
also adds to his legend. You know another one of these prophecies that are sometimes
uncannily correct he supposed to have said to the royal couple quote If I
die or you desert me you will lose your son and your crown in six
months.
01:51:05
Rasputin is right again from beyond the grave.
01:51:14
This period in the First World Wars timeline about the time period
Rasputin dies. You know take a couple of months before he's assassinated a couple months afterwards
that really is the first war a war is crowded hour and you know that's what Theodore Roosevelt
called his combat in the Spanish-American war. He was trying to describe these large
number of events that was crammed into a short period of time he said it was his crowded hour. The
period from about November one thousand sixteenth to April one thousand seventeen is the first world war
has crowded our huge number of events compressed in a short period of time
.
01:51:50
These events are all connected though to the various themes we've examined individually
so far the United States and United States involvement in Mexico.
01:52:01
If the submarine is the high level diplomatic activity and maneuvering
and the train wreck that's about to happen with Russia. This all comes to a
head as we said in January late January nine hundred seventeen Woodrow Wilson
gives his peace with that victory speech.
01:52:18
While he's doing that the Germans are already behind the
scenes prepping for their February first resumption
of unrestricted warfare they've pulled the trigger on that because they had given the high level
politicians in Germany the go ahead to try some peace maneuvering.
Of course they were told that the peace maneuvering doesn't win without the submarines go the submarines
are slated to go February first one thousand seventeen.
Now because Germany was reasonably sure as was everyone else pretty much
that if they started shooting at every ship on the high seas the United States was going to
get dragged into the war because Americans would die. American ships would go down. It was pretty much inevitable
so the Germans started working on some contingency plans. In January one thousand nine
hundred seventeen you know again right around the same time Wilson is proposing peace for all men and all as high
minded sentiments. The Germans are sending a telegram
to their ambassador in Mexico giving their ambassador in Mexico some
instructions on what to do just in case the United States comes into the
war and starts fighting Germany.
01:53:31
The telegram from the German foreign.
Secretary a guy named Arthur Zimmermann to the ambassador of
Mexico says this quote We intend to
begin on the first of February unrestricted submarine warfare.
01:53:49
We shall endeavor in spite of this to keep the United States of America neutral in the event
of this not succeeding. We make Mexico a proposal of alliance on the following
basis make war together make peace together generous financial support
and an understanding on our part that Mexico is to reconquer the last territory
in Texas New Mexico and Arizona. The settlement in detail is left to
you. You will inform the president of the above most secretly as soon as the
outbreak of war with the United States of America is certain and add the suggestion that he should
on his own initiative invite Japan to would mediate adherents and at the same time
mediate between Japan and ourselves.
01:54:31
Please call the President's attention to the fact that the ruthless employment of our submarines
now offers the prospect of compelling England in a few months to make peace
and quot.
01:54:44
So there's a note suggesting that Mexico go to war as part of
the Central Powers against the United States if the United States gets into the war. What's more they
talk about getting Japan on board too that was one of the United States has great worries by the way
the Japanese had scared the Americans there's all these theories from American planners that maybe they could you
know go take the Panama Canal and come up through Mexico I mean there's all these these warplane kind of fantasies
but the idea that Japan could be brought in and flipped because they're on the Allied
side the Germans are talking a flip in the Japanese making them on the Central Powers to having the Japanese
attack the Americans the Mexicans attack the Americans if nothing else that keeps the
Americans busy so they're not over there fighting Germans in Europe.
If you're playin a board game here of a risk or something that's not a bad
idea you know there's a game called diplomacy not a bad move if you're playing the game called diplomacy
. Problem is there's all kinds of variables in real life not taken into account in the game of
diplomacy one of them is that your enemies might be tapping into the
cable that you used to send a secret message like that from Germany
to Mexico. The British got it snatched it
right off of the American at Atlantic cable which they were
tapping. Did we mention in an earlier episode The British may be
that the best espionage Codebreaker people of all time
. When the war starts they cut the German transatlantic cables a Germany can't
send telegraph messages across the Atlantic. So they work out deals to borrow other people's
cables Sometimes the United States let them use the US cable for
just messages. Woodrow Wilson thought what would maybe foster peace write he wants the
the Germans to have an open channel to him. So the Germans use the American cable to send a
message to Mexico offering some American states to them if they come in the war
by attacking the United States a little ironic there. Now the British have a
problem.
01:56:47
They can't tell the Americans about this cable right away because then you're going to get all
these embarrassing questions like How do you get the cable and then the British would have to say if they were going to be
truthful Well we tapped into your cable and we've been reading your messages for the
whole war I can't quite say that too easily. So by hook or by
crook it's a great story Barbara Tuchman wrote a whole book on it.
01:57:10
The British figure out a way to sort of hide the source of you know
how they got this cable. They give it to the Americans. Woodrow Wilson is
shocked I'm just shocked that this would happen. And understand the context right. This is the
very month January nineteenth seventeen that American military forces are
finally withdrawing from the pond szilvia expedition write this attempt to
go get this terrorist. U.S. settlers in Arizona New Mexico and Texas would have
called in and the U.S. force kind of comes back with their tail between their legs they didn't get punched
they killed a bunch of his men but. So despite you know high public
praising of everything involved General John Blackjack Pershing says it wasn't a very memorable period
in American history. Nonetheless it made the Mexicans mad as hell and the
U.S. almost went to war with Mexico twice in two years. In one thousand fourteen U.S.
troops occupied the city of Vera Cruz in about two hundred people died in that little endeavor maybe close to three
hundred nearly caused the war between the U.S. and Mexico then.
And then in this poncho via expedition the U.S. crosses the border goes after a guy who
is also the enemy of Mexico's leader. But it's so upset the Mexicans to have U.S.
troops in their country for any reason that that almost led to war. And so just as you're getting your
troops the very month you're getting your troops out of Mexico the Germans are sending him a telegram
saying hey I want to go to war guess United States I'll give you three states we'll help
you. It struck at a nerve for Americans when
Woodrow Wilson released that letter publicly.
When the American public first heard about Germany's offer to Mexico their
reaction was one that I think would mirror the reaction of the American public in a similar
situation today. A large number of them thought that the telegram was a forgery
that British intelligence was behind it that this was an attempt to trick the American government
and to affect American public opinion and make them more angry Germany more pro-war
.
01:59:15
And it's interesting to speculate how much you know that sort of perception would have stayed that way if the German
Foreign Secretary Arthur Zimmermann hadn't done something in the early March nine hundred seventeen that
looks in explicable he admitted that the
telegram had been sent and that it was genuine.
01:59:32
Twice the second time he said he hoped the
American people would understand that this was only to come into effect if war broke out between
Germany and the United States as a way of saying you know you'd understand then right the American people
wouldn't understand the confirmation that the Zimmerman telegram was indeed an
official secret proposal from the German government to the Mexican government of such a ton of
Americans and undercut the cause of German Americans Irish Americans who were hoping to keep the United States
neutral. It was another nail in the coffin of neutrality
and a huge German misstep.
02:00:11
In fact the whole decision to unleash the submarines when
they did was a bad decision by Germany.
02:00:18
If they had only waited a little while longer events would have
happened that would have made that move unnecessary.
02:00:27
And if that's the mood that gets the United States into the war then it would have made that event
unnecessary. Winston Churchill points out that
the timing of the events that happened in March and
April one thousand nine hundred seventeen in his mind show the hand of
destiny at work here is how he frames what's about to happen and what's about to happen ladies and
gentlemen that will screw up everything here.
02:00:51
And you know set the stage for our modern world as much as the United States getting into this conflict
will set the stage for the modern world. Russia has its revolution.
Churchill says this quote the beginning of nine hundred seventeen was marked by
three stupendous events. The German declaration of unlimited U. boat
war the intervention of the United States and the Russian Revolution. Taken
together these events constitute the second great climax of the war. The order in
which they were placed was decisive. If the Russian Revolution had occurred in January
instead of in March or alternatively the Germans had waited to declare unlimited
U.-Boat war until the summer they would have been no unlimited U.-Boat war and consequently
no intervention of the United States. If the Allies had been left to face the collapse of Russia
without being sustained by the intervention of the United States it seemed certain that France could
not have survived the year and the war would have ended in the peace by negotiation or in other
words a German victory and Russia lasted two months less had Germany
refrained for two months more.
02:01:58
The whole course of events would have been revolutionised in this sequence. We discern the
footprints of destiny. Either Russian in durance or German impatience was
required to secure the entry of the United States and both were forthcoming
and court.
02:02:15
As we've mentioned already the situation in Russia had been sealing and simmering for quite some
time. The straw that broke the camel's back was an almost complete
breakdown of Russia's transportation system which had been withering since the war
started and it had suffered terribly in the winter that it just happened. Russia
almost couldn't handle its transportation needs in peace time. After several years of
war there were whole cities that were not receiving enough food. One of them was the capital
Petrograd Petrograd used to be called St Petersburg but when the war started that
sound a little too German. So they changed it to Petrograd this is a city that will
change its name all the time during the communist years it will be known as Leningrad now it's St
Petersburg again. None the less it's the big metropolis and it doesn't have
enough food. You take a bunch of people who are angry already. Add the war
add no food. It's not surprising they were marching.
02:03:12
They've been doing it all throughout nine hundred seventeen as Irish historian William Mulligan points out
quote from the beginning in one thousand nine hundred seventeen there was a wave of strikes concentrated
in Petrograd on the seventh of March. Thirty thousand workers were locked out of the
futile lot of armaments plants in the city. The following day International Women's
Day women gathered in the Vyborg working class district to protest against high
bread prices. They marched past Finland station toward Netsky prospect
by which time the strikers numbered one hundred thousand down with the war down with the
high cost of living down with hunger. Bread for the workers they cried as they
marched through the city. The protestors connected their experience of war with much broader
political claims. Although the crux of their complaints was the food supply crisis. This
material experience of war had political implications including the overthrow of the Czarist
regime and it ended the war it was possible in theory that the food
supply system could be reformed. But the strikers knew the Czarist regime could no longer
reform itself.
02:04:16
End quote.
02:04:18
British General Sir Henry Wilson went to Russia during this time period and
came back and reported to his peers you know
concerning how the people in Russia felt toward the Czar and Czarina and told them quote It
seems as certain as anything can be that the Emperor and Empress are riding for a
fall.
02:04:37
Everyone officers merchants' ladies talk openly of the absolute necessity of
doing away with them. They've lost their people their nobles and now their army. And I see
no hope for them. There will be terrible trouble one day here.
02:04:51
End quote.
02:04:53
There are open discussions amongst some at the higher levels of Russian
society that terror attack should be made against Azhar someone stands up but the
Duma an important person later in the story and says that the Czar needs to be
removed by terrorist means if necessary.
02:05:12
Now it would be foolish to say that the you know royal court did not have their
supporters. They did and they had people who didn't have a problem with
you know an emperor but they had a problem with Nicolas the second. So they were all stripes in
this idea that the Czar needed to go and no consensus at all about what would
take its place or how to get from here to there.
02:05:35
Russia knew how to have protests and to revolt about a dozen years before this
time period they had the famous one thousand or five Revolution which would also come
after you know Russian problems in a war. When that revolution
broke out it got so serious bizarre. Supposedly he wrote out his
abdication letter he didn't deliver it but he was ready to go in that particular
revolution. The crowd marched on the Winter Palace where the czar was to a line of troops who
opened fire on them killing hundreds of them.
02:06:06
It's known as Bloody Sunday the Czar had received intelligence reports
a few months before this event saying that quote
recently the conviction has been expressed without exception that we're on the eve of great
events in comparison with which one thousand and five was but a toy and a quote
that was from a police report that the Tsar received months before these demonstrations in March
break out.
02:06:33
Now here's the thing.
02:06:35
You know as with many historical events they can be seemingly inevitable for the longest
time and still come as a surprise when they actually show up. The people who are out in the
streets March seventh March eighth which was International Women's Day. They didn't know that this
is the revolution. In fact the people on the scene point out that that's one of the tipping moments in
this situation when people understand Wait a minute this just isn't another demonstration like the kind
we've been having. This is the chance to topple the government. That's the big turning
point and the actual moment of the turning point is one of those really
interesting almost turning point in history moments revolutionaries like Leon Trotsky who
certainly see it that we spent a lot of time talking about that moment the tipping point in the revolution
. This is seven days by the way for seven days for a three hundred
year old Dynasty to fall. And it starts off with some factory
strikers on March seventh. By the way this is our calendar these events in Russia are
happening on the old calendar in February so it's often called the February revolution and it makes the
dating confusing as heck for someone like me. Nonetheless March seventh
by our calendar nine hundred seventeen there's an industrial strike March eighth
International Women's Day The women go out and strike and protest about the lack of bread and all
this. This seems to be key.
02:07:54
And so many people talk about it the fact that the women are doing this a lot of these women are the wives
of soldiers at the front which gives them a huge amount of credibility as you might imagine
with other soldiers and they're out on International Women's Day on the eight
on the ninth.
02:08:10
The women come backed out. Bring more people and go to factories and
shops and businesses and grab the workers out and have them join the strike and the crowd swells to at least twice
what it was the day before. By the next day the industry
of Russia's capital is paralyzed. And to show you how out of
touch the Czarina is with all this she writes in her diary on March tenth
about the troubles in the capital and she's basically in charge in the capital
quote. This is a hooligan movement. Young people run
and shout that there is no bread simply to create excitement. Along with the workers who
prevent others from working if the weather was very cold they would probably all stay at home
. But all this will pass and become calm if only the Duma will behave itself
and quote the Duma is the Russian legislature which I think I said earlier has about one
percent of the power in the system Azhar has about ninety nine percent and the Czarina is complaining that the Duma
misusing its one percent sort of Russian revolutionary Leon
Trotsky compares her pretty convincingly to Marie Antoinette before the French
Revolution that's a let them eat cake statement there. And she and the Czar and before he
died Rasputin like this one Russian minister a guy named proto
Popof. And so he begins to sort of act as the Czar arena's minister in
all this situation and according to some in the scene it's anger at him that prompts a
lot of this activity. The events that are happening starting really on
March eighth and then March ninth are large enough to be a big news story and the international
media is there. There are magazine journalists there are newspaper reporters from
Britain France places like that telling the folks back home what's going on in the Russian
capital. One is a British newspaper man named John Pollack and he
writes about the women protesting he calls them bread riots.
He writes in this is about March eighth and my apologies for my Russian pronunciation.
02:10:11
Quote the rioting was so far confined to the Viber beside the chief
workmen's quarter of Petrograd. But in the center the tramway service had already become
irregular. On the ninth the rioters stopped the trams across the river terrorizing
the drivers and throwing parts of the mechanism away so that the service grew still more
intermittent visits were paid to all the factories and the hands were called out in sympathetic
strike against the sudden food shortage. On this day to a Prefect of Police who
threaten the crowd was killed. Strong Cossacks squadrons patrolled Petrograd and
there was a collision on the Nevsky in which the Cossacks used their whips but they told the crowd that
they would not shoot so long as they only asked for bread. Alarmed at the attitude of the
Cossacks the authorities on the tenth brought troops of the line into the streets to support the
police posted machine guns on the Nevski and stop traffic across it at many points
and quote John Pollack then points out
it sounds like a rumor but what what the Russian minister working for the Czarina is supposed to have
said. When his methods for dealing with this uprising are being questioned Here's
what Pollock writes he says quote Protopopov approached by one who
endeavoured to convince him of the madness of his methods only answered Do you know how splendidly
machine guns work from the roof.
02:11:32
End quote.
02:11:35
Pollack says that the first serious bloodshed happens on March tenth when police opened
fire on a group of protesters and killed or wounded fifty
bizarre is now told about problems at the Capital remember he's off kind of at the
front.
02:11:50
Not in this capital of his he's letting his wife sort of run the show with this proto Pop Off
Guy The Tsar finds out about it they tell him things are bad. He issues an order
that basically says Make it stop. That order
appears on lampposts and all over the city.
02:12:09
The next morning when the rioters and protesters muster
to protest for the day they see this message from the head of
Petrograd military garrison quote During the last
days disorders have taken place in Petrograd followed by force and assaults
on the lives of soldiers and members of the police.
02:12:30
I forbid every kind of assembly in the streets. I warn the population of
Petrograd that commands have been issued and repeated to the troops to use their
arms and not to stop short of anything in order to assure tranquility in the capital
.
02:12:45
End quote.
02:12:47
John Pollack is out in the streets that day and he writes quote Sunday
March eleventh began nervously.
02:12:54
There were soldiers everywhere in the streets and strong bodies held in reserve in court yards.
By now the trams had all stopped and it was hardly possible to find a car. No newspapers
appeared about three thirty P.M. the troops begin to clear the streets around the Nevski at the
bayonet point and soon afterwards the police turned their machine guns on to a crowd at
the same place as the day before but with more deadly effect. A Caucasian officer who
was nearby estimating the number of dead at three hundred at the same time heavy
firing took place further down the Nevski and opposite the Khazan Cathedral. Several
score more people were killed. The crowd here retaliated with pistol shots. Another
prefect and a colonel of the police besides policemen the various innocent passers by being
killed. It was significant He writes that soldiers were seen among the crowd firing on
the police and a number of men and some fourteen officers of different detachments were
arrested for refusing to support the police with arms on the same afternoon a drunken
officer of the Valiant ski regiment nameless Gammage ordered his men to fire on the crowd.
They refuse but less garish forced one of the soldiers to obey his shot killed a
woman and quote.
02:14:06
The herding of women as I said seems to be an important part of this affair because it's
mentioned by everyone. Trotsky says the rumor that was going around
was that a police officer struck a woman with a club and that this was
witnessed by the Cossacks who were sort of sitting by neutrally. They were
there to kind of add some muscle to the mix but the army is kind of standing by while the
hated police and the public face off and Trotsky says whether or not it really
happened everybody believed that a woman had been assaulted in front of the Cossacks and the
Cossacks drove the police away who did it. Now one of the things that if you've
watched the recent revolutions you'll notice that oftentimes some incident will
happen that the demonstrators and protesters and rioters will sort of
cling to some sort of symbol. Generally from the event that becomes almost like
a high sign that protesters use and that they rally around according to
Trotsky what it was in this revolution was a cul de sac
cavalrymen winking to the crowd.
02:15:12
And at this wink became sort of a symbol of what was going on here is the way
Trotsky explained it.
02:15:18
I remember Trotsky is a revolutionary for him this is a hugely heroic tale and that's
the way he tells it. And I think we're all colored at least those of us who know what's coming
by what's coming this revolution is going to devolve into something very
terrible and a lot of us look back on this event thinking that that's how
we should view the removal of what came before communism and yet
there was a period after this revolution where Russia was on the road to becoming something
more like the United States. And so getting rid of a Czarist
regime that these people seem to hate like a Saddam Hussein was initially viewed
as a plus and the reporter on the scene for example for the British press he's thoroughly in
favor something replacing this regime.
02:16:06
The United States is to by the way one of the problems the United States has with joining
the allies or being associated with the allies is not Britain and France where they feel very close to in a lot of
ways it's Russia to them Russia is the same kind of militant
autocracy that the US propaganda paints the Germans as
the idea of the Czar going away to be replaced by some sort of constitutional government makes a lot of
people in the ally can't sit up and cheer for the protesters.
02:16:38
Now in the story by Trotsky of the winking color sack he explains that the officers of the
Cossacks kind of force them to charge into the crowd at one point. But as soon as the officers pass by and
scatter the crowd the regular Cossacks are very careful moving through with their horses not
to hurt anyone.
02:16:54
And Trotsky writes quote behind them filling the hole with the
prospect gallop the Cossacks decisive moment. But the horsemen
cautiously in a long ribbon road through the corridor just made by the officers.
02:17:08
Some of them smiled he quotes a protester Collier Rev recalls and one
of them gave the workers a good wink this wink. Trotsky says he was not without
meaning the workers were emboldened with a friendly not hostile kind of assurance and
slightly infected the Cossacks with it the one who winked found imitators in
spite of renewed efforts from the officers. The Cossacks without openly breaking
discipline failed to force the crowd to disperse but flowed through it in
streams. So was repeated three or four times and brought the two sides even closer
together. Individual Cossacks began to reply to the workers' questions and even to
enter into momentary conversations with them of discipline there remained but a thin
transparent shell that threatened to break through any second. The officers hastened to
separate their patrol from the workers and abandon the idea of dispersing them lined the
Cossacks out across the street as a barrier to prevent the demonstrators from getting to the center
and quote.
02:18:07
He then tells a story though about how these Cossacks will allow themselves to be used as a mounted barrier
but they don't stop the protesters from diving under the horse's bellies
.
02:18:17
The fact that the Cossacks traditionally the czarist crowd control
mechanism appear less than enthusiastic about carrying out their
traditional role convinces the government that they have to bring in the troops the garrison of
Petrograd is like one hundred fifty hundred sixty thousand men. So they've got the people
and they call them in and March eleventh is the key day because that's the day that elements of one famous
unit a training squadron that's called open fire and kill those people that the British
reporter was talking about. Now the people of
Petrograd are appealing to the troops as you heard earlier mingling with them talking to them.
They are walking up to the line of bayonetted troops you know in in ones and twos and
saying Brothers you're not really going to side with the police and kill us are you. The
women again taking the lead in this whole thing are walking right up to the line to
bayoneted troops and grabbing their rifles with bayonets on them and wrestling with them and saying join
us.
02:19:17
It's very heroic there's a lot of that going on.
02:19:22
After the shootings in the street on March eleventh
citizens were told workers go up to members of one of these storied
units and tell them that you know people in your unit
opened fire yesterday against the people of the city and told them what happened.
02:19:40
And then those troops went back to their barracks and on the evening of March eleventh morning of March twelfth
they had one of those moral crisis moments.
02:19:49
They key instant in any revolution a guy like Leon Trotsky would say. And he
describes it with almost heroic tones.
This this moment where this story unit confronts the reality
that they shot a bunch of those poor people that had been beseeching them not to shoot the day
before and they were going to have to go out and do it again today.
02:20:13
Here's what Trotsky writes quote The soldiers had no more time for
hesitation. They were compelled to shoot yesterday and they would be again today
. The workers will not surrender or retreat under fire they're still holding their own
. And with them their wives mothers sisters sweethearts. Yes And this is the very
hour that they had so whispered about. If only we could all get together.
02:20:36
When we stop here. Trotsky saying that all these people in the city had had thought about could
bizarre be overthrown if only we could all get together that would happen and now these soldiers were
not taking part in that they were taking part in crushing that. If only we could all
get together. Trotsky writes and then at that moment a supreme agony in the
unbearable fear of the coming day. The choking hatred of those who are imposing
upon them the executioners role their ring out in the barrack room the first voices of
open indignation and in those voices to be forever nameless. The whole
army with relief and rapture recognizes itself thus dawned upon the earth
the Day of Destruction of the Romanov monarchy.
02:21:19
End quote.
02:21:21
Those soldiers shot their officer ran out into the streets cheering and
joined the people of Petrograd trying to overthrow the Tsar.
They encourage other military units to follow. Most of which by
the end of March twelfth had done so. The garrison was melting away and
joining the anti czarist rioters. They
ransack the artillery depot then they go to the arsenal and break into it and take all the
weapons. Then they burn down the court of justice and a bunch of other government buildings and from
March twelfth on you have open battles in the streets between the people in the Army
and the very large police forces we would call them today the secret
police and all these police agencies that have set up machine guns at
intersections.
02:22:11
At this point the big question is what the heck is the czar doing
.
02:22:18
The first thing the Czar tries to do is just get rid of the Duma.
02:22:21
And when the head of this power list for all intents and purposes Russian legislature
receives the order that the Duma is to disband he says no. And most of the Duma
joins him in the street joining the revolution
next bizarre gets on the train on the thirteenth of March and heads back toward the capital
from the fighting front where he is in one of his typically strange moods.
He takes a lot longer to get there than he should have because he says he doesn't want to disrupt any of the
war traffic heading to the front so his train takes sort of the long way around. And it
ends up getting stopped on the way to Petrograd because the revolution is spreading to other cities
now. And one of these train stops the revolutionaries are stopping the train.
02:23:06
We are told that the Tsar's advisors are bringing him telegrams from power brokers
including for example his cousin and others that he needs to give up the
crown.
02:23:17
And what's sort of interesting about Nicholas is that he almost seems willing to do
it there's a whole line of thinking you know if you read a lot of the primary sources he sometimes portrayed as this
drunken tyrant you know and but when you read more modern day history he's a
much more pitiable figure. Churchill likes him and but Churchill would like a czar. But
there's great things about him his poor misunderstood person.
02:23:39
Of course he wasn't a great man just a good man and he talks about him like that but the Czar sort of
seems to be relieved by the prospect of giving up the crown at first there's like
five minutes of talk about giving it to his hemophiliac son but the Czar doesn't want that.
And interestingly enough in the abdication note to his people
desire specifically mentions not wanting to be parted from you know the
son that he adores. Once again you get that feeling of Nicholas and Alexandra as these kind of
parents who just adore their children whether or not this is some sort of smokescreen to cover something
. All the evidence seems to point out to a guy who cared more about his family in some
ways than being czar.
02:24:22
There was a call to the guy who will take over the what's called the
provisional government of the country in the near
future His name is Alexander Korecki and he met the czar after the Czar been
taken into sort of custody and he said quote As I studied his face
I seem to see behind his smile and charming eyes a stiff proper
mask of utter loneliness and desolation.
02:24:49
When I began to know this living mask I understood why it had been so easy to overthrow his
power he did not wish to fight for it and it simply fell from his hands
.
02:24:59
End quote.
02:25:02
The thing is that this is all I was going to have to do to keep power. He seemed
unwilling to do. His wife may have wanted him to she wrote letters
telling him he needed to be tougher and stronger. He seemed to care more about the fact that all his
children. While all this is going on I have a bad case of the measles which was pretty serious
back then and is as concern seemingly for them as a use of giving up
his power all over Russia.
02:25:31
They begin to break into government buildings and tear down
paintings of bazaar.
02:25:38
And the aftermath of this revolution sounds like the aftermath of the fall of Saddam
Hussein again when all these figures that were part of the government that work for the
Czar are being arrested and held in custody by people you know armed with weapons
to power blocks for in the wake of all this because remember there is no
plan.
02:25:58
The real revolutionaries who've been working for this for years were kind of caught off guard when it happened. So
there's there's competing groups for power one group is the people that used to be the almost power
less Duma all of a sudden they have power and they're mostly liberals
and and mild socialists and people who want to create. They end up writing the
United States by the way in June saying this they want to create a constitutional government they want to use maybe the United
States as a sort of a model but competing with that particular
entity for power is power at a much lower level groups that especially
revolutionaries forming councils of workers and soldiers
together. And they form this rough weird
partnership with the provisional government as it's called the former doom and they
kind of work with each other sometimes but they come to you know disagreements over other things
.
02:26:51
But when push comes to shove the Soviets as they're called these
you know elected groups of people from soldiers and workers councils
seems to when the first thing that they win is a rule that says that
anything involving the military is under the control of the Soviets
and this is the key issue for the other countries in the war.
02:27:17
I mean Germany wants Russia out of the war. They have been paying
agitators for a long time to hopefully make that happen. Now you have this situation with
the czars gone. What are the Russians going to do militarily. The British and the French feel the same way
along with the Americans they're not that upset that the czars gone but they're very concerned that
Russia's going to pull out of the war. This provisional
government will be known as the corrent Skee government at a certain point. They tell the allies that
they're going to continue fighting they're committed to continue fighting the allies start pouring money and
stuff into Russia even at a greater pace than they were before. But how do you
continue to hold off Germany and the Central Powers with your army
while your three hundred year old monarchy is busy
collapsing and all the structures that have been you know hanging by a string
starts falling apart.
02:28:14
One of the soldiers at the front going to do this became the key question and it's not answered right
away.
02:28:20
Churchill as only he can solve the whole thing is an unmitigated disaster
looking back on it from the late one nine hundred twenty S. again. Now he can see where all this is going to
go to communism in the future so his ideas are probably tainted he said. The
tragedy of Russia was and I'm quoting here that her ship went down within sight of port.
I mean you know we were just going to win this war and then Russia doesn't get to share in the spoils.
02:28:45
And he says of Russia quote with victory in her grasp she fell upon the earth
devoured alive like Herod of old by worms but not in vain her
valiant deeds the giant mortally stricken had just time with her
dying strength to pass the torch eastward across the ocean to a new Titan
long sunken doubt who now arose and began ponderously to arm the
Russian Empire fell on March sixteenth on April sixth.
02:29:13
The United States entered the war end quote.
02:29:18
It's been an interesting two months for the United States since Germany decided to unleash the
submarines in the first twenty days of unleashing the submarines the
Germans sink one hundred twenty eight merchant ships forty neutrals
among them. There are U.S. shipping companies in the month of February when this all
starts that start losing the million dollars one thousand seven hundred value money by the way a
week. The next month March nineteenth seventeen those numbers will double
and all of a sudden we begin to see what the first real
competent use involving at least the minimum number of
submarines is like in world history.
02:30:00
The Germans have been perfecting what you do with these new weapon systems like submarines these
science fiction type weapons what how do you use them at the beginning of the war they're kind of going after war
ships and whatnot and then they they work on short little burst going after neutrals and merchant
ships and now by nine hundred seventeen The Germans know what they want to do with these things and they have
enough ships to make their plan work a minimum number but enough they unleash them to
go after everything which is what their strategy has told them you have to do to really maximize this weapon
system.
02:30:31
And they're sinking ships so that Britain is
for the first time in the war in a real danger itself of going under one
of the advantages of being an island nation is if you've got the strongest Navy you don't have to have
the same kind of fears that a Russia has or a France has the Germans
aren't going to be able to break you directly because they can't reach you. This is the first time in the
war that the British face any serious threat of the Germans in one way or another
reaching them affecting them personally forcing them perhaps to knuckle
under to some sort of peace deal.
02:31:08
In April the month the United States gets into the war the
Germans sink four hundred and twenty three merchant men almost eight
hundred fifty thousand tons of shipping. But the British empire
cannot stand those kind of losses. It's the
submarine war that eventually brings the United States in if for no other
reason than it's disrupting operations in the country
.
02:31:37
The president is under a lot of pressure on a day to day increasing bases because once Germany starts sinking all the ships
U.S. ships stop leaving and they begin to congregate and clogged
up and cause traffic jams outside the major ports on the eastern seaboard and then
all of the commodities and food and perishables that we're going to be loaded onto those ships begin backing
up. You've got this terrible clogging all the ports on the eastern
coast of material that's rotting and degrading because the ships won't cross the Atlantic because they're afraid of the
submarines.
02:32:10
At one point Wilson wants to arm the ships to change the situation.
02:32:15
He wants to provide insurance so that they can you know cross. But this is like a ticking time bomb
for Wilson. He's got to do something. This situation's only going to get worse
.
02:32:25
The Zimmerman Telegram happens in late February too. I mean all these things that just increase a
situation that's bad and make it worse but there's no instant
moment where the line has been crossed and there never will be.
02:32:41
At some point by March one thousand seven hundred at the latest and probably around the same time the
Russian revolution is happening. The Wilson administration decides that they've had enough
. Five U.S. ships go down in March one thousand seventeen. To some in the
Wilson administration this is confirmation that the U.S. is already at war with Germany.
There doesn't have to be some big Lusitania nine eleven moment to cross over
this invisible line. It's happening every day and on April second Wilson gives his
most famous speech one of the most important speeches in American history concerning
the situation that he sees that the United States is at war with
Germany. And the interesting part about the speech if you dissect it it's monumental on so many
levels. He's so crafty the way it's put together. He never says to the Congress declare
war on Germany you know so that will be at war with Germany he says we're at war with Germany and I
invite you to confirm that fact. He at no time gives Congress the
impression that they have any control over this decision at all. Now luckily for him they went
along with him big time. But what if they hadn't.
02:33:50
Part of Wilson's speech focuses on the specific reason we're at this point talks about the submarine warfare
compares Germans to pirates and all these kinds of things that he takes some time out of his speech
to say that we're not at war with the German people we have no quarrel with them
.
02:34:04
It's their government we don't like and this is a big change by the way in the way
that much of the United States government will craft you know the way
that they frame relationships with other countries to get nothing against the people. It's the
government of Wilson's point of view is if the people aren't running the government like in a democracy or
republic. Well then the people are responsible for what their governments decisions are they may be the victims
of it and we might have to hurt you in order to overthrow your government. But we're not mad at you.
02:34:36
About half the speech is really high minded sentiments forever known
afterwards as Wilsonian principles that talk about things like the need
to make the world safe for democracy and I'll give you a taste of that in a second. But more
interesting and again one of the more groundbreaking parts of the speech is that Wilson takes on the
U.S. tradition of non involvement in European affairs
head on and he basically said that was the way it was
. Times have changed. Here's the exact phrasing that he gives but it is a
sea change in American foreign policy in the way the government of the United States
approaches the conflicts and involvement with the rest of the world. And that course changes one and
we are still living with today in the modern world in the middle of his speech
telling Congress that a war exists right now with Germany Wilson says quote.
02:35:31
Our object now as then is to vindicate the principles of peace and justice in
the life of the world as against selfish an autocratic power and a set up amongst
the really free and self-governing peoples of the world. Such a concert of purpose and of
action as will henceforth ensure the observance of those principles neutrality
is no longer feasible or desirable. Where the peace of the world is
involved and the freedom of its peoples and the minister that peace and freedom lies in the
existence of autocratic governments backed by organized force which is controlled
wholly by their will not by the will of their people. We have seen the last of
neutrality in such circumstances. We were at the beginning of an age where it would be insisted
that the same standards of conduct and of responsibility for wrong done shall be observed
among nations and their governments that are observed among the individual citizens of civilized
states and quote.
02:36:28
Having a national policy connected to the idea of not going abroad in search of
monsters to stay away. I just started to sound really old fashioned didn't it
. But at least Wilson's got some really
good arguments to justify the historic course change. These
are the ideas of Wilsonian ism and here's how Wilson
enunciates just some of them.
02:36:53
Quote It is a distressing and oppressive duty gentlemen of the Congress which I have
performed in thus addressing you. There are. It may be many months of
fiery trial and sacrifice ahead of us. It is a fearful thing to lead this great
peaceful people into war into the most terrible and disastrous of all wars.
Civilization itself seeming to be in the balance. But the right is more precious than
peace and we shall fight for the things which we have always carried nearest our hearts for
democracy for the right of those who submit to authority to have a voice in their own governments for
the rights and liberties of small nations for universal dominion of right by
such a concert of free peoples shall bring peace and safety to all nations and
make the world itself at last free to such a task we can dedicate our
lives and our fortunes. Everything that we are and everything that we have with the
pride of those who know that the day has come when America is privileged to spend her
blood and her might for the principles that gave her birth and happiness and the
peace which she has treasured. God helping her she can do no other end quote
.
02:38:01
One wonders what John Quincy Adams would reply to that
none the less.
02:38:08
Guys like Theodore Roosevelt have been saying he was going to skin Wilson alive
if Wilson didn't go to war. Like the speech a lot.
02:38:18
It's interesting to note by the way that the one American political figure
that the Europeans really respect in this whole question is Theodore Roosevelt
because they adore Roosevelt is really one of the early what will be called Atlanticist people who
believe for example in locking arms with countries like Great Britain and and doing great things with
T.R. was an interventionist before his time and in the United
States he's thought of as an extremist the Republican candidate for president
tells him to stop campaigning for him because he's so bellicose it's working against the
Republican Party right.
02:38:53
You're letting Wilson and the opposition portray us as warmongers. That's the guy though
that appeared to be ahead of the curve when it came to figuring out that
Germany needed to be dealt with again from the British point of view. There's a lot of this that you could
look at and say the very things the Germans are being you know slammed for doing are things that they
were kind of forced into doing by what their opponents were up to.
02:39:18
The first world war is not the clear cut good and evil separation that the second
world war is and we've mentioned that before. None the less if you're on one
side of it it certainly is the prime minister of Great Britain for about a
couple of months when Wilson makes his historic speech is Lloyd George
in his memoirs. Lloyd George writing after the war can't help but
take a shot at Wilson not because of what he did but because of how
long it took him.
02:39:49
Speaking about Wilson's speech now George writes quote these
principles were excellent and excellently expressed the Allied democracies of France
in the British Commonwealth had already borne the burden and been scorched by the heat of a
thousand days in the battle with this natural foe to liberty.
02:40:08
Stealing one of Wilson's lines from his speech they rejoiced.
02:40:11
George that was at the advent of this powerful help from the greatest democracy in the world at a
time when troubles were multiplying. They perhaps might be excused for thinking that
issues so clear now to President Wilson ought to have been apparent earlier to his eyes
. They felt grateful in their hearts to the great American Theodore Roosevelt whose vision
was so undimmed and whose sympathies were so sure from the outset of this grim struggle for
international right in court.
02:40:39
Winston Churchill sounded almost the exact same way. What took you so long
.
02:40:44
Speaking of Wilson's peace attitudes quote he had behind
his policy a reasoned explanation and massive argument and all must respect the
motives of a statesman who seeks to spare his country the waste and horrors of war.
But nothing Churchill writes can reconcile what he said after March one thousand nine hundred
seventeen with the guidance he had given before. What he did in April one thousand seven thousand
could have been done in May one thousand nine hundred fifteen and if done then what abridgement of the
slaughter.
02:41:14
What sparing of the agony what ruin what catastrophes would have been prevented and
how many million homes would an empty chair be occupied today.
02:41:23
How different would be the shattered world in which victors and vanquished alike are condemned to live
. End quote. Writing from the late one nine hundred twenty S. and seeing
the mortally wounded and terribly scarred continent
which Winston Churchill remembers as being the height of World Civilization. To
him the U.S. taking this long to get into the war looks like something that
cost you the world you knew.
02:41:53
A couple days after the president gives his famous speech the Congress votes to
support him and take the nation to war. The vote wasn't close by the way in the House of
Representatives it was something like three hundred seventy four three hundred seventy five to fifty
. And as much as a wipeout as that sounds I read somewhere that that's the second
most opposition the Congress has ever shown the president in a war vote the war of eighteen twelve
being the the most non the less. Seems pretty clear that
most of those people voting were unsure about what voting for going to
war was going to mean the future mayor of New York bureau and already it was a
congressman when this vote was taken. He said that sixty percent he said thirty years after the
war that sixty percent of his brethren we're pretty sure this wasn't going to mean troops on the ground in Europe
. The U.S. didn't send armies overseas to fight you know on European soil.
02:42:46
They thought it was going to be like financial aid and naval help
naval help is the one thing the U.S. can do right away. Military help in an army
that's a problem because the U.S. really doesn't have one.
02:43:00
In April nine hundred seventeen the U.S. Army's ranks seventeenth largest in the world.
Doesn't have any flame throwers or any tanks or any gas masks or mortars
grenades. These aircraft are these rickety strange
beasts that you know they're right. They look like the planes the Wright
brothers kind of put together they don't look modern at all. There's
not enough artillery shells for the guns to shoot more than a few minutes by a Western
Front. You know standards historian justice
done and he says that the U.S. relatively speaking had been better
prepared for the American Revolution and the war of eighteen twelve than they were
prepared for the first world war. I disagree with him about that but his
point is well taken. The United States if it's going to be any help to Europe Europe's going to
have to survive while it waits for this help to be accumulated the only place the U.S. can
help right away is with money which they were kind of doing already they going to lower interest rates and give better
deals but it's a continuation of what was already happening. And the use of the Navy and the
thing the Navy can do right away is help against the submarines because as we said in
April one thousand seven teen the submarine sinking more than four hundred
merchant ships. Britain's problem isn't that it doesn't have to stop all the sinking
it has to stop the rate which is so much more than what it can rebuild if it loses less ships
than it can build a month that's doing well if it loses more ships than it can build a month it's in trouble
. The height of the submarine war will be from February nineteenth seventeen when
unrestricted warfare is declared and the next eight months.
02:44:41
This is when Britain lives or dies those are the stakes and Lloyd George and Churchill and
all these guys go out of their way to talk about the almost of alarm is the word Lloyd
George's Lloyd George says that there are some of the most cautious people in his cabinet that are starting
to muse out loud about maybe we better make peace while we still have some ships afloat
.
02:45:02
And he said the Germans were getting gleeful that at times they just had these reports coming in that made
all the pro submarine people seem you know to be perfectly correct they were all of a
sudden going to win the war Churchill So we went from being you know the side that had time
on our side and we could just wait this out and every day the Germans were losing the war a little bit more to having the
tables Flippin Out time was on the German side and the British had to come up with counter measures
or lose the war fast. They not only did this but it was the
civilian leadership that pushed for the answer that turned out to make the biggest difference.
This is sort of one of these early indications that something is changing in the war.
02:45:40
For years the military men have had an almost unquestioned authority to
choose whatever path for fighting the war they wanted to. No matter what happened. But now so
many people have died in so many disasters and so much of the same tactic seeming to you know equal the
same results except more bodies stacking higher and higher that there was push back now from
civilian leaders. Lloyd George in Britain is one of these guys who's who says openly that my job is to
protect the soldier in the field and to the soldier in the field the generals his biggest enemy
sometimes and you can hear all this talk about the stupidity of the military leaders. Even
Churchill kind of goes out of his way to say that the military experts were all against the solution
that ended up solving the problem it was the civilian leaders for the most part that pushed the
idea that won the day. The idea was both breathtakingly simple and
incredibly complex.
02:46:30
The idea was convoys.
02:46:33
The grouping of ships into large formations
surrounding them with warships and escorts and sending these large bodies of ships
across at organized times and schedules the
military men often believe that this was just going to group your targets for the submarines. Make it
even easier to line the ships up like in a shooting gallery. But when it was experimented
on again the civilian leaders pushing to experiment with this. The results were
fantastic.
02:47:03
Almost right away the U.-Boats that approach these kinds of
formations often got sunk. The idea that it was going to be easier to spot fifty or
sixty ships on the water rather than a single ship turned out to not be true and that in the vast spaces of the
ocean big old convoys got swallowed up too and as Churchill said when these
convoys made it across the water and slip through the blockade instead of having one ship make it through the German
blockade you had forty fifty or sixty ships do it.
02:47:31
By October nine hundred seventeen of ninety nine convoys heading to Great Britain
with more than fifteen hundred ships in them only ten that were
still part of the convoy were sunk fourteen more that its training got
lost or were sunk. Those are easily replaceable
losses. And by October nine hundred seventeen it was clear the Germans were
no longer going to be able to sink more shipping than the British could replace
. What's more they now had U.S. shipyards helping to replace them
.
02:48:06
As you might imagine the whole decision on Germany's part to engage in this
kind of submarine warfare is one of the most if not the most criticized
decision that the German leadership ever made.
02:48:20
It's understandable and you know it kind of once again puts the lie to the stereotype of the
Germans as sort of applauding methodical sort of you know
conservative sort of leadership style because in both world wars the Germans would prove to
be great great gamblers. They just weren't lucky gamblers but they were
willing many times to sort of throw caution to the wind and try these things in a sense though it's a
defense mechanism. When you are the weaker party. I mean to me
the analogy that works best in the in the war that we have going right now is to
weight lifters. You know competing against each other and one of these weightlifters is bigger and stronger
than the other one which is obviously a huge advantage in weight lifting but it isn't
everything on the weaker weight lifter has to try you know to
make up for it with technique and training and will to win.
02:49:13
And maybe taking some chances.
02:49:16
That's Germany's strategy for the rest of this war and you know you're seeing so many
aspects of change from the nineteenth century to the twentieth century that you can point
to in the story because that's really the theme when you look at this war you know in a big picture sense
Germany has transformed in the recent past one thousand nine hundred in the year before this time we're in now
from really an old style monarchy with a legislative you know balancing out to
something that looks much more like a twentieth century military dictatorship. It doesn't happen
overnight and it almost kind of happens because it needs to. The only way Germany has a chance in this
war is to be the technique master and have the greater will to win all those
things I said about the smaller weightlifter. Germany has to organize its society more
efficiently than the more powerful allied countries if it's going to stand a chance and one of the things that
happens is when you get end in Bergen Luden Dorf in there remember the two German commanders we talked
about this military team but it's really only one guy the Ludin Dorf guy. He
takes on more and more the powers that in the twentieth century we see over and over again in
regimes where you have one strong man who sort of has dictatorial control on the German start to try to
organize their society to make it more efficient like you know being able to tell workers where
they're going to work. You know controlling people down to that level because as one of the
German leaders said the goal is to turn Germany into one vast munitions
factory. To do that requires a sort of single mindedness and a lot of power
concentrated in one person. At this stage in the war that person is Luden Dorothy he an ember
took over nine hundred sixteen and the first thing they did was sort of do an audit of how the war
is going and what we're doing to fight it in the conditions and the first condition you notice when you take over
the entire war is on the western front. You have about two and a half
million men manning the barricades. The other side has about four
million men and their numbers are increasing every month how do those trends look
you have food riots at home women fighting with police officers in the
streets because they can't get the food they need you have strikes in a bunch of
the major firms and in a bunch of the cities and they get so bad sometimes the army has to be called in
to disperse the strikers.
02:51:29
So the government is now going in and sending strike leaders to the front to get him out of the way. I mean
the society is under severe stress and we already talked about the food. I mean there's a quote
from Ernst Glazer that sums it up when he talks about this period there and now he he says
quote soon eluded to Hamed thrilled us more than the fall of Bucharest or some
apparent success elsewhere. End quote. These people's needs are shrunk
down to the most basic human survival levels. Yeah great we took Bucharest But did you see
that hand we have in the cellar that we found I mean you know that's something any of us could
understand if we began to starve.
02:52:05
The pressure is on Germany's military leadership to do something you can't very well launch an offensive on
the western front when you're outnumbered the way you are you going to be lucky to survive it all one hundred sixteen was
terrible for the Germans on the western front. So you launch the submarines and that becomes your
chance to win the war without having to do the impossible on the western front
.
02:52:26
Now Luton Dorf is a very strange guy.
02:52:29
This is commander of Germany you know sort of and more every day in this story and in Berg his
partner is the charisma guy but he's an old man he really if he had been great at one time in
his life he's in his dotage now and he's he's the revered public face of this
government that loued indorse the guy behind the scenes and we talked about him and he's the one who
way back in one nine hundred fourteen got that city in Belgium to surrender by
banging on the front doors with the hilt of his sword. You know when he easily could have been
killed walk right up to the front door long guy do I mean that he's an interesting guy.
He's flawed in a lot of ways and depending on which historian you grab you're going to hear that the
bumbling. Psychologically fragile Luden door for you're going to see this this
great gambler who was who was fantastic at certain things and remember all these generals are
nineteenth century men. They're adapting under fire at quick
pace to all these new conditions. And just when you think they're getting it some new development
comes around maybe you're starting to understand the physics of land warfare. A year or two into the First World War If you're a
general and then tanks appear and then gas appears I mean what do you do with all this airplane
start having a real impact. You don't just have to learn you have to be flexible to continue
to evolve as these generals and nobody's great at wooden doors not
bad.
02:53:48
Lindorff changes by the way the basic strategy of the guy who came before him on
Vulcan high strategy was you know basically defend every inch of territory Luden Dorothy is
perfectly willing to give up territory in exchange for killing people.
02:54:02
He'll pull off things like Operation Alberich right about this time period starts in late
February one thousand seven hundred where he will pull back troops that are that are in an
exposed loop in the line the line isn't straight because of fighting here and there. It's
bulging out in some places and there are kinks in it and he begins in early one thousand seven hundred to pull
troops back that are that are way out there in No Man's Land and straighten up his line he'll
cut off like twenty five miles from the Western Front by doing this freeing up
thirteen or fourteen divisions as basically a German army to be used elsewhere
. Now that's a complicated maneuver. But his strategy in one thousand seven hundred as
far as he's concerned is going to be defense. So he's going to line things up and prepare
for that and he gives him all kinds of advantages this is one area it will be called The End in
Berg line that he puts together. It's hard to imagine making the
defenses of one thousand sixteen deeper and stronger and more
impenetrable. But that's what they do in one thousand seven hundred the Hindoo Burton line is an
example of lute indorse idea of defense in depth and what that means is the German
defenses go back Miles and they're designed to act like a
rubber band so that when something runs into them it just stretches and stretches and stretches and the
farther it stretches the more resistance you find and then eventually just snaps back.
It's devious in the way it's designed and I don't need to get into all the details. It's the machine
guns and the barbed wire and the pill boxes and all these things but they just go far back into the distance
and there's no more trenches anywhere near the front lines because those are too easy to pick out and and
shell everybody just sort of sits in holes in the ground in a sort of a random pattern and there's no
line. In fact there's hardly any Germans when you first get to it it's just a
few Germans holding you up and taking casualties and then as soon as they can't keep you at bay anymore
they retreat back to the next line and then to the next line and every step of the way the
defenses are a little bit stronger and the Germans are a little bit more numerous as the
British or the French who are attacking them are getting less and less numerous. And then as they are getting
more tired I mean I thought to myself some of these defenses go back nine ten miles. It
will kill me without any resistance. Imagine trying to do it with machine
guns and rifle fire and grenades and artillery and I mean just it's
you just can't imagine having much left if you even get the nine or ten
miles to the end of the defenses and then waiting for you there. Our German
armies who are going to counter-attack anything that's a blast that makes
it all the way through these defenses. It is absolutely almost
impenetrable and devious if you only have two and a half two point eight million men to
fight four or four and a half million men on the other side this is a good way to equalize
the odds this is a weight lifter who's figured out a way to lift more than his
bigger opponent.
02:56:58
My favorite part of the Indian Berg line defenses as a military history fan
is that they build a giant moat in front of it I mean there's
no other way to phrase it it's an absolutely perpendicular walled trench
that is between nine and ten feet deep and twelve feet
across. It's meant to stop everything. Tanks especially I mean all fall into there
and won't be able to climb up the perpendicular side but it's not an easy job for troops
either and behind this giant Moat as you might imagine are
machine gun positions and all kinds of defenses and more wire and all these sorts of things.
It is crazy to think about having to attack something like that. And what's more when
Lydon Dorf has people retreat sort of toward the end in Berg line and give
up these positions that hundreds of thousands of Germans had died
contesting over the last couple of years. He has soldiers destroyed
everything. You know as they go. Creating a dead zone from the old front
line to the new one a scorched earth policy something which by the way
upset Crown Prince Rupert who was the Field Marshal commanding some of the troops who had to do
this destruction.
02:58:10
He was so upset he almost resigned over it and complained about you know how this would hurt Germany's
reputation and in that discussion you basically see a nineteenth century figure
with one thousand century standards Crown Prince Rupert a member of the Varian royalty
and Luden Dorf eighth early twentieth century total war kind of guy
. It's a clash of cultures. The twentieth century one Luden Dorf got his way
and the troops of the German army in a very old school style began
creating a dead zone in this part of France in front of the Hindu
burglar and the dead zone that extended in some places twenty miles. A
German soldier Ernst young or was there a watching the destruction take
place and he compares it to a kind of lunacy. I mean it's funny
because if you think about people doing this in the Second World War you think about them using mostly explosives and there
were explosives used to create this dead zone but Germany needed her explosives.
02:59:08
And so a lot of this stuff was done by hand and younger says it
had a bad effect on the troops and he also blamed some of it on what he calls the
economic times we live in or something like that and what he really means by that is
this total war twentieth century sort of mentality younger writes about
passing through this dead zone that was being created by the German army as it moved
backwards towards its main line quote.
02:59:35
In the villages we passed through on our way. I had to look a vast lunatic asylums
whole companies were set to knocking or pulling down walls or sitting on rooftops
uprooting the tiles trees were cut down windows smashed wherever you looked
clouds of smoke and dust rose from vast piles of debris. We saw men
dashing about wearing suits and dresses left behind by the inhabitants with top hats
on their heads with destructive cunning. They found the roof trees of the houses
fixed ropes to them and then with concerted shouts pulled until they all came tumbling
down others were swinging pile driving hammers and went around smashing
everything they got in their way from the flower pots on the windowsills to whole ornate
conservatories as far back as the zinc free line. That's what the Germans called the Hindu Berg
line. Every village was reduced to rubble. Every tree chopped down
every road undermined every well poisoned every basement blown up or booby
trapped every rail and screwed every telephone wire rolled up everything
burnable burned in a word we were turning the country that are advancing opponents would
occupy into a wasteland. As I say he writes the scenes were
reminiscent of a mad house and the effect on the men was similar. Half funny
half repellent. They were also we could see right away bad for the men's morale
and honor here for the first time I witnessed wanton destruction that I was later in life to see to
excess. This is something that is unhelpfully bound up with the economic thinking of our
age but it does more harm than good to the destroyer and dishonors the soldier
and quote.
03:01:15
It should be remembered that this isn't a war damaged country.
03:01:18
This area that they are pulling apart now in creating a dead zone was an idyllic part of France that
was untouched by the war if you weren't right on the front in the First World War especially in the Western Front.
Things were great behind it one of the complaints French soldiers on leave have is you can get
twenty or thirty miles behind the front line and everything is like there's not even a war going on
you know they see men with their sweethearts prowling around going to restaurants for dinner in a town
thirty miles from the front and it's like it's another world.
03:01:47
So they're tearing down these beautiful parts of France to create this dead zone they're
destroying everything and then they're leaving booby
traps behind because when the Germans give up their positions they're going to retreat as I said sometimes
twenty miles in this one area all the way back to the main line the.
Our lives are going to follow them when they follow them they're going to run into these towns when they run into these
towns. They're going to run into when younger talked about it earlier booby traps.
03:02:16
Here's what he said quote Among the surprises we prepared for our successors were
some truly malicious inventions. Very fine wires almost invisible were
stretched across the entrance of buildings and shelters which set off explosive
charges at the faintest touch in some places narrow ditches were dug across
roads and shells hidden in them. They were then covered over by a large plank and had Earth
strewn over them and nail had been driven into the plank only just above the shelf
use the space was measured so that marching troops could pass over the spot safely. But the
moment the first truck or field gun rumbled up the board would give in the nail would touch off the
shell or there were spiteful time bombs that were buried in the basements of
undamaged buildings. They consisted of two sections with a metal partition going down the middle
in one part was explosive in the other acid. After these devils eggs he called
them had been primed and hidden. The acid slowly over weeks eroded the metal
partition and then set off the bomb.
03:03:17
End quote.
03:03:18
British reporter Philip Gibbs went through some of these towns right after younger and his men had vacated
them and allied forces had moved in and Gibbs talks about all those same kinds of
booby traps and then says this quote only a few of our men were killed or
blinded by these monkey tricks.
03:03:35
Our engineers found most of them before they were touched off but one went down dug outs or
into ruined houses with a sense of imminent danger. All through the devastated region
one walked with an uncanny feeling of an evil spirit left behind by the masses of
men whose bodies had gone away. It exuded from scraps of old clothing.
03:03:54
It was in the stench of the dug outs and in the ruins that they had made and quote
a booby trapped dead zone. Lindorff is a
fully twentieth century total war commander.
03:04:11
And this is a big move this is pulling a big rabbit out of a hat and it's you know if you're a military
history fan like I am. It's what makes alluding to are so interesting. Not a lot of
generals would pull this kind of stunt and it was a game changer in many respects I mean that
whole dead zone for example proved to be a huge problem for British and
French forces to try to overcome. They move into this crater
destroyed denuded area where even the wells have been poisoned.
03:04:39
How do you even supply that. The Germans on the other hand have moved to sites they've been
working on for months. Some parts of the NDAA Berg line have had half a million
workers working on it for months and months and months and building a new front line from scratch.
03:04:53
It's like building a new home. It was now moving ready they move back into it and there are
railroads bringing supplies up to the back.
03:05:01
What Luden door did was wrong foot. The allies he stole a
night march he seized the initiative he changed their plans
for nine hundred seventeen without knowing what their plans were. He simply figured if I do
this all the planning they've been doing for months will be obsolete.
They are planning to have me twenty miles closer to Paris than I am.
If you are an allied general how would you deal with this problem. And if you said you don't
want to deal with this problem that this looks like an impenetrable nightmare that just puts you in
league with those military thinkers at the time who are known as Easterners
. These people who thought attacking on the western front was insane
.
03:05:47
Look at the defenses who would do that. The prime minister of Britain Lloyd
George is one of these guys. Here's the thing though you can
always find generals and military commanders who no matter
how impossible the military task looks will be
optimistic about explaining to you how their plan will overcome it.
After all people don't get those jobs by explaining how they can't
overcome the enemy's defenses.
03:06:18
We told you earlier that the French sac their military leader that they've had since the beginning of the war
she also shot for us and they sort of you know kick them upstairs and before they do they have another
one of those yearly meetings where all the allies the Russians and the British and the French and all the other allies they get
together and they had this meeting and they try to coordinate next year's military plans so that when
the British and the French attack on the western front the Russians at the same time attack on the eastern the Italians attack in the south
and everybody's pushing in multiple directions all at once forcing the Germans to you know
maybe break somewhere I mean the Central Powers at this point are like an egg. And as soon as you
can break into any one of their sides east west north south I mean you feel like the
war will be over. But they're all holding steady. But most commanders are looking at the Western Front
saying but nothing's as steady as that. Must we
attack it. Well the French had always believed yes you must and of course they are a little biased because the
Germans are on their soil and they would like to see them pushed off. When Josef Joffe
is asked in late one thousand sixteen at the big meeting what are we going to do in one thousand seventeen What's the
plan. Scheffer tells them his plan is a repetition of the Somme the battle that was just
wrapping up the battle that was so horrible for British and even for French forces
going to wear the Germans down in several months long battle that forces them to throw in the
last of their resources. French politicians were horrified by this. The last
thing they wanted is a battle like that because as far as they were concerned how did anybody know that it wouldn't be the
French nation that threw in all their resources and man.
03:07:54
This is part of the reason you Shafir got kicked upstairs. The French politicians have had enough
. Just like British politicians they were starting to do the unthinkable in
terms of nineteenth century attitudes they were starting to interfere with military
decisions because they were losing faith that the people making the military decisions have the
right priorities. The politicians were
worried about the casualty totals. One of the big criticisms especially from the
soldiers in the field is that the generals weren't the
guy who gets the job is the main allied military commander nine hundred seventy we mentioned earlier is a guy name
Robert Nivo and he though gets this job because he's the guy out there
optimistic about victory. Remember Generals do not get hired.
Promising to not overcome the enemy's defenses so there's an in-grown
bias in the whole process. But Robert he tells the
French leadership when he takes over that you don't have to have another battle of the Somme you don't
have to have a grinding months long battle you can have a lightning
bolt. So if a hammer stroke that just ends the war
in forty eight hours. Now it sounds crazy doesn't there were a bunch of
French generals some of whom Nouvelle leapfrogged over
. They were guys who probably deserve the job at least three maybe four more the
Nouvelle But if that all was this he's a charmer and he's he's one of these
people that can win anyone over. He's not winning over these jealous generals he
leapfrogged. But there's a lot of politicians that are sold with me though and
some of them aren't even French Nouvelle has this great advantage over the other French
you know military leaders. He speaks English he speaks it perfectly he speaks
without an accent his mother's English so he's a charmer to begin
with kind of a Salesman. But people like him he doesn't feel slimy or sleazy
. He's sort of an optimist and he goes over to Britain he wins over even
the arch Easterner Lloyd George.
It was and then explained to the British exactly how this plan to rupture the enemy lines will work and
it involves creating a reserve of like twenty seven twenty eight divisions that are going to be like the
spider in the web and as soon as the Germans are held in certain places and we can then then
this twenty seven Division will go get him and it's going to take forty eight hours
. And like any good salesman offering sort of a money back guarantee
there's a guarantee in this deal on the guarantee that Miral tells everybody is if it doesn't work
in forty eight hours we'll call it off after that.
03:10:38
Now that's a promise to get rid of the part of these battles that's most troubling to people who care
about dead people a lot of the dead people unless you have just
tragic first days like the Battle of the Somme or in the battle of the frontiers.
03:10:52
A lot of the deaths happen because these battles go on for months if you could end them after forty eight hours if you
had a chance to see is it working or not working call it off it's not working. That takes a lot of the risk out of it and you
can see why politicians would like that plan a lot more than just a P.R. for saying let's have another
four or five months long battle. The
problem is in hindsight is everyone knows Nevel was workin on a
on an idea that might not have been tenable. Novell made
his name at the battle over done at the very last stages of it when the Germans were being pushed back in the other
direction. There's a lot of historical debate over whether or not anything Novell
did was effective but even if it was effective it was effective at a very very low
level to all of a sudden be the military leader in charge of not just all of France's forces
but kind of Britain's forces to whom he will clash and that will clash with Britain's Commander Douglas
Haig. They do not like each other the egos of generals are proverbial anyway and these
two guys will fight and it will create problems between Britain and France as allies nonetheless Nivelle is the
most powerful military commander on the western front he's never commanded forces like this
.
03:12:00
His first real problem happens when the Germans pull this
you know operation Alberich and disappear.
03:12:10
And it reminds me a little of the British getting away at Gillet bully and fooling the Turks about the Turks didn't
know that they'd left you know the Germans just kind of pulled back from this giant
salient and wait for the British to find out they're gone.
03:12:25
And I love the way it starts by the way it starts with with the British looking out over their trenches and seeing the
German trenches being shelled and then coming to the realisation that the German
trenches that they that they're facing off against are being shelled by Germans and it's
a German artillery blowing up the trenches and destroying everything of value in it and then
destroying the trenches so the British can't move up into them and use them and then of course
the probing. It must have been eerie. They were like single Germans left behind to shoot
a rifle off every now and then and just keep the Allied armies from pursuing too closely. But
once it was clear that the Germans were pulling back. You know Miles and Miles Churchill had said like
fifty miles every place I read said more like twenty at the farthest. But none the less to pull
back that far and your military maps are all different. The place that the
hammer blow enables offensive was going to fall is the place alluded to have just vacated
. OK So as alluded to are probably intended. You gotta change your plans don't you
mean conditions on the ground are changed and yvel said I don't have to change my plans
this all helps my goal. And this is where everything starts to fall
apart in this plan. And yet at the same time you can see how
these are such huge affairs involving so many months of preparation and so much
momentum that even if you find out near the beginning of the of the
battle that things have changed. There's a momentum that you can't really even stop in this
case everything starts going wrong for you though before the whole battle starts. Nonetheless
before Knievel's part of the battle starts the campaign that sort of a
diversionary campaign designed to make the Germans move
away from where Nouvelles going to attack starts. That's the part of this
campaign that involves the British and the Dominion forces. It
happens next to the French position at a place called orris
.
03:14:21
And at this battle for at least a few days everyone gets a
chance to see exactly how you would go about striking
defenses as invincible as the Germans. And it looks a lot
like World War two.
03:14:40
And you know several historians have pointed out that by the end of the First World War the armies are pro
Second World War armies. There are certain battles though during the war where you can say
aha there is a big step forward towards that second world war.
Twentieth century in a style of fighting that's what the battle of Eros is known
for now in the grand scheme of things as we said this is the spring offensive this is what
the allies do every year right the weather gets good in spring. We launch an offensive the British and the
French launch one together where they launch one in tandem. The Italians do as we said I mean they launch of everywhere
the Russians this is the big spring offensive the British part is these sort of diversion as we
said and yet they're going to pull this off initially. So
while they're going to show everyone what twentieth century combined
arms warfare looks like including aircraft the amount of coordination though that has to come
off correctly to make this work is stunning and it can't be maintained. But for
the short period of time they're able to make it work.
03:15:41
The British show you that modern combined arms warfare
can devastate these static defenses.
03:15:50
Here's a way historian Peter Hart describes the many things that were starting to come together that
could be unleashed at Ross and how scientific in modern twentieth century this
profession of arms is really becoming.
03:16:02
He writes quote.
03:16:05
Many lessons have been learned from the Somme and artillery was at the heart of the plans and the
Royal Artillery had come a long way since one thousand nine hundred fifteen that thousands upon thousands
of new recruits had learned their trade well. The gun detachments the layers the
N.C.O. as the officers were all now wedded to new efficient batteries that were capable of
increasingly sophisticated and complex bombardments. The guns themselves were now
plentiful and there were vast numbers of medium and heavy artillery pieces joining the masses of
ordinary eighteen pounder and four and a half inch howitzer Field Artillery
advances in technology and science also combined to give a greater understanding of the
mechanics of a shell in flight and the measurable adjustments caused by different
meteorological conditions. Accuracy was improving and the advent of the one hundred
sixty use meant that shells would burst instantaneously on the slightest contact
which made clearing barbed wire a great deal simpler. Smoke shells are also now
routinely incorporated into the barrages to try to mask the attacking infantry from
German defenders. Gas shells were a key part of the barrages and they were less visually
dramatic than the clouds of gas released from cylinders but they were far easier to deploy
and much more predictable in their effects. Progress in the linked tasks of photographic
reconnaissance and artillery observation allowed targets to be identified and then
destroyed by indirect fire. New techniques of flash spotting and sound
ranging also assisted in locating the exact positions of German batteries.
03:17:34
And quote The amount of coordination though that has to come off correctly to make this stuff
work is astounding and it shouldn't be surprising that it usually doesn't. What makes
us different is that in some cases it did at the Battle of us take for example
the creeping barrage of the creeping barrage is a fantastic
military innovation and they've been trying to make it work before this battle.
03:17:58
In this battle they got it right in this battle they were able for a while to create
a protective explosive force field around British troops
the way it worked as you would get a ton of guns anywhere from several hundred to more than a thousand
firing giant cannon aides in front of your
advancing forces creating a wall of explosions in front of them
and you would have it coordinated everybody would have their you know watches synchronized in the troops would be told
OK in the first twenty minutes you were to move you know one hundred yards forward.
03:18:33
And at this time the barrage will shift another hundred yards in front of you so this is all worked out so
that you know the protective barrage is supposed to keep the troops safe as they
advance toward the enemy and the very last step of course is the barrage will land right on
the enemy and then it will lift at the last second and the enemy will look up in the British forces will be right there
standing in front of them having marched the whole way with a giant explosive force field
protecting them.
03:18:59
As you might imagine coordination is critical. You screw this up in one of two things
happens.
03:19:04
The better thing is that the barrage gets WAY ahead of the troops and they're exposed to all the machine gun
fire and all the stuff the barrage was supposed to protect them from. That's the good part. That's the best outcome
the worst outcome is that the barrage is short and that giant explosive wall that's supposed to
protect you from the enemy instead decimate you.
03:19:24
When it works it's fantastic. At the Battle of R S It works initially
.
03:19:31
They'll be a bunch of innovations in this battle. Another one again. It's been tried before but never
quite like this is whole batteries of machine guns will be used in what's called
indirect fire meaning they point them up to the sky so that the bullets end up
falling you know right straight down on target you could shoot over hills that way
not even seeing what you're shooting at as one historian explained it it's like hosing
down an important piece of ground they would have thousands of machine gun bullets falling
every second on some of these important road crossings and whatnot all through this
battle. One of the important elements at the start of the battle is that
so many of the troops that are going to initially rushed the German side are
underground at the start of the battle there's a lot of chalky ground in this part of France and like a lot of these
battles there will be a ton of digging. In fact for months the Germans and the
British on both sides have had sort of a tunneling war and occasionally you know British
tunnels toward the German front run into German tunnelers going the other way and they had these terrible
gun fights in the dark underground you know like troglodyte fighting
. Some sources say that the moment the actual ground
battle at Iraq started some of these tunnels had gone up all the way to the German lines but just a
couple of feet separated them from the German trench lines and that at that
second the battle started they exploded. Charges in those those little walls of dirt blew
down and the Canadians you know stormed through the breach is it doesn't matter what exactly
happened. The Canadians stormed the ridge though and took it on the first
day. A rage that untold numbers of Frenchmen had died trying to
take back in one thousand fifteen. It's a huge Canadian victory
and the Germans were in terrible trouble for a short while at the Battle of ours
and by the way it's not just Canadians they get a lot of credit and deservedly so. But there were a
Scotsman for example up on the same Hill dealing with all kinds of problems.
And yet for the first twenty four hours it looked like Douglas
Haig the British commander was going to have on his hands the long awaited much
fantasized about in his head breakthrough
.
03:21:45
Luden Dorf writes in his diaries that it was a dangerous moment. And then and then
lamented the fact that here this brand new defense in depth system he'd come up with with all this
work and all this money spent was apparently useless against these new British combined arms
tactics.
03:22:00
That was until he figured out that his commander on the scene a guy named Falcon Howes and a seventy
something year old guy hadn't quite figured out what he was supposed to
do with these new tactics they were still way too new and he had done a bunch of things that
were part of the old tactics he put all those guys for the most part way up front where they could be
you know taken by the artillery. More than two and a half million British shells
by the way fired in a shorter time than the Battle of the Somme and
then he put his reserves that are supposed to be there to plug any holes fifteen miles back too
far to do anything in for a short period of time.
03:22:37
It looked like the British were going to break through with this battle.
03:22:40
And then just like all these other battles it slows down
once the troops advance beyond where their gunfire can help them. Then the guns
behind them have to move too and that takes time and everybody gets tired
and they begin to wear out and while they're resting in rejuvenating themselves for the next push
the Germans are bringing up their reserves and the battle of Arras with this wonderful first day in this
capture of this important the ME rage turns into just another one of these
battles and by the time it's over more than a month later you have
like one hundred fifty thousand British casualties and like one hundred thirty thousand German ones and
by the way I found it interesting that the newer histories numbers of the casualties these battles are
significantly higher than the older ones. I have a son that's saying that seventy five thousand British
died at this battle. That's a big discrepancy in the numbers nonetheless the traditional numbers
thrown out today are well over one hundred thousand for both sides. The joy
over the NIE was short lived. And what had happened at this panel
would happen and a bunch of other first world war battles. It shows the difference between how
well the first stage usually the first twenty four maybe thirty six hours of these
minute Lee exquisitely planned encounters go the part that's all been
rehearsed and trained for for months and months and months goes great and you're able to make the
coordination work but then the next jump in wherever you are in these
battles is the part that becomes much more improvisational much more ad hoc. You can't
have a plan you know months in advance for what you do on the second day of the battle
because you're not really sure where you're going to be the second day you may have some. But that doesn't
mean that's what you're going to do and and as many historians point out when you look at the next jumps in any of
these offensives they are so much more haphazard and all that coordination falls apart that you
don't see the wonderful results that that months of preparation gave you for twenty
four or thirty six hours. And yet you can't break through these kinds of deep
defenses in that short of a period of time. You would have to have that combined arms
activity work as well as it did for the first twenty four hours at Iraq and be able to
carry it through for a week or two. Never the less it was a near run thing. It's
gone down in history as a as a as a heroic encounter mostly for the Canadians the largest
endeavor they participated in yet on the western front. And I always have to remind
myself you know you look at this in an almost Field-Marshal type
fashion when you study this for military history you see it the way the Generals often did these advancements on these maps
what worked and what didn't you know the coordination question that the technical side of war that we have to
remember that when I was trying to remind myself to the people on the ground this is not so technical
. Philip Gibbs was there he was in the
tunnels with the troops as they came back from these
encounters up on the ridge in places like that. Gibbs gives you a real feel for what
it was like.
03:25:41
He writes quote there were tunnels beneath the roster which our men
advance to the German lines. And I went along them when one line of men was going into
battle and another was coming back wounded some of them blind
bloody vomiting with the fumes of gas in their lungs their steel hats
clinking as they groped past one another in vaults on each side of these passages.
Men played cards on barrels to the light of candles stuck in bottles or slept
until their turn to fight with gas masks for their pillows.
03:26:15
He's outside the Citadel meaning of the city.
03:26:18
There were long queues of wounded men taking their turn to the surgeons who were
working in a deep crypt with a high vaulted roof. One day there were three
thousand of them silent patient muddy blood stained
blind boys or men with smashed faces swapped in bloody rags groped
forward to the dark passages leading to the vault led by comrades on the grass
outside lay men with leg wounds and stomach wounds and quote
Norman Collins is an officer with the Scottish fourth Seaforth Highlanders and
there they are two and Collins just tells these stories that
remind you of the very strange moral positions these
kinds of conflicts put you in.
03:27:04
Collins talks about the fact that they were actually shown
how to kill one of their own men on the battlefield because of
the pain and suffering that they were enduring.
03:27:17
And this isn't specific to this battle. This happened on the battlefields throughout the
First World War in basically every army. You know they got caught in these conditions
these are human problems the physics of humankind on these twentieth Century Battlefields.
03:27:31
The results are predictable horrifying and
pitiable.
03:27:38
Collins writes quote after such intense fighting you always had men lying
out in no man's land probably with their testicles blown off and crying in agony and laying
out there all night long in the dark in the rain. Most would never have survived but
you had a choice they could die in agony or you could shoot them. You were shown how to
do the thing very cleanly. You would take your forty five revolver and talk to the man
and kneel behind him and whilst you were talking pull the trigger put a bullet through the
back of his head and immediately the whole front skull came away and they were dead instantly. There was no
pain about it but I can honestly say this that I never had the courage because that's what it
took. I never had the courage myself to shoot a wounded soldier. I carried out the
operation many times afterwards on animals. I could kill a pet dog far better than a vet
could but I was never able to shoot a wounded soldier. I probably should have my
friend auto Marie Dixon was wounded in the stomach and the iris attack in April. He was
in great agony from what I was told. The kindest thing would have been to shoot him on the battlefield
instead of that they took him back to the hospital and he died days later. It's a tremendous thing to
shoot a friend even though he's in agony and I just didn't have the courage to do it. Most of
them died overnight but of course they didn't thank you for it I'm sure.
03:28:56
End quote.
03:28:59
There are battles coming up where the numbers of people who are either
shot by their own man or they need to be
will skyrocket. None the less this battle was
tough enough. The initial stages of elation at taking things like the
rage became nightmarish as the
months went on and the casualties piled up. Before
long the British were suffering four thousand casualties a day at Eros
and it was getting to the morale of the troops.
03:29:36
Gibbs tells a story about arriving on the scene right after a bunch of men just
behind the front had been blown up in their bath together in the bath is strewn with body
parts and blood and he and a soldier he knows sits down to talk about you know how
things are going. And the soldier is clearly at the end of his rope as far as what he's willing
to put up with.
03:29:57
He writes quote a few minutes before our meeting a shell had crashed into a back
close to their hut where men were washing themselves. The explosion filled the bath with blood and
bits of flesh. The younger officers stared at me under the tilt forward of his steel hat and
said hello good news. I played chess with him and grooms caf in Fleet Street in
days before the war. I went back to his hut and had tea with him close to that bath
hoping we should not get caught up with the cake.
03:30:25
End quote.
03:30:27
Now this battle as I said is known for how wonderfully competent
the integration of all the different elements were to make this battle so effective.
03:30:37
That's not how the guy on the ground sees it though Gibbs says that his friend
he's having tea with says quote I had heard before some harsh words
about our general ship and staff work but never anything so passionate so violent as
from that gun or officer. His view of the business was summed up in the word murder
. He raged against the impossible orders sent down from headquarters against the
brutality with which men were left in the line week after week and against the monstrous
abominable futility of all our so-called strategy. His nerves were in
rags as I could see by the way in which his hand shook when he lighted one cigarette after another
. His spirit was in a flame of revolt against the misery of his sleeplessness
filth and imminent peril of death end quote.
03:31:26
If British reporter Philip Gibbs thinks that that's a high level of discontent and
perhaps in the British army it is. He ought to see what's going on in the French army
at about the same time. In France a great
drama is unfolding during this time period because right before these
offensives are scheduled to start the French government falls and
new political leaders take over a new president a new war minister all the civilian leaders have
changed and these civilian leaders have a very different attitude towards this offensive that's about to
start than the people they succeeded.
03:32:03
This causes huge problems the first thing is they're not big fans of Nevada all but join the club
there are lots of people who wonder why this guy got the top job when there were several you know
superior figures really Augusto people who could have gotten it Battan far as people
like that were sitting in the wings and they gave it to a much more junior person but. But for
political reasons and that last government in ways that were good for that last government
but now that last government was gone in the new one that comes into power would have rather had any one of
those other people. What's more they don't like his plan. His idea
for this great thunderbolt assault with all this artillery that's going to end the war in forty eight hours. They're not
buying it. A lot of people are by the way a lot of people are drinking the Robert
Nouvelle Kool-Aid and getting into this optimistic mood about this thunderbolt ending the
war.
03:32:54
But the new government's pretty sure that that's not what's going to happen. And they've got some
people who are you know sending the message just warning them. There are other military
commanders in France who are saying call this thing off. It's going to be a disaster. Some of
them are people who are actually subordinate to the Valen who have jobs
to do in this coming offensive that's scaring the government as you
might imagine. This is all part of this
growing interference with politicians in the affairs of generals and this is one of
those times where there's sort of a face off a meeting this call
between the new war minister and Novell in late March in The New War Minister wants to
convince divel to call this whole offensive off and the almost impossible thing to
do as we said earlier by the time you reach these you know stages where you're just finishing the last
touches to ready to go it's taken months and months in the training in the rehearsals and the money spent and all
this stuff and now the government the civilian leaders who don't know anything about war any general
would think want to call it off.
03:34:00
My reputation relies on that I mean there's a lot of personal motives and the War
Minister has some good arguments. He tries to tell him Look everything's
changed since you first formulated this plan. Just be prudent to
re-evaluate.
03:34:17
I mean the Germans pulled back from their old positions to these new positions on the
line in other places right. There's one big change but not just that the
war minister tries to make the case that all of these big events are happening right now these
trends coming together everything we've talked about on this program up to date are
coming to the fore at the same time
in late March when the war minister is talking to Novell about this the United States is just about to get
in the war and everyone knows it. The Russian Revolution has just happened
. The submarines are about to enter into the month where they sink eight
hundred forty thousand tons of Allied shipping. There's a lot going on and
France's war minister tries to tell me that listen no one's going to hold you I mean everything's
changed. Maybe we should reevaluate Nivelle says no.
03:35:10
If the government gets even more desperate as the offensive nears and
presses him and he pulls the take away card he says to the
government either you back me on this or I resign and everything I've
read says that this is a crisis for the French government at this point for all sorts of internal reasons.
03:35:29
It was likely to bring the government down if they fired the veil right before his offensive was supposed to
take hold and everyone who bought into the optimism and drank the Kool-Aid they had almost no choice in this confrontation
between politicians and generals and the government backed down. But it was even worse
than the government knew because the Germans knew all about
Novell's plans in detail two major incidents
one involving captured documents that never should have been anywhere near the front lines that the Germans got
their hands on it in a raid and then officer that they captured were able to find out more. The
Germans knew all about the French plans and when they were going to take place and what was going to happen
. And they had known in general for months air
reconnaissance had told them I mean these giant affairs are like giant supply dumps that go on for
miles and miles and miles it's very difficult to keep the enemy from finding out about it. And in
January the Germans had about nine divisions opposite Novell's
army is by the time Novell's about to launch his attack the Germans have forty eight
and they're waiting.
03:36:34
And it's a disaster.
03:36:37
Historian Holger Hervey writes quote After several delays due to foul
weather Novell on sixteenth April unleashed his artillery for nine days
and then mounted his infantry charge in driving rain. Reports from agents and
French P O W's had tipped the Germans off to the coming offensive given the news
of the offensive in the difficulty of the terrain. The Germans were able to halt the main attack before it
got beyond their first line whereas Nivelle had forecast a penetration of seven or
eight miles on the opening day. The French rarely advanced more than one or two miles.
Losses were horrendous whereas Nivelle had coldly predicted ten thousand casualties
for the first day. The number was ten times greater. After the war the historical
service of the French General Staff placed casualties for the first four days of the offensive
at thirty thousand killed one hundred thousand wounded and four thousand
missing.
03:37:32
End quote.
03:37:34
Now the story of what happened at this battle of Novell's is a
wonderful demonstration of how many things can go
wrong when you're trying to synchronize everything so carefully.
03:37:46
Start with the weather just like Eros a week before the weather was bad.
You know who has snow during the spring offensive but that's what the French face sleet snow
rain creating mud that slowed the progress of the infantry which had been
calculated precisely to keep up with the explosive force field of
the creeping barrage which this guy novella pioneered back in for Dunn but
never on this kind of the scale and in this case the you know barrage the
force field got way ahead of the troops exposing the troops to just unbelievable
amounts of machine gun fire. There's one part of this front where the French have to travel for
ever. I mean Miles to take this. You know
height in the distance and in this rage Dave the Germans have cut all these little holes
into the side of it you know to to add to the ravines in the gorges and everything that are already in and they've
stuffed machine guns in every hole that you can fit into this hillside. They've got about
four thousand of them trained on this French infantry trying to you know cross
this base and at Eros and here you know when
you read the history books they sound like relatively productive First
World War battles because the soldiers actually take quite a bit more ground than they did in the earlier
battles. But that's sort of deceiving because this is all part of the new German strategy
. This defense in depth where the Germans are supposed to fight to the death all up on the front lines now and not
give an inch of ground they're supposed to fight to a reasonable degree and then retire to the next line of
defense. So they're letting the enemy have more ground. They're just killing more of them while they
retreat. The French actually stumble in to these
first line areas and think that they're winning because they're just not finding that many Germans
and then the Germans open up on them from the second line positions as
you might imagine a government that had been assured that they'll
call this thing off in forty eight hours.
03:39:47
You know I was going to try to cash in on that guarantee.
03:39:51
They actually gave Novell an extra day on his forty eight hour promise Here's how a writer
G.J. Meyer describes a situation where the politicians come to the General
and tell him to call the whole thing off now. You guaranteed it wasn't going to be another
Psalm. You guaranteed we're going to win the war with this thunderbolt.
03:40:11
And here's what Meyer writes quote on April nineteenth three days after
the attack starts the war minister intervened trying to get
Novell to stop the general who in demanding approval of his grand plan had promised to
call it off if a breakthrough were not achieved within forty eight hours. Refused
the very next day he found to his chagrin however that he had no choice but to pause
the divisions at the front were breaking down both their morale and their supplies of
ammunition dangerously low. Late on the day after that April twenty first a new
phenomenon appeared.
03:40:46
End quote.
03:40:50
John Keegan among other historians has gone to great lengths to point out how there's an
accordion like back up that begins once the timetable
isn't held to strickly when when the front elements of these French forces get bogged
down. Everything behind it gets traffic jammed. We've quoted Louis barked
us a French corporal in the story several times and Bart tosses at this battle
but he never sees anything he gets stuck in one of these traffic jams. And as far as you know
something's going on a mile or two in front of him but he doesn't ever get there to find out what it is. The
soldiers who find out what it is though begin to react as one
might imagine from the horror and in this case the tip of the spear in one of these areas
are French colonial troops.
03:41:37
This story of what happened was relayed to British journalist Philip Gibbs who writes quote
talking about the French infantry here gives talks about how the French were lured into the lightly
defended first zone only to be attacked by the Germans in the second zone of Defence he writes
quote they were to be allowed an easy walk through to their death trap
.
03:41:57
That is what happened. The French infantry advancing with masses of black troops
in the Colonial corps in the front line of assault all exultant and inspired by a belief in
victory swept through the forward zone of the German defenses astonished and
then disconcerted by the scarcity of Germans until an annihilating barrage fire
dropped upon them and smashed their human waves from French officers and
nurses I heard appalling tales of this tragedy the death wail of the black
troops froze the blood of the Frenchmen with horror.
03:42:29
Their own losses were immense in a bloody shambles and quote
the French colonial soldiers which had been thrown into this
disaster ran screaming back towards their own lines
yelling peace down with the war death to those who are
responsible and all of a sudden
the French army began to collapse.
03:42:58
Traditionally the novella fence will be seen as the straw that breaks the camel's back for
the French military and it's ironic that it would be that way because if it's just judged in
relation to all the other French battles than of elephants it is not terrible.
03:43:12
The casualty bill is horrifying but pretty normal for these big battles and remember there are people
being killed every day on so-called quiet fronts I mean the British casualties
every week to what they call wastage just living on the western front with snipers
and bombs and trench raids and all that is five thousand people a week. So I mean even
between the big battles it's horrible but in the big battles the numbers are astronomical. By that standard the
development is not that bad and they did gain you know a pretty decent amount of ground you know three miles in
some places but this was sold in a completely different way the
salesman Robert Novell sold this as the thunderbolt that wins the war. Everybody got to have
this last push of optimism and strength and resources and gumption
to end the war and then we can all go home and the suffering is over and a lot of people drank the kool aid and the
crash after they drank the Kool-Aid was worse than if they'd never had the Kool-Aid
at all.
03:44:09
All that optimism boomeranged back on the vow who started to try to
recast the marketing just you know twenty four hours into the conflict he was no longer talking about war
winning thunderbolt he was talking about how it's going very well with modest gains in the sector in the sector
and no one was buying the re crafting of the marketing strategy.
03:44:29
The French government now has a wonderful little drama on its hands where it tries to get rid of Nivelle and he won't go
quietly.
03:44:36
They put Tom on who's very competent. We talked about him earlier in the Vales
old job and they have a face off and you see this wonderful again change in the guard between
politicians kind of trying to assert their authority over the generals in this push entirely on
who's going to be the ultimate authority.
03:44:56
The one thing that the politicians have in their favor is that they're concerned about casualties and the
generals appear to not be concerned about casualties and the people who are rising up in French
units up and down the Western Front are very concerned about casualties.
03:45:12
Then develop offensive. Traditionally is what kicks off were
called the nine hundred seventeen these in one thousand seventeen.
03:45:21
That's a weird term and it makes it sound like one unit rebels and then the rebellion so
you know it transfers like wildfire up and down the front and and all these units racking simultaneously if
that had happened the war would have been over for France. I mean what do you do to
stop a rebellion a revolution when it's the Army that's rebelling if that had happened it would have been
all over and the French government knew it and acted accordingly. Instead you have to
imagine a burning roof with the embers everywhere you know going off into the wind and
landing all over the dry grass on the lawn and you know the French government is running
around stamping out fires as they catch hold I mean as many as six of these units a day
were involved and as I said what the French called acts of collective
indiscipline which meant a whole wide range of things. Sometimes it meant getting drunk as an entire unit
and that was the end of that we're not going anywhere. Other times they just refused to go up to the front
one you know Force decided to march on Paris it was talked out of that at the last minute.
03:46:21
And a lot of this was tied to the Russian revolution going on
simultaneously.
03:46:28
The French in the field saw that all of a sudden Russian soldiers maybe were going to get out of
fighting this war because they'd somehow with the people acted together to go after the
people that were as loony Bartos explained it in slaving them.
03:46:42
Louis bar Thomas who was a socialist and who would have viewed these happenings in Petrograd in
Russia with great enthusiasm wrote
this right around the times the outbreaks of collective
indiscipline are happening in his army quote At this time the
Russian Revolution broke out those Slavic soldiers only yesterday
enslaved and bent double under the weight of iron discipline unknowingly marched off to
massacres like resigned slaves had thrown off their yokes proclaimed their
liberty and imposed peace on their masters their hangman. The whole world was
stupefied petrified by this revolution. This collapse of the immense empire of
the czars. These events had repercussions on the Western Front and drop the French
ranks a wind of revolt blew across almost all the regiments and
quote.
03:47:36
But as I said it was an uneven sort of an affair. Sometimes it involved whole
units large numbers of troops other times it was a decision made by single individuals
alone that they just weren't going to have their lives thrown into a meat grinder
anymore historian Erik Dorn Bros tried to give you a sense of the feeling when he writes
quote already on day two of the Nivelle offensive seventeen soldiers
of one regiment left their post and went to the rear and then in May thirty thousand infantry men
abandon the line.
03:48:06
A junior officer recorded the scene at one train station receiving men who'd been rotated out of the
line. Now Burroughs is quoting an eyewitness and the eyewitness to the troops
getting away from the front during this rebellious time says quote As soon as the
train enters with what you would say a horde of savages all the doors open on
both sides and men flat out on the platforms shouts insults and
threats fly in all direction.
03:48:33
Death to the shirkers at home. Murderers and pigs that they are. Long live the
revolution.
03:48:38
Down with the war it's peace we want etc Now Bros picks up
the narrative quote the trouble spread the sixty eight of one hundred twelve divisions in the
French army in June. Each reporting one to five mutinous incidents but no killing of
officers. The rank and file demanded an end to further attacks. Better pay
and living conditions and more furloughs.
03:49:00
End quote.
03:49:03
John Keegan and a couple of other historians have an interesting way of describing
this. This act of rebellion that was breaking out almost spontaneously although
influenced by other breakouts all across and up and down the western front. He says it's like a labor
strike like the soldiers had just decided that they weren't going to
do certain things anymore. He said it wasn't defeatism.
03:49:26
It was defensive meaning that these soldiers were not going to let the Germans come and
invade France they weren't going to abandon the line and they wouldn't stop fighting but they weren't going to be
involved in any more of these offensives where one hundred thirty hundred forty hundred
fifty thousand of them were going to become casualties in a hopeless cause.
03:49:45
Let's also remember that it didn't get to this point until the French Army had suffered in
three and a half years. About as many killed as the United States has suffered in
all its wars put together.
03:49:58
How would the United States today a nation of three hundred million
friends out about thirty nine or forty deal with one point five or one point
seven million dead in four years. If you adjust it for
population size they'd be more like seven seven and a half million somewhere around there.
Can you imagine.
03:50:19
Would you expect us to be hangover free for the rest of the century in terms
of military affairs. The French had some lingering damage because of this first world
war. Anyone else would. It's amazing they got back on their feet at all.
It's also sort of a wonder for the Allied cause that the Germans are unaware of this
somehow. It's funny you have the Nivelle offensive that everybody in Germany is like talking about on the streets it's
so well known and yet the French army starts falling apart and rebelling and the Germans don't
know.
03:50:50
If you're the French high command and you got your army you know starting to catch
fire like a bunch of rooftop embers that are falling on dry grass What do you do to
stop that. You got to be very careful don't you. If you give up too much it becomes like what the
Russians are dealing with where you can't even have the troops in order to around where they start
electing their own little governing groups and they do what they want. Can't have that. But if you crack
down to get all tough on him you might spread the revolution it's a deft and
terrible tightrope for the French government to walk this new military leader that takes
over for him develop a talent is considered to be sort of a soldier general so that helps. And he'll famously go
around all these units speaking to them and actually promising and delivering some of the
reforms they want.
03:51:35
For example reforms on home leave food drink I mean there's a bunch of things that he can
manage to perk up and take care of that help the troops you know griping on the front
at the same time he has to show who's still in charge this is still a military. Laws are
broken. Discipline must be maintained. The French started crackdown in
July one thousand seven hundred they will court martial almost twenty four thousand soldiers
for collective indiscipline. They'll issue about five hundred death sentences.
They will actually carry out less than one hundred of them.
03:52:09
But there's one thing Katon can't change. He cannot make this army capable or willing
or trustworthy to go on another major offensive.
03:52:17
This is an army that has to regroup be rebuilt refortified in Bhutan is going to do a
historically famous job of this but it's going to take time and in the meantime the number one
thing that he gives to his troops that they were asking for because he's got no choice is that they're not going
to be thrown into a murderous hopeless offensives anytime soon
. This leaves the Western Front in any sort of
offensive activity on it for the rest of one thousand and seventeen to the British alone
.
03:52:47
The British Commander Douglas Haig is fine with that because he has a plan
and he wanted to carry it out for some time and now that the French are not in his way he
casts his covetous eye on
APRA and the Belgian ports yet again.
03:53:07
Douglas Hague the British military leader wants the British to launch an attack on the
German defenses in Belgium where there's already been two
battles in this war already. Now he's got a
great army to do this with the British army in the late one nine hundred seventy mid one nine hundred
seventeen is is maybe the best army in the war at this time it's taken years for the British
in a traditional Yosi power to build up the land power. But by July August one thousand seven
hundred they've done a great job of doing just that and it's millions strong in the
British and a boutique army when this war started very very fine and professional and
volunteers but but a boutique army what they have in one nine hundred
seventeen are a bunch of mostly conscripts some volunteers are mostly conscripts they don't
sing on their way to and from battle anymore like in one thousand fourteen after the Somme that'll
stop these are a bunch of grim professionals who operate
with deadly efficiency and have a sort of a
morale that's hard to describe.
03:54:11
And they suffered a terrible you know ordeal the year before at the Battle of the Somme terrible lost
a lot of fantastic people but came back with even more artillery pieces here in one thousand seven hundred.
It's a great tool in the hands of Haig and Haig wants to use it in Belgium against the Germans.
But there are people who think that that's a stupid idea. And after several years of war
when you've watched you know the same thing happen over and over again in all these battles there
are people that are going to push back and you're starting to see some of these political leaders start to question what the military
is doing openly to their face and you know when we mentioned this earlier I don't want to
insinuate that this never happens I mean Abraham Lincoln for example famously would argue with the Civil
War generals and they would resent it.
03:54:54
But in some countries like Germany politicians in Germany do not interfere in military
strategy and they've only just started doing that in France
with the collapse of the Nivelle offensive right. It was the Nivelle offensive that sort of brought them into
saying Are you sure we want to do something like this again in Britain.
You know I would think as a modern person reading the story and I think many of you probably thought the same thing you're
wondering why it took this long how many times can you lose hundreds of thousands of people in
what appeared to the non-military eye to be very similar kinds of attacks. Maybe a little
strange if there weren't more people questioning this. In Britain there are led by the
prime minister Lloyd George.
03:55:37
Now George to be fair is viewed by history very similarly to the way Woodrow Wilson
is. It's almost as though there's a good Lloyd George and there's an evil Lloyd George and you know
different histories will portray him differently but take him at face value. Lloyd
George presents himself as the person who defends the soldiers
from the generals.
03:55:59
He says during this whole lead in to whether or not hay gets to have his Belgian
offensive quote.
03:56:07
The Cabinet must regard themselves as trustees for the fine fellows that constitute our
army. They're willing to face any dangers and they do so without complaint but they
trust to the leaders of the nation to see that their lives are not needlessly thrown away
and that they're not sacrificed on mere gambles which are resorted to merely because those who are
directing the war can think of nothing better to do with the men under their command. It is
therefore imperative that before we embark upon a gigantic attack which must
necessarily entail the loss of scores of thousands of valuable lives and produce
that sense of discouragement which might very well Rush nations into premature peace
that we should feel a fair confidence that such an attack has a reasonable chance of succeeding
.
03:56:51
A mere gamble would be both a folly and a crime and a quote.
03:56:57
I must confess that to the modern observer having just witnessed the several years
previous of this war you think to yourself when you hear something like that it's about
damn time.
03:57:10
But many modern historians wonder they wonder if Hague
didn't have a pretty good feel for this thing and that these politicians were barking up the
wrong tree maybe for their own political purposes. Hey it sure makes it
look like Lloyd George doesn't know what he's talking about when he opens up an
operation on June seventh one thousand nine hundred seventeen. To take this
high ground that he needs to take before he can have his people about all. It's called Messina
Ridge and the British head since nineteen fifteen been
tunneling under this eight miles of ridge lines and planting
explosives underneath the incredibly deep and complicated German
defenses up there. They were impenetrable. British went underneath them and the Germans
knew they were doing some of this because they found one of them. But on June seventh one thousand seventeen
when Haig decides he's going to take this high ground he starts off his attack by
blowing up that eight miles of ridge lines with these munitions
. There's more than a million pounds of explosives underneath those hills. And when they blow
up all within twenty eight seconds of each other supposedly You could hear it in
London.
03:58:23
I've heard some people say it was heard in Ireland. It's thought to be the
biggest manmade explosion before nuclear weapons or atomic weapons
and it vaporizes ten thousand Germans instantly
.
03:58:39
The second those mines are blown up.
03:58:42
Thousands of British artillery pieces on the horizon opened fire on this same line of
ridges and the British eighty thousand of them who come
out of their trenches and march toward that high ground have a pretty darn easy time
taking it by first world war standards. I'm going to always throw that in because to the naked eye
it still looks like a lot of people died but by first world war standards that's a pretty darn good attack and once
again it seems to show that the British have found the secret sauce the magic formula of how the
tanks and the artillery the aircraft and it all works together perfectly and boom. Messina reach taken
for not that much loss of life.
03:59:19
It seems like a knows what he's doing. But before he gets approval for this battle of the brain and pulling up the
guns he's getting ready. Lloyd George and company take him into a back room and make him kind of do a
powerpoint presentation for Britain's civilian leaders and Haig sort of grits his teeth
and does it and explains why it'll be a good thing and you know why why we should be doing this and why
it should be a walkover Did you see that wonderful bio We just bought and took Messina Ridge
Hague will end up getting other generals and admirals to sort of side with him against the
political leadership.
03:59:50
There were always politicians who sided with the military and thought they are the professionals you
leave things to them. For guys like Churchill or Lloyd George who were the
ones questioning military leadership they were in a very tough position can you imagine what
risk they would have run if they had overruled all their military professionals and then
two hundred thousand guys get killed in a battle which by the way is almost the
default result of a lot of these battles. So you could pretty much be assured that that would
happen if it happened to the generals Oh well it just happened again to the generals. But if Lloyd
George overruled all their generals and it happened because of him and you can be sure he would have been
roasted.
04:00:31
So predictably Douglas he gets his offensive. He starts
by starting a military bombardment of the area right around July fifteenth
July twentieth before the ground attack starts the British will shoot almost
four million shells to just show you how the progression is going. A year ago
at the Somme we were all saucer eyed and so was the rest of the world at the time when the
British shot off a million shells before they started that battle for this when they were
shooting off almost four million you can see why Germany's concerned with
finding a way to turn their entire country into a munitions factory as we said
was the goal.
04:01:12
On July thirty first one thousand seventeen.
The offensive starts very soon afterwards
. So there's the rain.
04:01:26
It will be the rain that will give this battle its unique standout
character and there are so many battles in the first world war that sound the same
that only a few stand out and it's always for some particular reason to become associated with something
special. You know in a horrific way the most casualties are the most shells or the most this or
that.
04:01:45
I mean everyone knows we're done is the great artillery meat grinder offensive the psalm is
that horrible tragic situation with maybe tragic incompetence
the brutal awful offensive in the east is known for its scope passion Dail which will
be the British name for thirty parade is known for its mud and mud.
04:02:04
Doesn't sound like too terrible a thing but when you think about living outdoors and fighting
mud makes a terrible situation worse and I don't want to suggest that just because this is
probably the worst mud anyone has ever fought in in the first world war that
mud has not been a problem for soldiers on other fronts and in other battles it's been sort of
the bane of the existence for people especially in trenches but nowhere is the
mud like it is in Flanders. The soldiers fighting in it describe it as having a consistency of
porridge or cheesecake. There is no bottom to it and you
sink in it slowly as you would in quicksand. There are a lot of
people who died in the first two battles of IBRA by drowning.
04:02:49
In addition there is a complex very fragile system
of dykes and other water and flood control measures that have been implemented in that area over
the centuries to keep the water from taking it over. The artillery has done great damage
to that before thirty. Now with this wonderful barrage of four million
shells that the British have launched into this area they've destroyed whatever
was left of that system. But it's when the rain starts that he gets horrifying because you
take an already horrifying First World War Western for a battlefield of the sort we've
described with the giant trenches everywhere the vegetation all gone except for the little twigs and
sticks that used to be giant trees. This horrific hell more door like you know
landscape and you flood it. Now we've had battles like the song where there will be rain and you
will have moments of flooding but it isn't like this. This battlefield will start to flood and it will stay
that way.
04:03:44
There will only be three dry days in the month of August
. In fact they get double the normal rainfall
and this turns the area into a swamp.
04:03:58
A swamp of quicksand and very quickly with all of the you know
casualties that start cropping up you get the same kind of situation we talked about at the Somme where these
shell holes which are everywhere are filled with water become like toxic
dumps with human bodies decaying in them in the remnants of poison gas and trash
and the results of them using these things as latrines I mean it is the most sickening stuff
you can think of as a matter of fact one of the problems confronting the British at this battle is
they don't have water for the troops they have water everywhere they have water coming out their ears but none to drink
.
04:04:33
And these shallow holes and the mud will form as nasty an
enemy to the soldiers fighting in this as they are you know opposition and I don't want
to suggest it wasn't bad for the Germans either that maybe the overlooked side of passion Dale. It's
so horrible and this is seared into British consciousness that it's so horrible for British troops
which let's remember are not just English folks. They're Welsh Scotch Irish
Newfoundland Indian Australian New Zealand Canadian and I'm leaving some out
there all their suffering. But the Germans are suffering too.
The rain is so bad that within just a few days Hague has to call a halt
to operations the guns are sinking. You know the horses are sinking up to
their chest. The people are sinking what makes this battle but to cure really
horrifying is that in no other battle in the First World War Do you routinely
see the soldiers put in that unbelievable situation that we quoted Norman Cousins that
Scottish soldier you know is saying he was given the tools to kill his
fellow man if they were badly wounded on the battlefield. What if they're slowly sinking in
mud because that's what was happening. When we talk about battles that scar
Nations what do we mean by that. Well in the First World War hundreds of
thousands sometimes millions of men would go through these terrible places passion
Dale's one you know overdone was another the Somme was another the Bruce a lot of offensive I mean
these people who go through these horrible experiences number in the hundreds of thousands or millions. Those
survivors then go home permanently changed. How many human beings have to
go home permanently changed for that to ripple across their entire
societies. Passion Dale did just that and part of the reason why was because what these people
saw just destroyed them.
04:06:24
I mean the most widely you know lampooned poetic line is widely
lampooned because it became so associated with this battle that freed so soon wrote I died in
hell they called it passion Dale.
04:06:38
If you can see pictures by the way of this battle on the battlefield to try to keep soldiers from
getting stuck in the mud. They laid down duck boards and so you have and you have to
imagine go look at pictures it is amazing.
04:06:50
You have a battlefield that looks like the moon if the moon had been turned to
mud. And then on the mud to try to keep people from sinking
into it as though it's quicksand they put these little teeny planks in and they and they
make them look like paths you know for where people need to go but what this does is it means
that the soldiers have to actually walk on those machine gunners can just target them.
04:07:13
And these duck boards are blown up every night by the artillery. And every night the Royal
Engineers come and we rebuild them for the next day under fire.
04:07:23
Here Hart in his wonderful book on the First World War the Great War quotes private Norman cliff a
British soldier in the first granular guards describing you know what was
happening and it happened to thousands of soldiers.
04:07:35
Quote The approach to the ridge was a desolate swamp over which brooded an
evil menacing atmosphere that seemed to defy encroachment far more treacherous
than the visible surface defenses with which we were familiar such as barbed wire deep
devouring mud spread deadly traps in all directions. We splashed and
slithered and dragged our feet from the pull of an invisible enemy determined to suck us into its
depths. Every few steps someone would slide and stumble and weighed down by
rifle and equipment rapidly sinking to the squelching mess. Those nearest
grabbed his arms struggled against being themselves engulfed and if humanly possible dragged
him out. When helpers floundered in as well and doubled the task it became
hopeless. All the straining efforts failed and the swamp swallowed its screaming victims
and we had to be ordered to plod on dejectedly and fight this relentless enemy as
stubbornly as we did those we could see. It happened that one of those leading us was Lieutenant Chamberlain
and so distraught did he become at the spectacle of men drowning in mud. And the desperate attempts
to rescue them that suddenly he began hysterically belabouring the shoulders of a sinking
man with his swagger stick. We were horror struck to see this most compassionate
officer. So on strong as to resort to brutality and our loud protest
forced him to desist. The man was rescued but some could not be and they sank
shrieking with fear and agony to be ordered to go ahead and leave a comrade to
such a fate was the hardest experience one could be asked to endure. But the objective
had to be reached and we plunged on bitter anger against the evil forces
prevailing piled onto our exasperate sion.
04:09:16
This was as near to hell as I ever want to be and quote
in Brian Cooper's the ironclads of Combray.
04:09:24
He quotes a soldier at heat for saying quote One of our men was unfortunate enough to
step out of line and fell into one of these mud holes. We managed to loop a rope
securely under his armpits but it was useless. The poor fellow now knew he was beyond
all aid and begged me to shoot him rather than leave him to die a miserable death by
suffocation. I am not afraid to say therefore that I shot this man at his own
urgent request and quote.
04:09:53
In the accounts it's clear that this particular mode of dying affected the soldiers
you know worse than most of the other ones this is the the true extra horror passion tale of
thirty press.
04:10:07
WRITER Adam Hochschild in his book To End All Wars quotes a British
major third who says quote A party of a company
men passing up to the front line found a man bogged two above the knees
bogged with mud he means he says quote the united efforts of four of them
with rifles beneath his armpits made not the slightest impression and to dig
even if shovels had been available would be impossible for there was no foothold.
04:10:35
Duty compelled them to move on up to the line and when two days later they passed down that
way. The wretched fellow was still there but only his head was now visible and he was
raving mad.
04:10:46
End quote.
04:10:49
And just like most of the other bad world war one battles you know the people
stuck out in no man's land that you couldn't go get drove the
men in the trenches their comrades just almost insane with
powerlessness. Historian John Keegan quotes British soldier
Edwin Vaughn who was at the third APRA and who describes how
the rain takes a known horrific situation the people stuck in no man's land
and the suffering that they went through and the suffering that they then transmitted to their powerless
comrades in the trenches and made it worse by just adding water
.
04:11:28
Soldier Vaughn talks about being in a shell hole and then says quote
From other shell holes from the darkness on all sides came the groans and
wails of wounded men faint long sobbing moans of agony and
despairing shrieks. It was too horribly obvious that dozens of men with serious
wounds must've crawled for safety into a new shell holes and now the water was
rising about them and powerless to move. They were slowly drowning. Horrible
visions came to me with those cries of men lying maimed out there trusting that their
pals would find them and now dying terribly alone amongst the dead in the inky
darkness and we could do nothing to help them. Dunham was crying quietly beside
me and all the men were affected by the pity his cries.
04:12:15
End quote.
04:12:17
Good tenant Edwin van and his man are relieved a couple hours later and as they were
walking back down the line he notices quote the cries of the wounded
had been much diminished now.
04:12:29
And as we staggered down the road the reason was only too apparent for the water was right
over the tops of the shell holes and quote.
04:12:38
Now if you want to look at this battle which went on for months in military terms and you
want to look at it positively as some modern historians do. You could say
that it killed between two hundred twenty and three hundred fifty thousand more Germans. Nothing
wrong with that in a war of attrition right. Of course if you're the British political
command you know you'll note that he killed about the same number of British soldiers.
It gained a few miles in some places the Canadians heroically captured the
town of Passchendaele against all odds and through much you know suffering and perseverance
. But again it's not quite apparent how this really
pushed the end of the war any closer. It definitely
pushed a lot of soldiers though closer to a transformation
that they would eventually if they lived to make it home transfer to their
entire society. BRITISH SOLDIER Ronald Scarth was for ever transformed by his
experiences in Flanders in one thousand seven hundred as were so many others. It
crushed the underpinnings of so much of his world view.
04:13:47
He writes about the battle quote I said the men's morale was breaking. I
suppose I should have included myself I had long since lost any desire to continue as a
fighting soldier idealists and cowards aren't of much use on a battlefield and I was a
bit of both. At nineteen I found my standards of conduct obsolete.
My ideals shattered. I had lost all faith in institutional religion my
church and authorized me to break the sixth commandment in the name of patriotism.
04:14:16
End quote. He continues quote.
04:14:20
Eventually I worked it all out at least for myself. God was all right.
It was we who were wrong. Why the hell should he care what happened to us lot.
We had brought this war evil into existence not God. The reason evil and
ugliness were triumphing over goodness and beauty why pity and compassion were considered
weaknesses and ruthlessness and cruelty regarded as noble. The reason for all this
was the wickedness in ourselves and not the indifference of God That's why the more
murders you committed the bigger the hero you became. That's what made your superior
officer slap you on the back and say splendid old chap jolly good shooting when your
shells are destroyed in minutes. The beauty which Craftsman had toiled lifetimes to
create Disillusion is very very bitter when you're young thoughtful
imaginative and sensitive and quote.
04:15:12
In the postscript to his memoirs writing in the third person Scarth
says quote before nineteen seventeen ended this on
belligerent sensitive youth had escaped death by inches a dozen
times had seen his comrades die in dreadful agony.
04:15:30
I had seen and heard men who should have been dead men broken
torn limbless disempowered screaming for anyone with a loaded
rifle to end their own bearable sufferings and watched his friends and others
slowly choke and froth as poison gas suffocated them. I could not believe it
possible until his own eyes told him it was that half a man could live for
what seemed to him hours and by the time he was rendered unconscious himself had come
to realize that every friend he'd made every man he'd worked with had become cannon
fodder for years afterwards. Memories of these horrors haunted his dreams
and disturbed his sleep yet awake he could never bring himself to talk of them and when he
thought of those wounded men and the comrades he been with when they were killed he always came
to the same conclusion.
04:16:20
It must never happen again never.
04:16:23
End quote.
04:16:25
There were hundreds of thousands of survivors like
this young man and they went home and greatly
influence their home societies. I mean there are literary historians
that will point to the influence these people had in the writings of the one nine hundred twenty S. and one
nine hundred thirty S. everywhere.
04:16:49
War artist Paul Nash was another one permanently affected by passion Dale
. He'd been to other areas and fought the war quite nice and then went to passion Dale
and had his entire world turned upside down. This is as related by
David Reynolds in his fine history the long shadow.
04:17:07
He starts off by saying that Nash enjoyed all these other areas of the war and then writes
quote.
04:17:13
But when Nash returned in November to the rain and mud of passion Dale he was
transfixed by quote the most frightful nightmare of a country more conceived
by Dante or polo than by nature with no glimmer of God's hand to
be seen anywhere. Sunrise and sunset are blasphemies Reynolds says he
exclaimed quote They are mockeries to man.
04:17:36
End quote.
04:17:39
Reynolds writes that the scene he says was gilded with the colors of hell yellow
stinking mud shell holes filled with green white water black
dying trees and unceasing shells that churned up the land into a
graveyard. Quote quoting national I am no longer an
artist interested in curious. I am a messenger who will bring back word from the men
who are fighting to those who want the war to go on forever. Feeble
inarticulate will be my message but it will have a bitter truth and may it burn their
lousy souls.
04:18:12
End quote British war correspondent Philip Gibbs was there and I
think he was all over that battlefield and he had a true
admiration for not just the English troops but all the Dominion troops too and what
they accomplished there sort of a doomed heroism. And Gibbs was just blown
away by what human beings and these gallant soldiers were able to achieve and
nothing upset him more than to hear later that Sir DOUGLAS HAIG the British commander
had proclaimed reports of the battlefield it passion Dale as being
exaggerated. This is how a very angry Gibbs
responded quote.
04:18:53
Sir DOUGLAS HAIG thinks that some of the descriptions of that six months horror were quote end
quote exaggerated. As a man who knows something of the value of words and who saw
many of those battle scenes in Flanders and went out from the brain many times during those months
and then he names all the places that he'd been and ends up by saying and beyond to
Polygon wood and passion Dale where his dead lay meaning the dead that
Hague was responsible for where his dead lay in the swamps and around the pill
boxes and were tanks that it wallowed into the mire were shot into scrap iron by German
gun fire and where our own guns were being flung up by the harassing fire of heavy
shells. I say now that nothing that has been written is more than a pale image of the
abomination of those battlefields and that no pen or brush has yet achieved the picture of that
Armageddon in which so many of our men perished. End quote.
04:19:47
Many people began to doubt British military leadership just because they would
think you should ever fight in conditions that were that bad. There's a story and some people doubt it
ever happened it used to be something that was mentioned by almost everyone writing about passion Dale
in his book in Flanders Fields Leon Wolfe tells the story his way and says quote
the following day.
04:20:08
Lieutenant General Sir Lancelot Cagle paid his first visit to the fighting zone as a
staff car lurched through the swamp land and near the battleground he became more and more
agitated. Finally he burst into tears and muttered Good God did we really
send men to fight in that the man beside him who had been through the campaign
replied tonelessly.
04:20:29
It's worse further on up and quote some say would be
ridiculous to think that these military folks had not been out to the field and seen the conditions or
known what they were like. I'm not going to take a position on that. All I will suggest is
that there are a lot of people who look at the conditions of passion Dale and
wondered you know what was going on in the heads of Britain's military
leaders.
04:20:55
Passion Dale is one of the most often cited nightmares of this war
to Britons along with the song just like the song it did terrible
damage to Britain's army. British military
historian John Keegan who's definitely in the anti Hague camp wrote quote
on the Somme he had sent the flower of British youth to death or mutilation.
04:21:19
That passion Dale he had tipped the survivors into the slew of despond and
quote for those in Britain's political class that wished the
generals would pay more attention to casualties they would get their wish but not for an
entire generation. The junior officers at places like passion Dale
would be permanently affected by that battle.
04:21:42
British military writer Brigadier Peter Young wrote quote The memory of this
battle affected British leadership in the second world war causing many commanders to go
to extremes to try to avoid casualties.
04:21:55
End quote.
04:21:56
This attitude will come a generation too late for
leaders like Lloyd George.
04:22:04
He and his allies have tried to call off the passion Dale campaign after the first sort of
impetus was spent only to fail once again up against the military leadership
and was heard to say blood and mud blood and mud they can think of nothing
better.
04:22:23
But it should be said even though the British are suffering these kind of
casualties so are the Germans and their soldiers are
being tragically affected by this
fighting. As the British soldiers the German
general Hermann Von cool wrote in his report about the troops fighting in
Flanders quote the sufferings privation and exertions which the
soldiers had to bear were indescribable.
04:22:55
Terrible was the spiritual burden on the lonely man in a shell hole or
trench and terrible the strain on the nerves during the British bombardment which
continued day and night. The hell of ver done in the Somme was exceeded by
Flanders. The battle to hold Flanders has been the greatest martyrdom of the war
and looking back it seems that what was born here was superhuman but
perhaps it may still prove to be too great a courageous sacrifice
end quote.
04:23:26
Well what General cool didn't know in December in one thousand nine hundred seventeen
was that something was taking root that would
end up leading to the German military commanders getting their
hands on between five hundred thousand and a million
fresh veteran rested soldiers
. Fate is about to put the dice the iron dice
back into the hands of Germany's leadership. It's well
known they are already inveterate gamblers and the chance
to try to throw a knockout punch in a war
where both sides look like badly beat up and permanently damaged fighters
will be irresistible. Seems like no matter what Lloyd
George does there's more blood and mud in the world's future
.
04:24:26
In one thousand eighteen.
04:24:33
I love when I can recommend books on Audible that we used in the production of this program today
. Audible of course the Internet's largest provider of spoken audio entertainment
and more than one hundred fifty thousand titles to choose from every genre you can think of and it's not
just audio books of course magazines and periodicals stand up
comedy routines old time radio shows. I'm always quite astounded when I go on there to find
recommendations. How much stuff they have that I wouldn't think they had for example
a couple of wonderful memoirs from the first world war. I'm not sure if we
recommended one of these before I know we haven't recommended the other but I think you'd like
both of them. One is a classic and we use it throughout this entire
series. It's storm of steel. The account by a German soldier
Ernst a younger and younger is kind of a famous person I mean he became an individual after
the war that was much talked about his book was very famous and youngers one of these strange
individuals that went through the war survived all these horrifying experiences and
actually came out of it thinking of it as a somehow positive experience he
kind of enjoyed some of that he saw the upside I guess you could say made him a
kind of a rare soldier and he's good to have for balance. When you read this other
book or listen to this other book I'm suggesting the reluctant Tommy the memoirs of
Ronald's girth and he's the opposite of younger he's someone that. It
reflects those individuals that were so changed by the war and then went
home completely transformed he became a pacifist and was forever changed by that conflict
but when you listen to his experiences in the way he recounts them you can understand why
it's a honest introspective and you know
in its own way completely scarring sort of testimony to what
you know average people can find themselves experiencing both younger and
skirt that are fascinating for very different reasons and if you go to audible podcast
dot com forward slash hardcore history you can get your free audio book download
.
04:26:45
Be sure to follow us on Twitter the address is at hardcore history.
04:26:49
Get more hardcore history at Den Carlon dot com If you think the show you just heard is
worth a dollar.
04:26:55
Dan and Bennett would love to have it back and show it's all we ask. Go to
Dan Carlin dot com for information on how to donate to the show.
04:27:04
I'd like to apologize for a couple of things right off the bat the first thing is for
silly little persnickety mistakes.
04:27:13
Well you can probably tell especially if you wait for these programs to be released as we make them. But I'm a
bit of a nut when it comes to detail and yet the people around me keep
telling me that there's a certain failure rate that should be expected I'm not really good at accepting that
especially when I catch the errors before the show gets out. None the less this one
will go out with me saying the word trenches to describe
the kinds of fortifications that the British are in at Passchendaele and of course
shell holes would be a much closer term I think trenches to those British soldiers would have
been a luxury on that battlefield none the less those of the pedal the little
things that slipped through our strainer even when we catch them so that these shows
come out more than once a year which we are just barely beating that I think right now
heading toward once a year if this pace keeps up. So I apologize for the piddly little errors in the
past the ones in this show any in the future. We try hard but
we're not perfect. The other thing I'd like to apologize for is for
perhaps ignoring your favorite part of the story whatever that might be a
favorite region a favorite army of favorite people a favorite event.
Picking a topic like this is humbling. And you know it once
again shows you some of the potential downsides with our leap before we look. Topic
picking policy here on the program. Nonetheless I will forgive in advance from
now on I promise I learn my lesson.
04:28:43
Every historian and author who talks too much about the western front at
the expense of other areas of the First World War because you start to realize why that becomes important
. This is a very confusing story. There's a lot going on. It would be so
easy to go off in the weeds and lose everybody. I half the time worry about losing myself in
the story. You wind up sticking to the Western Front and Russia and the United States as a sort of an anchor
to keep the story you know clinging to some sort of
structure.
04:29:13
In some ways I think it's probably the weak hosts answer to the problem. On the other
hand every time you introduce another theatre and another people and another
in a region and more names and individuals you make the story more and more
confusing. The first world war is a giant topic. What you're
getting here and I say this about all of our productions done and you're getting the Dan Carlin
version of the First World War And unfortunately that's leaving a lot of things
out. But I tell you what as a friend of mine once said perhaps we
should look at it as just leaving a lot more potential future or hardcore
history topics available for us to handle down the road
in the next show. We're going to make up some of the deficit for the things we haven't talked about and
make up for some lost time in the Middle East. There are many things going on that
create you know the beginnings of the modern world in that region including
important foundational events that lay the groundwork for the
modern recreation of the ancient state of Israel in that region.
In Russia we get to see what an intellectual
contagion that might be a good way to describe it. Drop down into the middle
of the very fertile Petri dish that is provisional government Russia
can do to a country like that. And the answer to the question will perhaps arise as to whether or
not an army can actually function if the soldiers get to vote on
whether they want to follow orders or not. And finally we'll get
to see the arrival of U.S. troops in large numbers
on the European continent for the first time ever. If I'm lucky and get what I want we
will get to delve a little bit into air power and how it's three dimensional
lising battlefields and now that technological race is a little
like you know Steve Jobs and Bill Gates and those guys were involved in technology
back in one thousand nine hundred eighty nine hundred seventeen they might very well be in airplane
development geeks.
04:31:22
These pilots and these planes are you know have technological geek
and half medieval knight will talk a bit about that if I get lucky and I can make the
time.
04:31:34
And finally we'll talk certainly about the difference
when both sides are exhausted on the western front that half a
million to a million fresh troops can make and I'm not talking about American troops.
I'm talking about the German soldiers that arrive from the eastern front to the
Western Front can make on tired French and British armies
before the Americans arrive in enough numbers to make a
difference.
04:32:05
The last year of the war is full of surprises.
All that and more on Part six. A blueprint for
Armageddon.

What's the most dangerous weapon in the world. I've had this discussion many times
with many people and I've seen it go all over the place but generally you
focus on nuclear weapons because that's an obvious thing to put you know in the number one
spot for most dangerous weapon in the world.
00:02:21
But there are some that are a little bit more insidious and potentially worse.
00:02:25
Take for example biological weapons. Think about some of the worst
plagues that have ever infested mankind.
00:02:33
Now imagine human ingenuity in a laboratory used to make such
plagues worse.
00:02:39
And now imagine releasing those upon your enemy.
00:02:43
The reason they're so extra dangerous is because of the way they spread and the
fact that once you open the Pandora's Box of biological warfare you generally
lose the ability to shut the box again. You may exchange a few nuclear weapons with an
opponent and decide to stop once you open up that box and unleash
super smallpox or what have you.
00:03:06
You can't turn that off again.
00:03:09
Another reason it's very dangerous is that super smallpox doesn't differentiate between the
people you targeted and everyone else that it may spread to.
00:03:17
It's a bit of a doomsday device when you think about how something like that could backfire on the very people
who decide to use it.
00:03:24
It's a little like deciding to get rid of your next door neighbor in your apartment
complex by burning down his place.
00:03:32
The potential for the fire to hurt you is very real.
00:03:36
But sometimes if you've run out of options gambling like that might make sense
in the late one nine hundred seventeen where we are in this story even though we've been using
sliding time scale that's about where we are. In late one nine hundred seventeen The Germans are desperate enough to
try all sorts of things including the equivalent of biological
warfare.
00:03:57
But instead of using some sort of contagious disease they're using
contagious ideas. But you might be able to make a case that in this
situation an actual disease would have been preferable.
00:04:13
Whenever I think about this idea I think about Napoleon the famous French emperor from the late seventeen
hundreds or early eighteen hundreds who was such a force in Europe.
00:04:22
Napoleon was someone who spread an intellectual contagion. And I
remember professors in college suggesting that this was the thing that scared the kings
and czars and emperors of Europe the most about Napoleon because
Napoleon arose in the wake of the French Revolution the era where French men were
infused with these ideas of revolution of equality
of Republicanism. All these things that seem in a relatively
moderate to people today even beneficial.
00:04:53
But those were the scariest things on earth to people who were kings and emperors and czars
and many of them figured that they would eventually be able to throw the French out of these
territories and get their thrones back. But they were less sure about their ability to
cleanse their population of these dangerous radical ideas that French
occupying troops had spread to them.
00:05:15
In fact many historians believe that the famous revolutionary period in the
middle eighteen hundreds was the blossoming of seeds that were planted
by Napoleon's troops as they occupied all these countries talk
to the locals and spread the equivalent of an intellectual contagion.
Of course if you're one of those types who would view the ideas of the American Revolution or the French
Revolution or the ideas of the thinkers who helped prompt those revolutions as a negative thing
then perhaps you would view the eighteen hundreds as an example not of a seed flowering into some wonderful
plant but as a virus beginning to morph and mutate and
evolve into new and maybe more dangerous forms. The eighteen hundreds
is up until that time period almost certainly the greatest period for
intellectual examination and forms of government that's ever existed and part of it is
because of the increase in communication and how people all over Europe can begin to have conferences
and discussions and write for magazines and newspapers that each other reads and have
all sorts of attempts at trying to apply
rationality and logic to the idea of government
because most of the governments in a place like Europe at this time period are things that have
existed in one form or another for centuries.
00:06:40
So you know some one in the distant past was a great military leader who
establishes a dynasty who rules for hundreds of years and no one ever really asks
whether or not that's the right thing to do or whether or not it's smart or anything else.
00:06:54
In the eighteen hundreds people began to think along with him the changes in science
and all kinds of different things that maybe people could come up with smarter
approaches. But there was wide disagreement though on what that smart approach might
be.
00:07:08
And some of the great figures of the eighteen hundreds who played roles in this would become extremely
important figures in the one thousand nine hundred six.
00:07:17
In fact someone who was involved in trying to come up with a system that seemed to be an
improvement over what Europe was living with in the eighteen hundreds explodes in
importance in one thousand seventeen. Exactly where we are in this first world war
story.
00:07:33
He was renowned in his own day within his own circles but he certainly wasn't a
household name. He becomes a historical superstar in one thousand nine hundred seventeen
and there's a little bit of irony to that because in one thousand nine hundred seventeen this figure has been dead
thirty four thirty five years. One of the best or one of the
worst aspects of an idea depending on whether you consider it good or
dangerous is the fact that it doesn't die with the originator
.
00:08:02
In one thousand nine hundred seventeen all of a sudden everybody starts hearing the name Karl Marx.
00:08:09
Mark is often credited with being the originator of
modern communism or Marxism.
00:08:16
But I think that's probably giving him a little too much credit after all. Very few
people come up with ideas out of nowhere and Marx like most people
stood on the shoulders of giants with his ideas. He was reading guys like the German
philosopher Hegel and a lot of other people.
00:08:34
But if a guy like Hegel's an example of the intellectual contagion then
Marx is an example of someone who mutated it
further.
00:08:45
And of course perhaps the ironic tragedy of Marx is that Marx didn't get to
be the implementor of his ideas his ideas were
adapted and morphed into different forms
. Like many figures from history if you could go back and show Karl
Marx how he's treated in the history books and the things he's associated with
I think he might jump off a bridge.
00:09:11
There's a lot of figures like that who are remembered for things that are almost one
hundred eighty degrees different than what they devoted their lives to working for
Marx thought he was doing good.
00:09:23
And yet today we think about his role in the deaths of tens of millions of
people and the creation of some of the worst slave states in all of human
history. If you read Marx and find out what he was
all about. That's exactly what he was hoping to prevent and stop
and eliminate it could bring Karl Marx back from the dead
and have him analyze where things went wrong. I wouldn't be surprised at all if he
blamed a botched implementation for the way things
turned out. We might argue that marches ideas from the get go were poor but I think he would
probably say that you never got a chance to see what he wanted because he wasn't the guy that
built the house he was the architect maybe or maybe the last guy to design blueprints. The
guy who actually built the dwelling was a guy named lad Amir Lenin
and I'm reminded of a quote by the writer allergists Huxley about how
ideas and influencing people and it's not so much a question
always of how many people but who they are. Huxley wrote
quote It is possible to argue that the really influential book
is not that which converts ten millions of casual readers but rather that which
converts the very few who at any given moment succeed in seizing power
. Marx and Sorell have been influential in the modern world not so much because they were
bestsellers but because among their few readers were two men called
respectively Lenin and Mussolini. End quote.
00:11:01
Vladimir Lenin is the hinge point between theory and
application.
00:11:07
When it comes to modern day communism he's the implementer If Marx is the originator
and Lenin is the implementor and he's a figure that combines
some rather unusual qualities in one human being oftentimes
the intellectual in the deep thinker and the philosopher is a different sort of human being
then the person of action like you've heard of the man of action. And oftentimes there are two different
kinds of people Lennon is one of these strange individuals that possesses the qualities of both an
intellectual and a person of action and his dynamic
abilities were recognized even by the people who were his
opponents. I mean take for example the description of Lloyd George the man
who is the prime minister of Britain during really the second half of the first world war. George
will write his memoirs in the one nine hundred thirty S. and he will say this a lot of near Lennon
quote He was a communist but we'll see. Fanaticism does not always in Tao its
possessor with great administrative ability it is not incompatible with a genius
for government and no one can doubt that Lenin was one of the greatest leaders of men ever thrown up in
any epic end quote. He then goes on to
compare him to what he calls a plague bacillus.
00:12:27
Lennon was certainly a fanatic. Most revolutionaries are people who tend to
not see too many shades of grey. Things tend to be black and white.
00:12:36
Winston Churchill famously defined a fanatic as someone who can't change their mind
and won't change the subject. And Churchill had his own opinion of Lenin and once again
it evoked this idea of an intellectual contagion He also compared Lenin to some
sort of bacteria and he blamed the Germans for
unleashing it on Europe playing an active role
in implementing a form of germ warfare
that would have horrible effects down the road. Churchill wrote quote
Lenin was sent into Russia by the Germans in the same way that you might send a file
containing a culture of typhoid or cholera to be poured in the water supply of a
great city and it worked with amazing accuracy.
00:13:23
End quote.
00:13:25
That brings us to the third person who was very important in implementing
this intellectual contagion warfare kind of approach.
00:13:35
The facilitator If Marx is the originator and Lenin is the implementor Lenin
needed some help to get to the point where he could in
fact if you will anyone in the beginning of one thousand
nine hundred seventeen Vladimir Lenin is in exile. He's living in
Switzerland next to a sausage factory on the second floor of a
rented flat with his wife trying to make a living in
what you might call the professional revolutionary business
. He'd like to get back to Russia in one thousand seven thousand because it's apparent that huge
things are happening in Russia the Tsar's been overthrown a provisional government is taken over.
00:14:17
But Lenin can't get from where he is to Russia.
00:14:21
There's a war going on and there's a lot of territory in between Switzerland and Russia to deal
with. And then he gets some help from the
facilitator. The leader of Germany's military and
for the most part by this time civilian government Eric Luden Dorf.
00:14:43
Luden Dorf and the Germans have long been associated with Lennon's rise to
power. The exact amount of responsibility that Germany
has in that story is debatable and has been debated since one thousand seventeen
.
00:14:58
One of the reasons historians have a hard time nailing down definitive answers
is because it's one of those things that falls into the category of what we would call
today covert operations or black ops
top secret stuff. Both sides in the war were trying to undermine the
cohesiveness and the stability of their opponents and a potentially
wonderful way to do that was to give money or arms or sometimes military
advisors to revolutionaries and insurrectionists
and breakaway groups and ethnic separatists and people who lived in
countries that were colonies of some of the great powers but who wanted their independence and both sides as I said we're
doing this. There's a lot of allegations about German involvement for
example in the famous Easter Rising in one thousand nine hundred sixteen in Ireland how
much German support that's questionable too and part of the reason why is nobody was
exactly advertising where these top secret affairs.
Most of the stories traced German involvement at least as far back as one nine hundred
fifteen.
00:16:09
Most of those stories suggest that it was contacts with leftist individuals who pointed
out to the German government that there were shared goals on the part
of Germany and some of these Russian revolutionary figures
. Take for example Lenin and his particular
offshoot of the communists. You know mainstream known as the Bolsheviks. One of the
things Lenin was calling for was peace. That's exactly what
the Germans wanted from the Russians by nine hundred seventeen. They wanted the Russians
out of the war.
00:16:44
The Russians were tying down millions of German troops on the eastern front that
the Germans would love to be able to switch over to the western front to fight the exhausted
French and British before the Americans arrived in any sort of decisive numbers.
00:16:59
Now the big gamble here of course is that the Bolsheviks while they may share
a common goal in getting Russia to leave the war are not
Germany's friends Luden Dorf deciding to use them as a tool
is a kinda adding another box or into the World War One boxing
match. We've used that analogy throughout this series the idea of two boxers fighting each other
. Part of Luton dorks gamble here is he's talking about introducing a
third box or into the ring one that wants to fight both the other two boxers
but Luden Dorf has a pretty good idea that he'll go after the one Luden door when the
Germans are fighting first.
00:17:41
The Bolsheviks in Lenin are preaching the equivalent of a global civil war
if the American President Woodrow Wilson is calling the First World War The War To End
All Wars. Lenin has his own idea of The War To End All Wars as Irish
historian William Mulligan points out Lennon's idea of The War To End All
Wars is revolutionary war.
00:18:06
The Bolsheviks are calling for the poor and the working classes of all nations to
rise up and overthrow their rulers.
00:18:13
Germany is only a little less vulnerable to that sort of message than Russia is
. This is why Luden Dorf is playing with fire or in this case
plague he stands a really good chance of getting burned by this
very same weapon that he in one nine hundred seventeen decides to help
use against Russia. The actual means to get
Lenin from Switzerland back to Russia is provided by the
Germans in April nine hundred seventeen so we're going backwards a little bit in the story
. The Germans provide a single
sealed train car for Lenin and his cohorts.
Historians have disagreed over who had demanded that it be sealed.
Some say the Germans wanted to strain car sealed so that when Lenin and his cohorts are going to Germany they
don't intellectually infect the Germans on the way through.
00:19:07
Others say it was Lenin and the Bolsheviks who demanded it.
00:19:10
The last thing they wanted was to have people in Russia find out that they were accepting
help from the country Russia was fighting. Oh yeah and the people who happened to be
capitalists too.
00:19:22
Now unless whomever it was who made the decision.
00:19:25
As the train car goes through Germany there's a famous incident where Lennon or one of his cohorts looks out the
window and happens to notice that there are no mature men
anywhere to be seen.
00:19:37
It's children and women and old people.
00:19:40
Germany's mature male population is either dead or wounded or at
the fronts. Lenin and his party then will have to board a
ferry and go by boat for a little bit.
00:19:53
Then they'll get back on another train the train will then arrive in
Petrograd formerly St Petersburg the Russian capital just before midnight on April
sixteenth one thousand seventeen there will be a crowd waiting to welcome him
because like many other dangerous radicals Lenin is coming
home from exile bizarre for decades have been exile in all these
very formidable intellectual contagions and those are the ones he wasn't
executing by the way Lennon's brother had been executed by the Czar.
00:20:25
Now all these people were coming back to Russia at roughly the same time
creating a seditious soup politically speaking in Russia during this time
period.
00:20:35
And believe me Russia was ready for it. There in this park area
situation after the Czar falls where you have sort of a moderate
government known as the provisional government sharing power
with these groups of soldiers and peasants and workers who have gotten
together and elected leaders and who are sort of trying to lead from the bottom and they're
sharing power in a not very comfortable sort of an arrangement with the provisional government
.
00:21:04
It is absolutely a set up for problems.
00:21:07
And yet you kind of you know have to feel a little bit for them.
00:21:10
I mean think about what these people are trying to do.
00:21:13
They are trying to run a country after toppling the
regime that had been in power for centuries.
00:21:21
This is a tough thing to do in the best of times but this isn't the best of
times. This is the equivalent of a bus a passenger trying to get a hold of the wheel when the bus is
already careening off a cliff and then you get a guy like Lennon arriving and he gets off the
platform at a little before midnight and tells this enthusiastic crowd of
supporters quote The parenthetical imperialist war is the
beginning of a civil war throughout Europe the worldwide socialist
revolution has already dawned. Germany is seizing any day now the whole of
European capitalism may crash. Sailors comrades we have to fight
for a socialist revolution to fight until the proletariat wins folded to reign.
Long live the worldwide socialist revolution.
00:22:07
End quote.
00:22:09
Even Lennon's friends thought this way too
optimistic.
00:22:15
In fact at that very moment the current Russian government power
sharing arrangement was trying to put together an offensive against the
Germans scheduled for July first with an
army that was sketchy at best at this point.
00:22:34
If you are Russia's provisional government you are between a rock and a hard place in one thousand nine hundred seventeen
you are barely holding on to power.
00:22:42
You have strikes. You have unrest you have all kinds of problems and now you have the men in here
taking the already kind of extreme Bolsheviks and pushing them into greater
extremism.
00:22:53
He's calling for three main things that are impossible for the provisional government to really
contend with. He is calling for peace bread and land
a triple threat of a message that would be effective across much of Europe in one thousand nine hundred
seventeen. At the provisional government owes
it has to prove to the British and the French that it's still a viable partner in this war they're
funneling tons of subsidies to this government.
00:23:22
In fact they need to convince the Germans and the Central Powers of the same fact
that you can't just assume we're done in the best way to do that is to launch an attack
.
00:23:32
The problem is that this army might have been willing to stay and
defend Mother Russia soil but most of them are not willing to
go on the offensive and run into the machine guns and the artillery barrages of the Germans
. They may not give a hoot about Bolshevism or
communism or any of that but they understand peace bread and land.
00:23:57
On July first the Korean ski offensive as it's sometimes called the
July offensive led by the great Russian general pursue a lot of launches an
attack on a wide front against the Germans and the Austrian Carians
.
00:24:11
It becomes a disaster this is the way historian Peter Hart describes it
quote After a two day bombardment the second Bruce a lot of offensive attack began
with a flourish with the attack of the Russian seventh and eleventh armies on the southwest front
when the infantry went over the top on first July. Early results were promising but
then everything started to go wrong.
00:24:33
The best and most loyal units had been chosen as the assault troops while the follow up and reserve
formations were far less committed.
00:24:41
Indeed when it came to moving forwards many regiments simply refused the
attack petered out in ignominy and further planned attacks were either cancelled or
abandoned. Then a vigorous Austrian Garion counter offensive was launched at
Tarnopol Inglish on one thousandth July the Russians broke and retreated in
chaos.
00:25:00
This disaster triggered the replacement of Bruce a lot as commander in chief by General
Kornilov on the first of August the Russian army was falling apart.
00:25:09
And such attacks as had been carried out only serve to call the few remaining loyalist
units still willing to actively prosecute the war. The vast majority of Russian
soldiers were now content to be passive observers at best. Indeed by the
autumn it was estimated that some two million had deserted and caught
for a while the German high command in the Austrian Garion high command encouraged their
troops to fraternize with Russian troops to sort of undermine their willingness to
fight.
00:25:39
They stopped doing that when they found out that the Russian troops were spreading socialist
and Bolshevik propaganda back to the German and Austrian Garion troops
.
00:25:49
None the less what that disaster at the Korean ski offensive did
was essentially prove that Russia's army was done.
And open the door even more to the Bolshevik message
calling for peace.
00:26:07
Writer Gigi Meyer describes a letter
from Rudolph Hess who in the next world war will be one of
Hitler's henchmen writing back to his parents about what the Russians are
doing opposite the German lines. They're basically fighting amongst
themselves.
00:26:27
He writes quote yesterday we saw heavy fighting but only among the
Russians themselves. A Russian officer came over and gave himself up. He spoke
perfect German.
00:26:38
He was born in Boston but is a Russian citizen. He told us the whole battles are going
on behind their lines. Their officers are shooting each other and the soldiers are doing the
same.
00:26:49
He found it all too ridiculous.
00:26:51
They can all get lost as far as he's concerned.
00:26:53
We invited him to eat with us and he thanked us. He ate well and drank plenty of tea before
going off.
00:26:59
There was a lot of noise coming from the Russian side yesterday. They were fighting each other in the
trenches.
00:27:04
We also heard shots coming from their infantry but they were firing at each other.
Charming and quick. Lennon said
that the Russian soldiers were voting for peace with their feet
.
00:27:20
The failure of the July offensive was another nail in the coffin for the provisional government
and added to the support of Lenin and the Bolsheviks who were able to portray
themselves as the real alternative to the provisional government the one party that didn't
have any responsibility in what was going on.
00:27:37
And the more Russians didn't like what was going on the more the only choice to change that seemed to be the
Bolsheviks and over the months between the February Revolution the toppled bazaar
and just about November the Bolsheviks increased their support in
these councils of peasants and soldiers and workers known as the Soviets and
on November seventh one thousand nine hundred seventeen they moved.
00:28:01
In a triumph of superior organization they were able to take
over the most important government buildings in the Russian capital in a coup
that most Russians awoke to find a fait accompli already finished
. And the most radical government in power in a
major state since the French Revolution all of a sudden
Lenin and the Bolsheviks were in charge of Russia
and Marx and the other nineteenth century thinkers
were about to have their ideas updated evolve morphed and
changed put into practice in what was about to become a giant
human experiment. But to most of old Europe this
looked like a human experiment conducted by a mad scientist to them
it looked like the second coming of the French Revolution and Lenin and the Bolsheviks might
as well have been Jacobins.
00:29:03
How long before the guillotines are brought out and everyone starts getting their heads chopped off.
Within twenty four or so hours of taking power Lennon starts to make good
on some of his promises. Understand though Lennon's promises had a tactical purpose
in mind. They would end up in his mind helping to spread the
revolution to other countries. The fire caused by a
German general Luden Dorce attempt to burn down his neighbor's apartment
were beginning to fan the flames to a degree where many other countries were likely
to get burned. Lennon's decree on land said among other
things quote private ownership of land shall be abolished forever
all land shall become the property of the whole people and pass into the use of
those who cultivate it and caught then Lenin started
spreading the sort of propaganda that most horrified the powers who had
been fighting the First World War for more than three years by this point he said quote We shall
offer peace for the peoples of all the belligerent countries upon the basis of the
Soviet terms no annexations no indemnities and the right of
self-determination of peoples. At the same time according to our promise we
shall publish and repudiate the secret treaties and quote the
secret treaties or the treaties amongst the Allied powers
that were in the files of the Winter Palace of the Bolsheviks had just taken over.
By making what was in those files public. The
Bolsheviks were pulling the Wiki Leaks maneuver or the Edward
Snowden disclosure of their day by the way another
similarity to the release of The Secret Treaties and the Wiki Leaks Edward
Snowden revelations of the more modern era are
the newspaper in Britain that released the information to British readers.
00:31:07
It was the Manchester Guardian that published in Britain the
secret treaty information that Leon Trotsky and the Bolsheviks released to the world
.
00:31:17
That's the same newspaper in Britain that took the lead.
00:31:20
Almost one hundred years later in revealing the Edward Snowden revelations
as historians Michael Nyberg and David Jordan write in their history of the eastern
front in the First World War quote.
00:31:33
The Bolshevik leaders had little interest in working with the capitalist western allies.
00:31:38
They soon publish the text of the secret treaties and diplomatic understanding's that they
found in the Winter Palace and the government archives. These agreements showed French
and British support for Russian territorial gain especially at Turkey's expense with
regard to Constantinople. This seemingly revealed what the Bolsheviks have been arguing all
along namely that the war had been fought for imperial interests not out of
self-defense. The publication of these terms embarrassed allied diplomats who had
claimed in public that no such agreements existed.
00:32:10
This also angered the Americans who had advocated the peace without annexations and
quote the new Bolshevik government began to
tell generals along the entire front with the Germans in our strong Carians and Turks that they should
start making local peace treaties they called for an armistice for thirty
days along the entire front all of a sudden Russia was in the process of
dropping out of the war. Lennon is supposed to have said the
famous quote that aptly describes the situation in November one thousand
seventeenth he said quote there are decades where nothing happens and there are weeks
when decades happen.
00:32:51
End quote.
00:32:52
And look at the change in fortune for him personally six or
seven months ago he's living in a rented flat on the second
floor next to a sausage factory in Switzerland. Now by November one
thousand nine hundred seventeen he's basically the guy in charge of the largest nation
on earth. But this leadership is not uncontested a Russian Civil
War starts almost immediately with the people who oppose Lenin and the Bolsheviks and
it will go on for several years and be terribly bloody and drawn in the great powers as well
. It also will not include fifty million or more
people who are counted as the citizens of old Russia as some of these territories
begin to break away from Russia again one of the really dangerous
things that the new Bolshevik government professes is a belief in self-determination
. Well there are lots of different peoples who didn't want to be a part of the Russian government.
00:33:50
Perhaps the Finns the Poles the Ukrainians and others who were
starting to think maybe they would just leave.
00:33:58
They were far from the only peoples who were members of larger state
entities around the world who thought that they would like a crack at
self-determination. All these European countries that had
colonies were in the same position and there was no message more dangerous than the
idea that the time had come to perhaps allow all these people to decide for
themselves whether they wanted to stay colonies. Already the
plague bacillus begins to spread and threaten not just the
allies in the Entente powers but soon the powers that made it possible
for Lenin to get back and start the fire in Russia to begin with.
This is the point in the story where Russia and
communism veer off into their own tail a very long
complex tale that impacts the rest of the twentieth century you can easily make the
case that perhaps the most important long term effect
of the First World War is the collapse of the Russian czar and eventual
replacement by the Bolsheviks. It will eventually lead to Joseph
Stalin and the horrors of the Gulag and the cold
war. There was a wonderfully prophetic line
around the time of Karl Marx so you can see how long before this time
period that revolutionary thinkers like Bakunin were saying
quote If you took the most ardent revolutionary vested him in absolute
power within a year he would be worse than the Czar himself. End quote
. And for all his high minded rhetoric very quickly
Vladimir Lenin was proving that COHEN Right
.
00:35:49
But in one thousand nine hundred seventeen early one nine hundred eighteen that side of the
Bolsheviks and the communist regime in Russia was still
debatable and unknown.
00:36:00
If you actually read their public pronouncements they look like an almost And you
know in hindsight this sounds terrible but almost a refreshing group of
idealists who refused to play by the old cynical hard bitten you
know rules of the European powers.
00:36:18
And to get an idea of how difficult it is to figure out you know what's going on there and what these
people are like you can look at diaries written during the time period where people
try to make sense of what they're seeing in Russia take for example Evelyn Princess
Bluecher and we talked about her before she's an English wife of a German
nobleman living in Germany she kept a diary that's often referred to to give sort of an
impression of what's going on in Germany and the feelings that they have and she writes about this new
government in Russia. While the peace negotiations to end the war in the east are
going on those negotiations will end up with one of the most one sided treaties in
all history it's called Breast Tosk and the only reason it's so one sided is that the
Bolsheviks were in such danger of getting overthrown before they had consolidated power
that eventually they just agreed to one of the worst deals of all time assuming that the
communist revolution is soon going to come and sweep all these Western European governments and central
European governments away anyway so who cares what they agree to
.
00:37:20
And during the negotiations Leon Trotsky a man we've also quoted earlier a key figure in
the Bolshevik government is negotiating this deal.
00:37:29
And Lucia writes in her diary in January one thousand nine hundred quote.
00:37:34
The breast look tough negotiation seem likely to come to nothing as Trotsky seems to
be playing a double part. And people say he's only toying with the Central Powers to be better
able to sow the seeds of sedition and rebellion amongst the West European
peoples. They say that already the German prisoners have been set free in Russia and that
common soldiers are being placed in command over their former officers.
00:37:57
She continues quote There are many different opinions about Trotsky here.
00:38:01
Some calling him a dreamer and idealist others abusing him as a bloodthirsty
tyrant.
00:38:07
Wills there was a whole class of admirers who declare him to be the greatest man since Christ lived
upon the earth and the prophet of a new religion which is to regenerate
mankind and create a new paradise after the delusion of the war.
00:38:20
Who knows what part this man may be going to play in the future fates of Europe. One hundred
twenty years ago people were saying almost the same things of a certain unknown little officer
who out of the reign of terror and bloodshed developed into the vampire emperor who
almost succeeded in draining the blood of all Europe and quote
She of course is referencing Napoleon who grew out of the French Revolution to people
at the time period that's what the revolution in Russia kind of resembled. And there were
quite a few similarities there pointed out by various historians between the French Revolution and the
Napoleonic era and the era when the Bolsheviks take charge in Russia. Take for
example one of the stipulations that the Bolsheviks were making during the peace
negotiations abreast of the task. They wanted their troops to have the right during the
negotiations to fraternize with the German and Austrian Garion soldiers on the
other side of no man's land. Why did they want that.
00:39:17
Because they felt they just like Napoleon's troops spreading the ideas the
intellectual contagion this edition of the French revolutionary ideas to
the lands of the kings and czars and emperors in you know
eighteenth and early nineteenth century Europe.
00:39:34
The Bolsheviks assumed that their troops would do the same thing to the Germans and the Austrian Carians
in early twentieth century Europe.
00:39:41
Combine that with the impact that the release of the secret treaty agreements was having
and the Russian government the new Russian government the idealistic at least on the surface knew Russian
government was doing.
00:39:53
And mazing damage to the allied war effort by undercutting all the propaganda
and they had to help by the way. The other really idealistic power that was starting to
have an impact on the world scene was across the Atlantic. It was the United States
and to the hard bitten cynical Bismarckian riyal polity
Europe of that day. It would have been hard for them to decide who was more
idealistic. The new Russian Bolshevik government or the
American government of Woodrow Wilson in a sense
though it's hard to blame you know Britain and France and these other
European powers for the fact that they had gone into the war making
agreements with each other and their allies for carving up this territory or
exchanging that territory because that was standard operating procedure when the
war started and had been you know forever of the nineteenth century is full of those kinds of
conflicts. The problem is in just a couple of years things have changed
in so many ways. The first world war is the transitionary period from the
nineteenth to the twentieth century and that includes things like the
proper and moral justifications for war. I'm part of
the problem is that for three years now the allies to name just one
example the Central Powers were doing similar things had made the war aims out to be
these high minded ideals right.
00:41:23
The War To End All Wars or making the world safe for democracy
or fighting you know German militarism I mean there were all these very high minded ideals.
00:41:32
So when you settle people on those ideas when they find out that really what
those soldiers are dying for is much more pedestrian you know sorts of aims
. It's hard to square those two realities
.
00:41:47
In fact there were nations involved in the first world war that essentially had
joined sides with you know the the alliance that promised them the best
outcome Italy Bulgaria Roumania to name just three countries got into
this war for no other reason than you know one side or the other promised them some
territorial gain that was more than the other side promised them.
00:42:09
That was a very common reality from the nineteenth century. Part of
what changed that and made it unacceptable was the price that Europe was
being forced to pay for these territorial acquisitions.
00:42:23
I mean a perfect example is twenty years before this time period where we are now instead of nine hundred
seventeen eight late one thousand seventy Imagineering eight hundred ninety eight and you're the
British army in an area that's going to become part of you know your colonial the
territories that you have direct or indirect control over in the modern nation of Sudan
.
00:42:43
There's a very big battle called German fought in one thousand nine hundred eight Winston Churchill was there is
a very young man his first real exposure to violence I think he killed a couple of people in that battle
on their own dime and had about eight thousand or so British troops and then they had a bunch of allies
of theirs from Egypt and places like that natives is not the right word.
If you think of like tribesmen but but but troops from Egypt
and they were fighting people who were kind of tribesmen a bunch of Sudanese
under a leader in that country more than fifty thousand of them show up to this battle
against the small group of British and British allies.
And using modern weaponry including basically machine guns modern rifles I mean it's
essentially in a beta version of the First World War Army that Britain goes to war with and they're
fighting guys who have like muskets practically. And
in one afternoon they inflict some thirty thousand or more casualties
on the tribesmen and folks that they're facing ten
thousand dead five thousand captured the rest wounded.
00:43:51
And the British lose forty five to fifty British soldiers
in the endeavor forty five to fifty. And they just demolished this
native force.
00:44:03
When you're only losing that number of people for such great gains
sometimes you don't always think too much about the deeper questions
involved in the cost because the cost isn't that great. And let's be honest in this era
if those British soldiers had been wiping out Frenchmen or
Germans or Swedes or people like themselves there might have been more of an
outrage. It was an era where sometimes the killing of native
peoples in other places was not given the same sort of
sense of horror and outrage that killing people who look like yourself
might engender.
00:44:45
We all understand how that might work.
00:44:49
And so instead of a battle of Omdurman where the changing of territory was a relatively
small affair with relatively few casualties. You know in one thousand seven
hundred the Germans and the British in just one battle in this war you know suffer between two
hundred five hundred thousand casualties each.
You think of deeper different more fundamental questions. When you not
only suffer casualties like that but you do so over and over and over
again with no appreciable change nothing certainly worth all that and you
begin asking fundamental questions about these treaties you wrote at an earlier time in this war
. How many Frenchmen Is it worth losing to regain the lost
territories of Alsace-Lorraine. How many German young
people is it worth to hold on to Belgium. How many
Austria Hungarian troops or conversely Italian troops.
00:45:46
You know is that particular area near tree asked worth.
00:45:53
How many Dominion lives in Indian lives in British lives is
post-war British involvement in the Middle East worth.
00:46:02
Well if it's the battle of Omdurman and we're talking tiny numbers it's certainly worth it.
00:46:07
There's a number that you're going to get to when it's not
in the First World War challenges a lot of people to ask those kinds of questions and the people that were
operating under the same sort of mentality that would have been present at the Battle of Omdurman are
red faced when these treaties show up showing that that's just what they're like. They haven't
changed yet and the treaties are going to have to be filled anyway. Meanwhile if you didn't feel
bad enough in late one nine hundred seventeen when the Bolsheviks released this information
in January one thousand eight hundred in part because the Bolsheviks did release this information President
Woodrow Wilson in the United States released something called the fourteen points.
Now the fourteen points. It's the Bolshevik move that
makes the rest of the world look like a bunch of capitalist war mongers is like a left hook
. The American movie nineteen eighteen in January is like a right
cross right afterwards to all these European old powers because the United States hitting from the
from the other side of the idealism scale. Are you suggesting
that you should have a war based on things like mutual respect
Woodrow Wilson says nice things for example about the Germans about the Americans and the rest of the world do not
begrudge the Germans a shot to German greatness and all this kind of stuff.
00:47:25
In other words conciliatory stuff if you're trying to have a deal and make everybody come to the table feeling
like yes we can work together. But if you're the French and you've already suffered more than a million casualties
against these people you had a war against them a generation in the past I mean you're not really in the mood
to be very conciliatory and then Wilson starts talking about stuff that's as
idealistic as anything the Bolsheviks are putting out and a lot of it sounds very similar for
example.
00:47:50
Here's how Wilson leads into his fourteen points and notice how often he talks about
a change in you know what we could maybe call today
global public opinion or international morality and
values he says from the beginning of his statement that's gone down in
history as the Fourteen Points quote.
00:48:13
It will be our wish and purpose that the processes of peace when they are
begun shall be absolutely open and they shall involve and permit henceforth
no secret understandings of any kind. The day of conquest and
aggrandizement is gone by so was also the day of secret covenants entered
into in the interest of particular governments and likely at some unlooked for moment to
upset the peace of the world.
00:48:38
It is this happy fact now clear to the view of every public man whose thoughts do not still
linger in an age that is dead and gone which makes it possible for every
nation whose purposes are consistent with justice in the peace of the world to a
vow nor at any other time the object it has in view and he then goes
into you know the kinds of things he's talking about here that will make a
difference in the post-war world and that everybody should start to agree to.
00:49:06
He says as the number one fourteen your number one point in the fourteen points
quote open covenants of peace openly arrived at. After
which there shall be no private international understandings of any kind. But
diplomacy shall proceed always frankly and in the public view
and quote.
00:49:26
Can you imagine even the governments of our world today
even talking about doing that.
00:49:34
The idea that you had treaties with other countries and all the agreement should be public and open to
everyone. I mean that's radical stuff even today. It sounded every bit
like what the Bolsheviks were calling for and all of a sudden you have old Europe
that three four five years ago was sitting at the height of its fame everything was fine and
now they've got this on both sides of them from powerful nations. It's
a real change in attitude. As I said though it's not going to be allowed to
change agreements that countries have between each other and the
juiciest stuff that came out of these secret treaty released the Edward
Snowden like a dump to the Manchester Guardian and others was the
treaties that had been signed some of them as late as one thousand nine hundred eighteen the most famous is
known as the site's peak agreement but there are others that catalogue
the great powers plan for ripping apart the Ottoman Empire if the great powers on the
Allied side won the war they were going to go totally Imperial on the old
empire the Russians were going to finally after hundreds of years of wanting it get
Constantinople. It's Stamboul later
Byzantium Once upon a time this great city to controls. You know the
Dardanelles in the Bosphorus and the you know the the access to the Black Sea would be a
huge coup. The Russians were prevented from doing this by the very British and French
that they were now negotiating with to get it in the eight hundred fifty S. in the Crimean War
which propped up the Ottoman Empire for another generation. But now the Russians were on the same side as the
French and the British. They had all decided that the Ottomans had to go and they were all going to agree on what
pieces they got. Now the payoff for the Russians getting Constantinople in the
regions around that was that the French and the British would get to carve up much of what is now the modern
Middle East. And I just don't write me the email I know that even saying
the term Middle East is a reference to their colonial past in that region. Because
really if you were going to announce it properly you should call it West Asia. Or something
like that but that doesn't really denote the exact area you're talking about. You could get in to the
areas of it you could say the Levant or Anatolia or Mesopotamia but those are all just
pieces of the term Middle East encompasses so I apologize I know it's not the right
phrase. Nonetheless we all know what we mean and certainly if we're going to talk about the era where Middle
East becomes the colonial term for the era why not start with the era where it becomes a
colonial possession for non Islamic powers the psych's Pekoe agreement and
others have France carving up large chunks of the modern Arab world and the British
taking northern Iraq and I mean
that they're breathtaking. They really are and when the Bolsheviks released the
secret treaties and the Ottoman government reads the secret treaties to their own
you know group of nobles is the wrong word but governmental
ministers Eugene Rogan says in his book that there's this
audible gasp as they hear the plans that France and Britain and Russia
have you know for the future of the Ottomans and it's not going to be a slap on the wrist it's going to be
dismemberment.
00:52:49
And the dismemberment of the Ottoman Empire is what creates the modern Middle Eastern world
that is still such a part of our lives today.
00:52:57
I had said earlier that the Bolshevik Revolution was probably the top you know long
lasting aftershock from the First World War but maybe it's better to say that there's a list of three
or four possible claimants to the throne if you will and maybe another one is
the changes that are created in the Middle East because the
Ottoman Empire is broken up. Let's remember this is a six hundred year
old empire it's hard to overstate how long the
structure is and the type of rule by the Ottoman impacted that area.
First of all it was a large area that was under Muslim control with
a caliphate on paper at least and the leader of the religion at least the Sunni branch
of it in Turkey.
00:53:43
The Turks ruled that region with an iron fist. And yet at the same time
it was in the process of having huge debates over modernization in keeping up
with the rest of the world and they were just a few years from finding out
that they sat atop some of the world's greatest deposits of oil on the
planet which some more conspiratorial historians will will weave
into this story and point out that it wasn't an accident that the French and the British for example were
deciding that it was worth tearing up the Ottoman Empire at this point.
00:54:18
But if they hadn't and somehow the Ottoman Empire existed another ten or twenty years
. Think about the inheritance it was about to come into as
a giant multi-ethnic. Islamic
state with oil wealth coming into the I mean just it's
fascinating to ponder how different the world might be.
00:54:41
But if you're a member of the government of Ottoman Turkey when you hear the news about how
you're going to be dismembered as part of these secret agreements that become public you're getting that
information about a week maybe even a little less than a
week on the heels of some other information that sort of should have warned you that this was
coming because everybody awoke to a declaration that was published on November
second one hundred seventeen that appeared in a bunch of newspapers and kind of went viral I guess
you could say by the standards of the early twentieth century.
00:55:12
And the statement said this quote His Majesty's Government view with favor
the establishment in Palestine of a national home for the Jewish people
and will use their best endeavours to facilitate the achievement of this object it being
clearly understood that nothing shall be done which may prejudice the civil and religious
rights of existing non Jewish communities in Palestine or the rights and political status
enjoyed by Jews in any other countries.
00:55:40
End quote.
00:55:42
So you get that on November second you get the news on the eighth or the ninth you know about the
psychs pigo agreement and these others that don't just tear up your empire and give it to the
victorious powers. If they're going to be victorious that's still up in the air but also
gives it to peoples who are currently in your empire now most
notably Arab people in a very similar move
to what the Germans had done when they sent Vladimir Lenin to go into
Russia and destabilize that country. The British had been working with subjects of
the Ottoman Empire and encouraging them to rebel. They were a couple of
important Arab tribal leaders that were already sort of thinking along those lines and
may have had contacts with the British even before war broke out who by nine hundred fifty nine hundred
sixteen were convinced to rebel against the Ottoman overlords. They had a lot of
British help. They eventually went from a bunch of ragtag guerrillas to
a relatively nasty guerrilla force in the region although the impact that they had on the
war has been argued about forever with historians. It's a very colourful story it involves
this person that's called Lawrence of Arabia they made a movie about him but there's a lot more to that
including the most important people which were these two tribal families that the British were able to
convince to. A rebel against the Ottomans. Both of whom were important
one controlled the area around Mecca the other had a name that
now graces the front of the country that occupies the Arabian
Peninsula Saudi and the other family put Caine's on the
thrones of multiple post World War one Middle Eastern
nations the kings of Iraq came from this family the kings of places
like Jordan the current king of Jordan is a descendant of this family and that
power emanated from this first world war throwing their lot
in with the allies and then
you know reaping the reward now it should be pointed out that the reward
was not what they'd planned on the British after the war found themselves in a rather
uncomfortable position when they realized that they had promised multiple things
to multiple people and often times it was the same stuff.
00:58:02
This will lead to some embarrassing moments after the war over questions about
fine print and what was really said and meant. Sir Henry Wilson who was the
chief of the Imperial General Staff in one thousand nine hundred will tell another British
general quote We have made so many promises to everybody in a
contradictory sense that I cannot for the life of me see how we can get out of our present mess without
breaking our word to somebody. End quote. And it's easy to see
why the Arabs have been promised things and what it was hoped that they would do the rebellion.
What's been more argued about him is more interesting for historians is trying to figure out you know
what was what was to be achieved by the Balfour Declaration. And there are
so many different rationales that have been put forward that could be a study an interesting
show in and of itself. I mean it runs the gamut too from people who are suggesting that
the reason the British throw their weight behind you know a Jewish homeland in Palestine has to do with a
personal relationship with a Jewish guy who helped you know make it easy to create a
weapon. There's another theory that it was hoped that they could have aided the British
wanted a friendly people to occupy this important area to sort of help guard
Britain's Imperial possessions in places like India. But my favorite of the many many
theories out there for why the Balfour declaration this important
benchmark moment in the history of modern zionism happened. My favorite is the
anti-Semitic reason that it might happen that some people put forward which is that they were
both a combination of real anti semites out there and people who were
pretty educated and pretty sure that it was just a canard when people
said the Jews ruled the world. But just in case it wasn't Wouldn't it
be worth it just to be on the safe side. If we made sure the Jewish public interest the
world over was on our side. In fact the British or even
worried about rumours that the Germans were going to offer the Jews a homeland
if the Jews sort of signed on with the German cause. And so in an effort to make sure that if the
Jews control the world they were on our side that we were going to have a
statement made that said we supported a return to Palestine for Jewish folks
I love that with that just that's the most perverse of all the excuses but none the less what it
did was plant a seed that later on
we all understand will grow into you know the modern Middle East that we have today.
01:00:32
There's also that one other little element that of course plays a
role in this story we mentioned a little bit ago that
turns this region from you know what you easily could have
suggested might be a backwater in the middle of nowhere after the war was over with some
important religious sacred sites and whatnot but not much going on in the way of
resources or value or anything where the great powers on the world stage would care much for this
area and instead transforms this region into
perhaps the most strategically valuable spot on the planet
.
01:01:11
It's because all of a sudden the world realizes the importance that
oil and petroleum is going to play in the twentieth century world and
everybody sort of realizes it at the same time.
01:01:25
It's one of my favorite parts of the First World War story too and it's so hard to figure out what people
knew when there had been visionaries all throughout the
development of the twentieth century realisation that oil was going to be
huge. I mean they start pumping this stuff in the eight hundred forty S. eight hundred fifty S. eight hundred
sixty S. in a bunch of different places and refining it and the main reason it's important
in the eighteen hundreds remember the eighteen hundreds is part of the industrial revolution the
industrial revolution was a revolution that functioned mostly with
coal as the energy source although steam was also used
.
01:02:03
The people that are making the decisions in the First World War are going to be men in
age groups who grew up in a world powered by coal and steam.
01:02:14
Oil was becoming quite valuable but for different reasons than energy
. Well I guess you could still say it was energy was it was an illumination source and a lot of
places they used it for light. They also used it for lubrication
oil. But people did not first see what maybe you
could call the vehicular revolution the first world
war would so plainly sort of put on steroids it was coming anyway but you
know war tends to speed up technological progress because well it's life or
death.
01:02:49
One of the famous stories of the First World War is the famous Battle of the Marne story of the
taxi cabs of Paris lining up to ferry troops to the very
hot spot on the battlefront that was in near danger of breaking this is all a romantic story
that helps illustrate one of the really early trends in the First World War the use of
vehicles you know to change the situation on the battlefield for all of human
history men have either been walking themselves or utilizing you know
natural animal power in this battle. They were starting to use things that were powered
by gasoline.
01:03:25
And you would go from cars and taxi cabs to trucks to
tanks. You'd have aircraft. Try to imagine and I'm sure Leonardo
da Vinci could do a great sketch of it in the Renaissance. But try to imagine
aircraft that were coal or even powered. You
kind of needed this dense portable energy source that
became part of internal combustion engines and all this stuff sort of happened
during the war. The visionaries had been people like
Churchill who had said convert the British fleet to oil burning instead of
coal.
01:04:04
He was ahead of his time in like one thousand nine hundred eight the British government was making deals with
the oil company in Iran. It's called the Anglo Persian oil company it was very powerful and
very important for a long time but once again it shows that some people were on top of this or
as some historians have suggested they may have just been doing this for the lubrication and illumination value
they may not have foreseen the vehicular revolution either. But once it strikes you
know even people who aren't all that visionary can see oh my gosh you know
oil is the coal of the twentieth century. And I often think
to myself you know if you found the oil of the twenty first century some
clean burning immensely wonderful replacement oil they
could do all these fantastic things but it only appeared in a few separate
isolated regions around the globe. What do you think the governments of the
world would do today about that. I mean here I've
been critical of the great powers for some of the horse trading that was
apparent in all their war aims and have probably over emphasized that to a
degree considering how much geo politics did play a role in economics did play a role in the
First World War had a lot of reasons and the reasons that countries got into it had a lot of different causes and
nuances as well. But it's the horse trading nature of territories that
seems to stand out so much to modern sensibilities.
It does make me think however that if that twenty first century version of oil
were found tomorrow but in limited amounts and in limited areas
. You know I do wonder whether our governments would act any differently in
terms of the way they would approach it than that first world war leadership.
If anything I would imagine that what they learn from the First World War is not what to
do or what not to do but perhaps have a better sense of how you justify
what you do in the First World War to our modern sensibilities and
to the changing sensibilities of the time. It all seemed a little too naked sometimes
once it was exposed to the light of day. And yet it's hard to blame any of
these powers for doing what ever it took to see to
it that you could get yourself some of this new twentieth century
version of coal because it could literally be a matter of life
or death in terms of remaining a great power. And as normally
happens in the lottery for natural resources some places were blessed with
lots of this stuff and other places with almost none.
01:06:45
The United States is one of the first places where the first great I mean it's the
Saudi Arabia of the first great oil boom in the United States they find it in
Pennsylvania initially and then in a ton of other places the United States is one of the
great oil producing nations of all time. And they really come into their own right
when the oil really takes off very very late eighteen hundreds early nineteen hundreds
.
01:07:09
Russia also has some wonderful reserves that have been under development from very
early on in Baquba in places in what's now parts of Azerbaijan
and the problem they were having of course is this Bolshevik Revolution a lot of these out of the way
places on the Russian periphery were deciding maybe to go on their own
and take the oil with them so temporary problems for the Russians in
Baquba what that does is create a situation where there's a giant
wonderful supply of oil sitting there with no
big government controlling it temporarily because the Bolsheviks you know their whole thing is in
disorder and they're trying to get a handle on things and they're preaching self-determination people are taking them up on the offer in
Baku is all of a sudden going to break away and become part of some maybe Azerbaijani state
that is just too much of a.
01:08:00
A temptation for a bunch of great powers that look at it and think I bet I could get there
with an army if I tried hard enough and what if we could seize the oil fields of
Baku. The only other good source anywhere around Europe was in
Romania and about one thousand and seventeen all the great
powers realize we got to get ourselves some oil and the British and the French and the Germans
three of the great powers on the world stage in the first world war started none of them have good access
to large amounts of oil. It's hard
to suggest that there is any bigger national security concern for those
nations at this point than to secure themselves a supply of this
century's great energy source and the one that's needed to power
the most cutting edge weapons that you need to win any war.
It's easy to be critical of these people pursuing these kinds of
policies but look at what the stakes are. And from a purely
realit politic down in dirty standard
the arguments for imperialism in this case make a certain kind of sense. I mean
what they're saying for example amongst British politicians some of whom
do not want to go in and control these areas the prime minister before the
current prime minister in one thousand seven hundred Herbert Asquith. You know he didn't want anything to do with
this region and all of its problems and factionalism. I mean the Arab tribes that were fighting
fighting on Britain's side in this part of the Arab revolt were only part of the Arabs out there they were a
lot of other Arabs that were very loyal to the Ottoman government you had Sunni and
Shiite issues to deal with I mean to ask with it look like a hornet's nest
. But he had a hard time fighting against the people on the other side of the argument who are
making the point that you were then going to simply see
whatever could be taken from the Ottomans once they were gone to your
great power rivals. I mean the French will go in then and take the oil perhaps and then
they are strengthened while you are weakened and you don't have any access to the
coal of the twentieth century as Asquith eventually said you know
he said quote If we were to leave the other nations to scramble for turkey without
taking anything ourselves we should not be doing our duty.
01:10:23
End quote.
01:10:26
Well if not having access to your own oil meant that
your country would fall to a second class status. I think there would have been a
lot of people in Britain a democratic government who would have
said that it was their politicians' duty to see that that didn't happen
.
01:10:46
Now the last time we checked in with the story in the Middle East and all that area
concerning the Ottomans fighting against the British and the French and and the British Dominion troops from
places like India and South Africa and Australia and New Zealand and places like that
that the war hadn't been going particularly well. The Turks were tough
they put up a pretty darn good resistance for a country that was supposed to be basically done
. Having just fought a couple of wars previously economics were in a disaster and
everything and instead the Turks put up a pretty darn spirited resistance they've got the Germans
in there helping them to you know modernize a little here and there and the British simply were not
prepared and who could be for the logistical challenges trying to
maintain large armies which the British didn't tend to maintain in the field. Anyway
throughout their history in the middle of the desert. But challenges were huge the Turks
were tough the British essentially had to retreat from deliberately they got
trapped in a place called cook like we told you in an earlier episode and had to surrender. It was
not exactly their finest hour but in their defense most of their effort is in the meat
grinder area on the western front. This is an area that some
people refer to as a sideshow. And this gets back
to the argument we mentioned earlier between those in the Allied camp that called
themselves or were called westerners and the others who were called Easterners.
People whose ideas said that the Western Front the meat grinder is is the focal point of the war
. It's going to be decided there. So taking troops and sending them to any other part
of the war is you know to work against what you need to be doing which is breaking through at the
key point. The other group the easterners believed that throwing
troops into the meat grinder where things were stalemated was a callous waste of
lives when there were vulnerable points all on the rest of the
map that could be exploited easier places to go. Winston Churchill in the Second
World War was always looking for the soft underbelly of Europe was the way the phrase
was turned in the First World War there were Easterners looking for the soft underbelly of Europe
. And the best argument I ever heard for who was right
because I was looking at Lloyd George's memoirs the other day and you know twenty years after the war he
still justifying in wagging a finger in the face of the Westerners saying we were right and the
Westerners are saying that they were right.
01:13:15
The German general Luden Dorf had pointed out that yes the west and the Western Front
meat grinder was where the war would be decided. But if there was a catastrophe on
any of the other fronts in the war that that would impact German power on the western
front leading to a loss there so that they were interconnected. All these
non western front battles are side shows unless those fronts
collapse and then it's a disaster.
01:13:43
In one thousand seventeen the British who have changed generals and who have
now put a meticulous effort into just slowly but surely
building up the infrastructure that you need to maintain an army in the field. Just think of the
pipelines of water that they build for miles upon miles
upon miles to go out to where the troops are going to have to be in trench lines I mean the amount of
effort that's required the buildup of troops and everything else but by nineteen seventeen
they begin to push the Turks back everywhere. The Year nine hundred
seventeen and especially the latter half of the year sees multiple victories on the part of the
British led allied forces in places like Mesopotamia and Palestine.
01:14:27
Lots of outflanking some wonderfully clever spying maneuvers and
some fantastic bravery going on dastardly on the part of some of these
Dominion mounted infantry forces for example end up creating a
situation where the British High Command can see Jerusalem the
holy city of holy cities right sacred to at least three major religions Islam
Christianity and Judaism. They can see Jerusalem within range and they know that they're going to take
it if this your momentum continues. But after dealing with
passion Dale in the mud in the blood in the shock in the sense of never ending war which just wraps
up in mid November. Lloyd George asks British General Allen B.
if he can manage to capture the holy city by Christmas he says it would be a great Christmas
present for the British people. A little pick me up if you will. After all of the
horribleness. Lloyd George gets his wish granted
on December eleventh with the British and allied forces already in the
city. They receive a surrender notice from the Turkish
representative who writes quote Due to the severity of the
siege of the city and the suffering that this peaceful country has endured from your heavy
guns and for fear that these deadly bombs will hit the holy places. We are
forced to hand over to you the city through Hussein Al Husseini the mayor of Jerusalem
hoping that you will protect Jerusalem the way we have protected it for more than five hundred
years and quote Doesn't that
you know sort of bring it all home in terms of the immense
age of some of these nation states that we're dealing with here
. There's a ton of irony in symbolism. When the allied forces
captured Jerusalem start with the fact that Christians had captured
Jerusalem before in ten ninety nine during the First Crusade it
was a very big deal at the time followed by a terrible massacre but the Christians managed
to hold the city for a couple hundred years. The Islamic general Saladin the great
occurred by the way will retake the city during the Third Crusade in the late twelve
hundreds. There will be a major crusade in the Middle Ages launched
against these very Ottomans. You know when there are a lot younger and more
vigorous of an empire and now Christian forces
are once again moving into this city.
01:17:00
The propaganda possibilities of an event like this are huge but
it also has some real world postwar implications you know that old line that
possession is nine tenths of the law. Well that will certainly be the case
after the war when the British are involved in not always wonderfully nice
negotiations with the French and people who are locals in that region over who gets what.
01:17:25
There had been some agreements during the war that Palestine and Jerusalem should be
internationalized. The British didn't like that idea as much after the war and since they
were the ones governing there since December one thousand nine hundred seventeen gave them
a unique ability to decide how things were going to go so important in a real world sense to
the entire affair and its importance of the entry into this
holiest of cities was understood and stage managed to a degree. The
British government had some ideas on the way we would say today the optics or the
visual should go in eight hundred ninety eight the German Emperor the Kaiser had
visited Jerusalem again with lots of visuals and optics and lots of photographs and lots of
propaganda benefits for doing so and he kind of
offended some of the religious folks by not really seeming humble enough in the face of you know
such intense sacredness for you know three of the top religions on the planet
. There was even a story that the Turks had to destroy a part of the ancient
old you know Israeli part of the walls to make room for the Kaiser's
Karzai so he could bring the car in whether or not that's true. It certainly made him look
bad and before Allonby becomes the first Christian conqueror in more than
five hundred years to walk into Jerusalem he gets a little advice from a British
General Robertson who tells him in a telegram quote.
01:18:52
In the event of Jerusalem being occupied it would be of considerable political
importance if you on officially entering the city dismount at the city
gate and enter on foot. GERMAN EMPEROR wrote in and the saying went
around a better man than he walked.
01:19:09
Advantage of contrast in conduct will be obvious and quote
by December nine hundred seventeen.
01:19:18
It looks as though it won't take a whole lot for the British and the French in the Dominion forces
to strike at the Turks and just sort of push the entire house of cards
over and in some ways the Turks are not doing themselves any good because when the
Russians pull out of the war it leaves that time of territories that have lots of Turks
in it.
01:19:39
You know open for Turkish conquest and the Turks are sending armies that might be better used
against the British and the French into this territory where places like Armenia and
Azerbaijan and all those places are in order to get new territory while they're losing
old territory.
01:19:55
None the less whether or not the French and the British can just push over the house of cards now becomes a bit of a
moot point because very early into nineteen eighteen when the finishing touches on
any idea to do that would have to be in play all of a sudden
everything is needed back on the Western Front Allonby
is going to have his forces his best forces ripped from him and no reinforcements or extra
forces added because all of a sudden just when everything looked like the
United States was going to come in and turn the tide of the war the Germans attempt to
turn the tide of the war first.
01:20:32
And we mentioned before the real differences in sort of the feel and the ebb
and the flow and the rhythm of the two world wars the first in the Second World Wars.
In the Second World War there was a certain point where the outcome of the war was no
longer in doubt but it was quite a ways between that moment and the end of the war
.
01:20:54
You know it's probably safe to say like the late one nine hundred forty three everyone
knows that the Germans on their side are not winning that war. No one knows how many people are going to have to die
before the outcome is finally settled. But everyone knows what the outcome is going to be. You can concoct
some real real long shot scenarios where the Germans for example get atomic weapons first or
something like that and change the course of history. But by and large it was a moot point.
Past a certain you know period probably late forty three as I said the First World War as
rhythm was completely unlike that. There were you know if you wanted to say
who had the advantage most of the time it was the Allied entente forces you know
continually putting their weight on the other side of wearing them down. But the other side led by
Germany would strike out and lash out at certain times with huge blows
you know that easily could have knocked the other side out. The last of these
Germany throws in early one thousand nine hundred even the members of
Germany's you know upper military caste were calling it the last card
. Now I have to set a few things up before we understand about this last card
situation. The first is understanding where the war is at this point. Germany's got some
good stuff happening and some bad stuff happening we just mentioned one of the bad things. The
situation with their Turkish ally in the Middle East is starting to turn for the worst right the latter
part of one nine hundred seventeen not so great but that is offset by good things that have been
happening in that same time period we've said is so important October November December one thousand
seventeen. The Germans send actually not that much but it made a big
difference some help to their Australian allies who've been fighting the Italians for ever
in the region of the river reasons though. They have had eleven
battles of the sons of God to this point in the war. So you can tell how much things are
moving right at the stalemate on these alpine peaks and they're cutting you know
hideouts into the ice it's these crazy Alpine war they're fighting. But both sides
are really tired and the Italian troops are really tired of the guy who's been running the show for them the
general in charge of their effort he's really sort of a stickler
and they've had it with him and they and they've been like they're Austria-Hungary and enemies putting up with a
lot three years and a lot of senseless death has just been it's been terrible. And then all of a sudden the
Germans send you know seven or eight divisions there to act as sort of the cutting edge of another
offensive. The twelfth Sanzo but it gets known by a
different name because it stands out from the other eleven battles of the sun so it's often called the Battle of
corporate Oh and the reason it stands out from the other battles of the Somme so
is because this time something decisive happens the Italians
get smashed. And who can blame them the Germans are once again
using an even more perfected version of new tactics and new artillery
methods. You know as we said before what you're quickly watching occur in the four years of the First
World War You're watching these armies transform from something more like you know the
Franco-Prussian War in the eighteen seventies to something more like the
Second World War and you can see it as the tactics develop year after
year from stupidly walking into machine gun fire and ordered rows of men to wear
infiltration tactics are taking over and you're beginning to see a lot of the same
methods being employed by these armies for the very first time that every army in the world still
uses today involving fire and movement and mutual support and you know bypassing strong
points. When the Germans do this to the poor Italians and the Italians
get I mean three hundred thousand people surrender. That's how bad it is
. And yet the Italians are able to move like sixty miles back
reform their lines keep from falling apart totally in a way to
help them the British and the French who have to take you know troops again from the Western Front to bolster
this other area but what it means is by the end of one thousand and seventeen
the Germans have knocked out a bunch of their opponents in this war when you look at how they
started the war with all these enemies against them. Look at what they've done in one thousand nine hundred fifteen they
knock out Serbia in one thousand sixteen they knock out Rumania
in one thousand seventeen. They've just knocked out Russia from the war
and given Italy's such a bloody lip that nothing is going to happen down there for a
while. And now an early nineteen eighteen for the first
time in the war. The Germans face the British and the
French without a whole lot of distractions. They don't have the
Russians on the other side and they have a
small window of opportunity before millions of
Americans start arriving in Europe to swamp them.
This is the way Winston Churchill describes the situation.
The set up will say and then I'm going to contrast that with the way out of Hitler
does and remember that both of these people are writing to specific
audiences. Churchill's writing to people who are in
the especially British and American audiences and really you know a super patriotic
romantic sort of an approach Hitler is writing this material for a bunch of
bitter war veterans who still ate over what they
experienced and this feeling of betrayal and the bitterness
since the war ended so they have different audiences they're writing for but contrasting their styles in the
way they set this up is intriguing. Here's how Churchill described the
situation and remember and remember the end of one nine hundred seventeen The British are still in shock
from the battle that they still call passion Dale Churchill says quote.
01:26:48
As the passion Dale struggled died away in the storms and mud of winter. The military
rulers of Germany addressed themselves to a new situation the collapse of Russia had
enabled them to transport a million men and three thousand guns from the
eastern to the Western Front for the first time therefore since the invasion they found
themselves possessed of a definite superiority over the allies in France. But this
superiority was fleeting. The United States had declared war and was arming but had not
yet arrived. Once the great masses of American manhood could be trained
equipped transported and brought into the line of battle all the numerical
advantage Germany had gained from the destruction of Russia would be more than counterbalanced
at the same time. The German main headquarters knew the grave losses the British army had
suffered passion Dail and felt themselves intitled to count upon a marked
decline in its strength in fighting quality. Lastly the amazing character of the
German Austrian victory over the Italians a corporate Oh glittered temptingly
end quote.
01:27:53
He then goes on to say it would have been a great time for the Germans to open negotiations with
us. Instead they chose to attack.
01:28:02
Before we get to Hitler's view of the situation it's worth asking you know what were the
Germans fighting for. What did they hope to achieve what was the best case
scenario in any sort of end to the war. And this is another difference
between the first and the second world wars in the second world war as soon as the Americans had
said that unconditional surrender you know was supposed to be the victory
conditions. It made the war one of those conflicts where you're going to get what's called a
Carthaginian peace you know reminiscent of how the Romans in the
Third Punic Wars treated the city of Carthage total destruction right the
total occupation total submission and domination unconditional surrender
are the peace terms and the First World War like so much of the stuff that went on during
this time period the surrender was going to everyone presumed going to be some sort of a
negotiated affair it's going to be a bargaining session and both sides are
fighting to be the superior person at the bargaining table right the one who can
insist on better terms as General Eaton Dorf the
German military leader points out what they're fighting for and why they have to keep attacking
.
01:29:13
He says quote Germany could only make the enemy inclined to peace by
fighting it was first of all necessary to shake the position of Lloyd George and
Clemenceau by a military victory before that was done. Peace was not to be thought
of.
01:29:29
End quote.
01:29:31
Now let's remember what Luton north means is that he needs this military victory to get the
kind of peace he wants. Write a piece that for example gives Germany
either direct or de facto control of places like Belgium for example. That's his
bargaining position in any sort of agreement that ends the war. That's what they're fighting for and the other
side is too although more and more one of the conditions that the Americans and the British and the French are
insisting on is that the German form of government has to change. They can't be a
monarchy anymore. Well that may leave Germany still alive but it
means if you're the Emperor of Germany or any of these high ranking people that are a part of the
German monarchy it might as well be total war against you.
Germany may live on but you're not going to be a part of it of Hitler is
a soldier in the first world war as we had mentioned earlier in his book
Mind comp which is written for the German veteran audience and post-war audience that we
mentioned a little earlier.
01:30:30
He talks about the skulker isn't the shirkers and all these people that are beginning to
sort of stab the German army in the back from the home front.
That's the way it's portrayed and when you read lewd indorse memoirs to written during a similar
time period he has the same thing going where you know that the reason that the German
troops are in danger is not because the enemy will hurt them because they're sort of this
victorious entity on the battlefield it's because the homefront will let them down.
And before you know Hitler sums up the situation that we're facing right here at the beginning of one thousand eight hundred
he goes off on some strikes that are taking place during this time
period in Germany. There's a naval strike that happens in one thousand seventeen. That's
disconcerting. And then several hundred thousand munitions workers
go go on strike right at the beginning of the New Year in one thousand nine hundred and again
when the German government publishes the ringleaders of the strikes they send them to the front as punishment
but that means that they're infiltrating Now these military units and they're infiltrating them with
these ideas that Luden Dorf and Hitler time right to Bolshevism and
Hitler ties Bolshevism by the way to Jews.
01:31:42
So right there you begin to see the origins of the stab in the back theory right
. And here's the way Hitler in his in his. Well what are you going to say.
Bestselling book Mind Canth describes the situation the Germans found themselves
in after they'd given the Italians a bloody nose a corporal after they've knocked all these other people out of the
war and after finding out you know that they're going to attack.
01:32:05
Quote toward the end of nineteen seventeen the low point of the
Army's dejection seems to have passed. The whole army took fresh hope and fresh
courage after the Russian collapse. The conviction that the war would end with the victory of
Germany after all began to seize the troops more and more against singing
could be heard and the calamity Janes became rarer again people
believed in the future of the Fatherland and quote the calamity
Janes are these skulkers and shirkers and people who say anti patriotic things
or or negative things about the war effort. He says quote especially the
Italian collapse of autumn one thousand seventeen had had the most wonderful
effect in this victory. We saw our proof of the possibility of breaking through the front
even aside from the Russian theater of war a glorious faith flowed again into the
hearts of the millions enabled them to await spring one thousand nine hundred eighteen with relief
and confidence. The foe was visibly depressed in this winter he
remained quieter than usual. This was the lull before the storm.
01:33:13
End quote.
01:33:15
Then Hitler sums up his view of this moment and what the Allies were
facing now with a sort of Germany unleashed He says quote In the winter of one thousand
seventeen to nineteen eighteen dark clouds appeared for the first time in the firmament of
the Allied world.
01:33:31
For nearly four years they had been assailing the German warrior and had been unable to
encompass his downfall and all this while the German had only his shield arm free for
defense while the sword was obliged to strike. Now in the east now in the
south but now at last the giant's back was free streams of blood
had flown before he administered final defeat to one of his foes. Now in the West his
shield was going to be joined by his sword up till then the enemy had been unable to
break his defense and now he himself was facing attack. The enemy feared
him and trembled for their victory and quote.
01:34:10
Now in one sense this is a post first world war Hitler putting a rosy
picture on this thing you know what. Here we were going to defeat them and then you know stabbed in the back by
the Jews and Bolsheviks right. But at the same time there's some truth to a
couple of these things one the Bolsheviks were having an influence on Germany
and that attempt by Luden Dorf to you know
get rid of his next door neighbor in the apartment complex by burning his apartment down is
beginning to change Germany a little bit in Luden Dorf writes about this in his memoirs in a
way remember writing years later so you can pretend to have hindsight. He basically
acts like he understood the risk was dangerous. He thought they could contain you know the
Bolshevik intellectual contagion but he knew that there was a chance it wouldn't work out that way
. And there's something to that in terms of why the Germans were all of a sudden
beginning to start to show real cracks in the facade of the
home front.
01:35:12
And some of these people it should be pointed out that a guy like Luden or for Hitler things are Bolsheviks are
probably more like Social Democrats you know mild socialists. But to a
guy like Luden Dorf anyone who's thinking that the war might have gone on too long or
that Germany instead of an Emperor might do better with a representative democracy or a republic or
something that to them is traitorous and radical so we might as well be a Bolshevik
. Nonetheless think about what these people are going through four years of war.
All these countries in a sense sacrificing their future with each generation of
youngsters that they call up and throw into the mall and sacrificing their
pasts to their cannibalizing their country's
historical and long term assets. We've quoted the English wife of
a German nobleman Princess blue sure Evelyn Boucher writing in her diary she
told this story that is just heartbreaking about you know the fact that the Germans don't have enough ammunition
anymore and they're starting to go into the society and take things to melt down
. One historian I read said that during this period more than ten thousand
church bells or melted down and princes plushie tells a story about that.
01:36:23
She says quote There are other signs too pathetic in their way
of the increasing scarcity of metal for everywhere the old church bells and even the
organ pipes are being dragged from the churches and turned into ammunition
will stowing to the scarcity of oil. The sanctuary lamp such a dear familiar
sight in Catholic churches may no longer shed its tender light before the tabernacle.
In a small town near here a sad little ceremony took place the other day. The
ancient church bell which had rung the people from the cradle to the grave for three hundred years
and more was requisitioned by the military authorities. The grief felt by the
inhabitants was so great that they determined to do their ancient friend all the honor they
could.
01:37:08
And after having performed the regular funeral service for the dead over it a procession was
formed headed by the priest in his vestments and his acolytes swinging their
incense and the inhabitants following the battle which was covered with wreaths and
flowers and handed over to the military authorities under tears and
protestations and quote I look at that
story as kind of symbolic of you know the greatness of old Europe at the height and the high
water marks of its wealth and civilization and you hundreds of years
of glorious past behind them sort of girding the
whole society being ripped apart and thrown into the mall on the
furnace to provide the implements that are needed to fight the war
that is destroying its high place on the world stage.
This is a sort of tragic irony that isn't confined to Germany by the way this
is how Britain and France and Russia and all these old line powers kind of feel they're trapped in this conflict now
that is chewing up their wealth destabilizing the structures of their
society and once again taking the next class of draftees who reach
eighteen years old and throwing them into the meat grinder to think of the
pressure on these people who are commanding all these armies on on both sides
I mean Luden do if you can't help but think about this guy because he's the one who gets to decide how
you play Germany's last card. The Central Powers last car think of the people that are
counting on him from a completely human experiment imagine
the stress and responsibility that falls on this one guy shoulders more than anyone
else on that side obviously he's got help and staffs and you know other people to consult and what have you.
But basically the number one person's responsibility is his
. He's got to plan the biggest battle
in world history. And the stakes are everything
.
01:39:09
Wow.
01:39:13
This is the biggest encounter between you know the cutting edge militaries of the world that has
ever happened and that's what Luton Dorf is planning and it's an immensely complicated
affair with details beyond belief. I mean Luden Dorf
will start moving troops from the Eastern Front who have been fighting the Russians
on trains all the way over to the west before the Russians even sign a peace treaty by the
spring of one thousand eight hundred he's moved a million German soldiers who had been fighting the Russians
over to the west where they can now be used against the French and the British the German army in the West numbers
over three million soldiers by spring one thousand eighteen and
wooden doors has a plan that he's going to you know put into place that involves
throwing multiple punches at the French and the British like a five punch
combination and he's going to use about a million soldiers to form the
fist.
01:40:09
Michael named after St Michael is the first of these punches but the entire affair
will sometimes be called the one thousand nine hundred spring offensive and the German
soldiers refer to it. Sometimes just the great battle in France that shows you how big it's going to be
one part of it sometimes referred to as the peace offensive and sometimes the entire affair
is called the Kaiser schlock the Emperor's battle.
01:40:34
Historians have been fascinated by the series of battles ever since for a couple of
major reasons. One is the scope and the other of the
stakes. This is the largest battle the world's ever seen the
complexity is unbelievable and it's very hard battle to follow or explain
or talk about it.
01:40:55
The front will be miles long it will involve millions of men
.
01:41:00
The complexity in terms of trying to plan and arrange and get
ready for one of these big offensives in five or six months which is
your planning window is perhaps the most complex
task human beings have ever attempted to tackle.
I think you could say that there are bigger things like trying to create a you know global society which are in the process of
doing right now that's very hard. But you can do that over time and build on the achievements of
previous generations and sort of evolve towards a solution to a complex problem. These
people have a time window and it's short get the Kaiser schlock done within
five months boom it's got to be ready on the twenty first of March don't get it done I mean just the
attempts to keep the allies in the dark about where it's coming
are complex as heck I mean they will move troops and equipment at night. They will
cover up the artillery gun wheels with cloth so you can't hear them. They will
roust out the civilian population in all these towns and march around in all directions to confuse
you know allied observers. They will scramble and use
false radio messages and just because you know this is sort of a transition period in history just to
cover all their bases they will also pull out the carrier pigeons including carrier
pigeons captured from the other side put false notes in the little
compartment you know in their leg and send them off.
01:42:27
Let's call covering all your bases isn't it. But think of the planning and complexity in all the
work that goes on.
01:42:35
The other fascinating aspect to historians are the stakes.
When you have stakes like this the biggest war in human history. And as one
historian put it Luden too often the Germans have six months to change the course of the
war here.
01:42:50
After that the numerical advantage the Americans will provide will be overwhelming.
So you have this window of opportunity and it's an all or nothing thing. And some historians
have argued that the Germans should have just you know gone on the defensive here dug in and
made the allied forces fight until nineteen twenty or nineteen
twenty one before the you know mounting losses would force them into some sort
of a favorable peace but that kind of ignores how bad things are on the home front right even if the German army
can withstand these allied attacks they're going to lose the people back you know at home more
a year past the infamous turnip winter.
01:43:27
What happens when the turnip winter is the good old days right. It's a little north of the
Germans don't just put this attack together. They're excited about it. The German troops are
almost ecstatic The morale is sky high they want to chance to win the war. This is
why this first punch operation Michael is so important because this is the punch where
all the optimism is in place right everybody's drinking the Kool-Aid Luden
door decides to you know up his gamble ante a little bit more not only is he
gambling with this attack but he's going to you know essentially pull out the rocket
fuel from the great mass of troops he goes through and calms his
army for the best man. Right. The healthiest the strongest ones are the highest morale the
veterans who aren't cynical yet all these people who are better than the rest of the herd and
pulls them out and puts them into special units and gives them the best weapons again pulled away from the
great mass of people and the special training what they called special training in the First World
War Today we would call standard training in a modern military. They called them storm
trooper tactics we call them fire and move tactics and every army in the world uses them
now. Nonetheless what Lindorff has done here is create an initial
advantage. You know for himself because his best troops are going to go up against the
great mass of French and British troops that they run into.
01:44:49
They will give out the lion's share of casualties to the French and the British and the allies
but they will also take the lion's share of casualties this is a gamble because
when Luden Dorf uses these best troops he's going to use them up and if they haven't
won by that point he's going to be left with the not best troops the
left overs. People who've had their best weapons stripped from them and
given to the other guys people who haven't been trained in the latest tactics people who it's expected are
going to simply move up and occupy the trenches that have already been conquered. It's a
gamble and on March twenty first it's not a gamble Luden has
to worry about because he's got all these Stormtrooper and assault units
you know waiting for the moment to jump off.
01:45:38
Synchronizing their watches and waiting for what will be the largest
cannonade in history to kick off on March
twenty first operation Michael begins the first punch of the German multiplex combination
aimed primarily at the British some ten thousand
artillery pieces will open fire at about dawn somewhere in
the four o'clock hour.
01:46:06
They will only fire only for ever if you're under fire they'll only fire for
about four hours it's what's called a hurricane bombardment. Very different than what the Allies were
doing for most of the war where they will bombard for weeks on end sometimes right at
the Somme in one thousand nine hundred eighteen the big artillery battle they'll fire one point
seven million shells in the first week and it's famous because oh my gosh think of how many shells that
is. But every First World War major offensive outdoes the earlier ones and in this
one they fire you know becomes a contest like a statistic in the Guinness Book of
World Records but they fire one point one million shells in four hours
and it's conducted like a symphony of death. The Germans had
brought in all of their big I guess you could call the military stars to this
battle. One of them is this artillery conductor
Georg Brooks Miller I think his name is but his nickname is breakthrough
Mueller. He has a whole theory in that he's been perfecting on how to use these artillery
barrages and part of his theory involves the idea that you don't need to
destroy the enemy positions which is what's always been done. All you need to do is neutralize
them. All you need to do with that machine gun nest to stop him from shooting long enough so that the infantry
doesn't get killed on the way to taking out the machine gun nest themselves.
01:47:27
So he uses a lot more gas first of all and he has a whole
order that all this comes in I mean first he shoots the gas that doesn't kill you but it's like tear
gas it makes you gag involvement and it makes you rip off your gas masks. But
then he hits you with the phosgene gas that if you're not wearing your gas mask kills you
can also use mustard gas which is long lasting So it's like spraying the
ant spray that will still kill the answer A week later even though it's dried up the mustard
gas a shot of all these important crossroads in areas and heights an observation
post so that either you get out or you're so covered up in gas
masks and everything you can hardly function and the germs just want you to be impeded. Right you just
have to be not functioning long enough for the waves of German soldiers to be free and
clear to overrun your positions.
01:48:19
It also has the added benefit of not making the terrain in front of your advancing
troops look like the cratered surface of the moon.
Large shell craters have become a barrier all its own in previous battles in this one the
German artillery was going to minimize that keep the way open for a quick and
shocking advance the artillery opens fire on March twenty
first. You know it's strange to say that they're surprised because everyone knew this was
coming but the surprise is in the intensity in the locations and whatnot. The
Kaiser. The Emperor of Germany and the face of the German military Hinde and
Berger reportedly at the battle and the Kaiser was known to have this wooden
tower that sort of like a ranger station erected so you could try to see a
battle which is something that in the nineteenth century would have been that strange people came out with picnic
baskets in the first major battle of the U.S. Civil War to watch and
the Kaiser and Berg were supposedly at this battle to watch it unfold
. Winston Churchill was also there when the cannonade opened up and you get this feeling
that he's a zealot like figure that he's just not going to miss any big historical event if he can
avoid that. He was at this battle too and he is one of the original and much quoted
accounts of what it was like he said you know I was walking around everyone was waiting for something to happen and he woke up
from his sleep somewhere in the four o'clock hour and it was relatively silent and then
boom.
01:49:48
Quote.
01:49:49
Suddenly after what seemed about a half an hour the silence was broken by six or
seven very loud and very heavy explosions several miles away. I thought they were our
twelve inch guns but they were probably mines and then exactly as a
pianist runs his hand across the keyboard from treble to base their rows in less
than one minute.
01:50:09
The most tremendous cannonade I shall ever hear and quote
he said that quote the weight and intensity of the bombardment surpassed anything which
anyone had ever known before and to quote Ernst Junger the
German soldier we talked about sometimes in the stories also at this battle
. He's on the opposite side of the shelling rights and not even the side that's being shelled and
he says that it made every other event he'd been to in this war look like a tea
party and he was at many of the big battles right. A Tea Party
. He said that the shelling seemed to suspend the laws of
nature. He said you know you couldn't light a match or anything because the shock waves
even as far away as the German troops were would blow it right out. He says that
if you looked over the enemy lines all you saw is rolling clouds of flame
and it looked like the way the desert looks when you look in the distance and the heat is shimmering and makes
you almost see mirages he said but that's what it looks like you know on the side of the people being
shelled. The effect on the British troops
is almost like being punch drunk.
01:51:20
It's a private in the first West Yorkshire Regiment who was there I explained it this way
quote Nobody could stand more than three hours of sustained shelling before they started
feeling sleepy and numb you're hammered after three hours and you're there for the picking
when he comes over. It's a bit like being under an anaesthetic. You can't put a lot of
resistance up on the other fronts I'd been on there'd been so much of our resistance that
whenever Jerry opened up our artillery opened up and quieted him down but there was
no retaliation this time he had a free do with us.
01:51:53
End quote.
01:51:55
I should point out that the Germans called the British Tommy and the British called the
Germans.
01:52:00
Jerry off and so that's how that happens. The historian Alexander
Watson quote a German battalion Dr Ernst
Bitterman who recorded that men reacted to shelling quote for the most part
with a feeling of enormous sleepiness and quote and then said that you get
both emotional and physical changes in men who are being shelled. So think
about the people on the receiving end of what's about to be a ground attack after they've
experienced something that does this to them. Whitman says quote The eyes
pop out of their sockets. The expression becomes fixed in glassy the
facial skin loses all of its red color.
01:52:41
The skin becomes yellow. The cheek bones protrude the lips are shut tight
and sticky spittle tacks up the tongue to the roof of the mouth the heart works in short
convulsive beats breathing becomes slower from time to time a cold
shudder runs through the body and the teeth chatter.
01:52:58
Every spoken word just felt as agony. End quote
. Watson goes to point out that surveys have shown that the troops were particularly
scared of artillery and unsettled by it.
01:53:12
He writes quote.
01:53:14
Not only did artillery cause more casualties than any other weapon on the western front but those
injuries that it did inflict were often grievous contemporary psychiatrist
agreed that man's primary fear was not death but mutilation wounds
to the stomach jaw and eyes were particularly dreaded it is thus significant that
artillery fire was more likely than any other weapon to cause head wounds. Moreover
shells were terrifying because his lieutenants and leg are somewhat coyly observed. They
could quote make such a mess of one end quote. Watson continues quote
the weapon in this aerated maimed and disfigured body parts could be scattered over a
wide distances and legs and arms blown into trees by the force of explosions
. Such sites were obviously extremely disturbing especially when the victims were friends or
comrades. As Lieutenant yok so remarked quote When you see the shell fall into the
midst of six men and packed three of them away in a sand bag one wonders whether
anything matters.
01:54:14
End quote.
01:54:17
This is when you realize though that these people are veterans in this combat and that
this makes a huge difference. These people have been hardened to their
current state by degrees. I seen many horrible
things in the past and living through situations that while they might not be as
extreme as what they're about to go through are smaller versions on the way there it's
like lifting a smaller amount of weight on your way up to lifting a greater amount of weight it's not like
taking a weak civilian like yours truly and throwing him into the Kaiser
schlock tomorrow and then expecting him to endure under shell fire
. And while there are certainly people that fell apart under shell fire
broke and ran under shell fire lost their minds. You know it's a shell shock I mean a lot of those kinds of things
the the amazing story here and I think this is what has amazed people throughout history since it
happened is that the vast vast vast majority of people stayed there in
those positions and took it having the
logical part of their brain and self control somehow overriding their
animal instincts that must have been screaming at them to simply flee
.
01:55:29
But as I said these people had been hardened by what they'd seen
before.
01:55:36
You know the very day before March twenty first before this artillery barrage happens.
01:55:41
Ernst Junger is in a shell hole in
a relatively safe part of the line.
01:55:49
He and an officer are in one and a whole bunch of men are in the big shell hole next to his it's
like an amphitheater he says and they're sort of having a meeting everybody stacked their weapons and it's
calm and they're shell fire going on and all of a sudden sort of a random stray shell falls
into that big crater that's built like an amphitheater that had one hundred men in it
.
01:56:10
It's maybe the most gruesome upsetting part of youngers gruesome
and upsetting story. And he says after the explosion it's so freaked him out and this
is Ernst Junger you know one of the one of the veterans veterans he goes tearing off running in a
sort of a panic before eventually he'll stop himself and realizes he should go back and try to help some of those
men.
01:56:32
But then that same Armstrong or you know that next morning whatever it is twelve
fifteen hours afterwards is going to be sitting in his jumping off point. Synchronizing
his watch watching this artillery drop on the British and getting ready to go over the top an attack
.
01:56:47
What's amazing is when he does so he does so in an
almost giddy fashion. It's hard to describe the
mood that these soldiers going over the top. You know suggest during this battle I mean Ernst Junger is not
necessarily representative but he says everybody else was sort of kind of on the edge of
sanity almost bizarre but at the same time he says that they would talk to each
other and it would only come out in little fragments of sentences and he said anybody who was observing us would think we were
incredibly happy.
01:57:19
But at the same time he's talking about this rage that's coming over him and he squeezes his eyes and the tears are
coming out and he's ready to hurt somebody.
01:57:27
And what's funny when you read it is it kind of reminds you
something that maybe in the back of your head you knew already but I think when we look at these
modern soldiers coming from nice backgrounds like ourselves and you know well trained and
educated in all these kinds of things we somehow assume that the
very tendencies that we will freely admit that ancient peoples had invite Kings had and all
these kinds of people that could get up into a bizerk wage you know and kill a victim and stand up and
celebrate in it and enjoy being a warrior that somehow because we had aircraft
artillery machine guns and a nice guy I mean that it's all gone.
01:58:06
And in some people it is but in some people it's not. And Ernst
Junger goes looking for someone to kill when he jumps out of these jumping off
points after the artillery barrage lifts in the German army attacks on March twenty first
the big sweep and operation Michael.
01:58:25
It's fog where this will be one of the things that Luton north will get lucky with a couple of times in his
multiplex combination fog is not great for the German attackers it makes it difficult
but it's a nightmare for the defenders. The Germans are using what are sometimes called
infiltration tactics and if it's foggy infiltration tactics are a lot more
effective. The British have set up all these defense zones with crossing machinegun fire and all these things were
all these all these different defense readouts can help each other. But because of the fog they can't see
anything.
01:58:57
And then all of a sudden the Germans are jumping into the trenches
where the British soldiers are you know catching them totally off guard
.
01:59:07
Historian Peter Hart quotes Captain Charles Miller who was on the line as the Germans
approached for their initial attack you know before nine A.M. on the morning of the twenty first through the
fog and says quote The first attackers were into the trenches long before the mist
lifted.
01:59:22
I was so occupied with the flanks that I barely saw them before they appeared out of the mist and leapt
down into the trench. In a moment we were all mixed up in hand to hand fighting. I had
two men coming at me with their bayonets. One of them I think I shot with my revolver while
a sergeant standing just behind me shot the other at point blank range with his rifle
barrel over my shoulder but almost at the same second a German stick by him came
whistling into the trench from the parapet right into the bunch of us and killed or wounded
practically the whole lot of us English and German alike whether it was actually this bomb
or a bayonet stab they gave me the wound in my neck I don't know. It might have been either.
For a moment we were clear but. There was a nasty little shambles around us Sergeant add
cock who had just saved my life having his head blown off. I felt awfully weak and
discovered that a river of blood was flowing from my neck. I tried to bandage it but the bandage
wouldn't hold. Before they attacked us again they brought up some trench mortars and knock
seven bells out of us then swarmed into the trench. By that time there were only a
handful of us left on our feet and all I suppose wounded. I got another wound from a stick
bomb which put a bit of metal into my thigh before I collapsed. I tried to give the
surrender signal and hoped I succeeded thereby in saving a few lives.
02:00:39
We had done our best end quote and one of the things
that happens with these modern battles is that they really turn into
hundreds of smaller encounters that when you add them up together equaled this big thing
going on over forty miles.
02:00:55
But when you read the accounts of these battles they all sound like you know me and ten guys
took that machine gun nest one hundred yards away and it took us three hours and we lost two men and we
killed everybody in the machine gun nest and then we continued to move on.
02:01:08
That's an encounter in this war right. So every time you read one it sounds like an isolated little
incident in fact. If younger when he comes upon the first enemy soldier he
sees on March twenty first. It's this private encounter this
moment where young errors in this almost bizerk mood that he just talked about
gayety they've been drinking alcohol their punch drunk from all the artillery I mean it's just a sensory
overload. And he sees this enemy and he says quote
.
02:01:38
Then I saw my first enemy a figurine brown uniform. Wounded
apparently crouched twenty paces away in the middle of the battered path with his
hands propped on the ground. I turned a corner and we caught sight of each other. I saw
him jump as I approached and stare at me with gaping eyes while I with my face
behind my pistol stalked up to him slowly and coldly. A bloody scene with
no witnesses was about to happen. It was a relief to me finally to have the photo
in front of me and within reach I set the mouth of the pistol at the man's temple. He was
too frightened to move while my other fist grabbed hold of his tunic feeling medals and
badges of rank and Officer. He must have held some command post in these trenches
with a plaintive sound. He reached into his pocket not to pull out a weapon but a
photograph which he held up to me. I saw him on it surrounded by numerous
family all standing on a terrace. It was a plea from another world.
Later I thought it was blind chance that I let him go and plunged onward. That one man of
all often appeared in my dreams I hope that meant he got to see his homeland again
.
02:02:46
End quote.
02:02:49
So even in the blind rage of the bizerk a
moment that younger had described earlier he was able to pull himself from the
brink and answer that plea from another world and let that soldier live
.
02:03:04
Mercy could be a dangerous commodity on a battlefield like this. It was very
normal for soldiers going past something like a bunker that might have enemy troops in it
to just simply throw grenades down the stairs into the bunker and not worry about it and just keep
on moving. There were also killings in hot blood
a lot of the time it was normal for example if troops kept firing at
you all the way up till you were almost on top of them and then tried to surrender Good luck with that
. There was killing in cold blood too on all sides. But by and large when
they could both sides like to take prisoners. None of these
armies surrendered in large numbers that was quite unusual but a mark of what a
great first day operation Michael has is that it sees a
huge amount of British troops surrendering in numbers that you never see twenty one thousand of them on
the first day.
02:04:00
Seventeen thousand of these people had been casualties due to that for our
initial bombardment. So you can see how their nerves are shot in some
cases that they're infected by all those physical
symptoms that we quoted earlier and that they're just
stunned.
02:04:21
Historian John Keegan tells a story of a British machine gunner who must have been pretty representative of
this day it was mulling down German soldiers like Ernst Junger as they approach his
machine gun position and Keegan quotes the soldier as saying
quote I thought we'd stop them when I felt a bump in the back.
02:04:40
I turned around and it was a German officer with a revolver in my back. Come
along Tommy you've done enough. I turned round and then said thank you very
much sir. I know what I would have done if I'd been held up by a machine gunner and had
that revolver in my hand. I'd have finished him off. He musta been a real gentleman. It
was twenty past ten and I know to the minute because I looked at my watch and
court.
02:05:07
And if you actually had to surrender the Germans you know while this offensive was going on it could
be a very near run thing.
02:05:15
British private Alfre grow she was captured on the twenty second of March so the next day
with a boy as he describes in but a soldier none the less he was badly hit in the
head and he's bleeding.
02:05:27
And Roche writes quote The area we cross is swept by rifle and machine
gun fire. We crawl in escape it. The boy is in pain and crying.
Presently he jumps up. Here they come he cries. I pull him down. Who I
ask.
02:05:42
JERRY He said I looked cautiously up there he is right enough the first wave
almost on top of us and caught grocer's account continues to quote
leave it to me boy. We're done. We're prisoners now do whatever I tell you. I wait
a second and then up I say and take your helmet off. We do so. The
German in front of me says raises his rifle and takes aim. I mutter to
myself I hope to God he won't pull that trigger for ten seconds we remain so
. Then he lowers his rifle and says What I take to be wounded. I
nod and say Yes yes. He beckons and we approach. We still have our equipment
on and the Germans other shouts pointing to it. Slip it off I cry to the boy doing it
myself. The German has spared us would we have spared him under the circumstances
. God knows. Perhaps not.
02:06:33
End quote.
02:06:36
But that same sort of gallantry you see on the German side in cases like this is present on the French
side and the British side and the Russian side I mean this is this is a human
element coming forth in the midst of all this evil and of course just as something to
juxtaposition the whole thing. You see the killing of prisoners by all
sides as well.
02:06:56
Ian passing him calls March twenty first the day of the opening of the
Michael offensive the first punch in the multipoint combination right of the Germans are going to throw one of
the most dramatic days of the whole war.
02:07:10
And he says quote In the event and despite numerous tales of heroic
last stands and daring do the twenty first of March was a disastrous day for
Hague's B.E.F. meaning the British forces. It was the bloodiest day of the First World
War there were over seventy eight thousand casualties almost forty
thousand on each side. Though the storm troops had advanced in one or two places up to ten
miles by the end of the day in the south. Overall twenty first of March was a day of great
sacrifice and confusion and court.
02:07:43
Seventy eight thousand casualties in one day. That's your new world
record right there. The horrible battle of Waterloo one hundred years
previously had seen maybe sixty thousand casualties on the
first day. But there was no second day at the Battle of Waterloo.
Operation Michael led the seventy eight thousand casualties on the first day of the
first punch of a multi-page combination that would go on for months
. Randall Gray who wrote a piece on the Kaiser slot said
it was quote the greatest and most intense battle ever fought by the British
Army. End quote.
02:08:23
He also said quote It's certainly represented the most awful
non-nuclear but chemical fighting ordeal undergone by twentieth
Century soldiers with the possible exception of some nine hundred forty one thousand nine hundred forty five
Eastern Front battles and the Iran Iraq war.
02:08:40
End quote.
02:08:43
I always try to remind myself that what these soldiers went
through with these battles scarred them forever
and you know there's a difference we should understand that there are a lot of people who go to war who never see any
combat who who deal with paperwork or logistics or supply and they're all very important but the
people who come home after this war and change the
psyche of the world the writers the thinkers just just the everyday
people whose attitudes have been shocked into a different paradigm by what they
experience in this combat go through things that have to haunt them
. I was particularly moved in one of these Kaiserslautern battles a German
soldier under artillery barrage talks about what happened to him. And
when you think about him having to live with this memory the rest of his life and how it altered him on a personal
level and then imagine millions of people who had seen equally
scarring events in their lives who went on to help create this post-war world and you can
see how this war dug deeply into the psyche of twentieth century
civilization gouged out a permanent home.
02:09:54
This soldiers under French artillery fire in one of these battles and he writes quote
French shells began to hit to the right and left of us leaving human forms writhing in
agony. Our advance came to a stop and after hesitating a few minutes we drew
back while the artillery fire followed us ripping large gashes in our
formation.
02:10:15
Soon the French drum firing Gulf to us the air was filled with gas and flying
pieces of steel. We automatically mounted the machine gun for action and then like
animals we burrowed into the earth as if trying to find protection deep in its bosom.
Something struck my back or I carried my gas mask but I did not pay attention to it. A
steel splinter broke the handle of my spade and another knocked the remains out of my
hand. I kept digging with my bare hands ducking my head every time a shell exploded
nearby. A boy to my side was hit in the arm and cried out for help. I
crawled over to him ripped the sleeves of his coat in shirt open and started to
bind the bleeding part. The gas was now so thick that I could hardly discern what I was doing.
My eyes began to water and I felt as if I would choke. I reached for my gas mask pulling it out
of its container and then noticed to my horror that a splinter had gone through it leaving a
large hole. If I had seen death thousands of times I stared it in the
face but never experienced the fear I felt then immediately I reverted to the
primitive I felt like an animal cornered by hunters with the instinct of
self-preservation uppermost my eyes fell on the boy whose arm I had bandage.
Somehow he'd managed to put the gas mask on his face with his one good arm. I leapt
at him and in the next moment had ripped the gas mask from his face with a feeble gesture he tried
to wrench it from my grasp then fell back exhausted.
02:11:39
The last thing I saw before putting on the mask were his pleading eyes and quote
that's related in Peter Hart's wonderful book The Great War in such a way of finding those
incidents that when you read about them they they boggle your mind and then you can go
forget about them. But imagine the guy who has to live without the rest of his life.
Those kinds of moments that the extremes of human experience where these
moral choices are thrust in your face like the Ernst Junger do I shoot this guy before he
shows me the picture is family. It's kind of what makes these wars fascinating is how
do people behave when you know they are under this kind of
intense pressure and strange extreme circumstances. This is what's happening at the
ground level at the big picture level. This last card
played by the Germans here has been shockingly effective.
The British fifth Army which let's be honest was in no position to be taking on a German
force like this at the moment they had been recovering from a previous battle they were holding too
large a part of the front. They had infrastructure and defenses that needed some work
and then they get hit with this force in this in this violence and it
immediately shoves them backwards.
02:12:58
The Germans penetrate the first line of their defenses in an hour or two. They're into the second
line of their defenses by lunch time. This causes the
first of several of what I call soil your underpants moments that
are part of the Kaiser schlock to the mole type punch combination of the wooden
doors. By the second day of the battle
historian hold your herbing says that the fighting is intense it's hand to hand it's
close combat with grenades and it's brutal.
02:13:32
And he writes quote After today's Luden Dorce mobile and
attack divisions had decimated Gough's fifth Army and driven the British almost
forty miles behind the Somme and the Croisette canal. Hague had lost two hundred
thousand killed and wounded ninety thousand prisoners of war and thirteen hundred
guns. Most importantly his defenses had been ruptured a fifty mile gap
driven through his lines open field lay ahead of the Germans.
02:14:00
End quote. This initial advance has
morale skyrocketing amongst the Kaiser and some around him
. Hold your sins quote.
02:14:13
We will have the second rushed Congratulations to the troops and admonish them to push
on. This is the Kaiser talking now. Quote much has been accomplished. Much
more still remains to be conquered. End quote curving continues quote
The Kaiser ordered schools closed in Germany to mark the victory in quotes
. He presented him Timberg with the iron cross with golden rays
last given to prints blue sure for ridding Prussia of Napoleon and Wilhelm the second
he informed his entourage over champagne that quote If an English delegation
came to sue for peace it must meal before the German standard for it was a question
here of a victory of the monarchy over democracy and quote
Luden door for sure it is Kaiser that the British army had been defeated.
02:15:01
End quote.
02:15:03
But many in the upper echelons of Germany's military were much more sober
about what was happening here and realize that at the pace they were getting chewed up
it was going to be a problem. The question is who was going to break
first this is like this boxing match which we've compared this
entire war to throughout this entire series we have two exhausted fighters here in the German High Command is
kind of thinking you know we really don't have that much left. I mean some of the German High Command are
countering with Yeah but neither do they. The fifth
Army will be forced to pull back when they pull back the army next to
them has to pull back a third Army otherwise they'll lose contact with each other
.
02:15:47
The problem is that both these armies are attached to a French army and
this is the first crisis that erupts. There is a breach
about to open up between the British and the French armies splitting those armies would be huge
.
02:16:02
This brings us to what the heck is Luton north trying to do right what is
planned here in the skies are shocked. Well it's one of the big controversies of the
war.
02:16:13
Theoretically he wants to punch a hole in the line surround the British
push the British up like a bunch of falling dominoes all the way back up to the English Channel
thereby changing the entire complection of the war. But he's flexible.
He has the saying that has often been quoted afterwards because this is one of the things Luden girl gets the most critiqued
about where he says in terms of the strategy and tactics for this big
multipoint combination quote We will punch a hole and then we will see. We did
it that way in Russia and court and he in Hindi did kind of do that
when they were commanding the eastern front. They go in there they'd punch a hole they'd roll up a Russian army do a
bazillion casualties and you do that long enough and eventually a rickety Russian
state falls apart but this is France and Britain where you really sort of
gambling that you're going to open up this hole and they're just going to fall apart. Well loot indoors
attitude is that I'm not going to fall for the mistakes of my predecessors. Those people
who you know have this one place they want to attack and they run into a brick wall and they just keep throwing more troops
into the meat grinder in front of the brick wall we're not going to do that when we break through somewhere. We're going to reinforce
success. And this is supposed to be part of the latest German ideas about the war. But what
happens if the breakthrough comes at a spot where there's not that much of a war
winning quality you know goals anywhere nearby.
Because the bulge. Some even call it a breakthrough that the Germans have against the
British fifth Army happens at a place where there is not anything close by
that's going to win you the war. All those places have been you know extra specially
defended by the best troops and the best defense is the reason that the Germans breakthrough here is because
there wasn't some very important object nearby. But the Germans are moving so
far that eventually they run into one place where the roads and railways
all come together a French city name. Yeah. And it's at this point
that something that's been an issue for the entire war comes to
an almost fatal head and that is the fact that there is
no coordinated Allied leadership at all because at this
point Douglas Haig the British military commander on the scene would like help from the French in
this crisis situation please send me troops and historians have argued about whether or not they did
some historians nowadays say they not only did they did it before they were even asked and they did it in
larger numbers.
02:18:42
They were British historians and I've always said the French were very stingy with extra troops and put Hague in a
situation where the worst possible thing could happen I mean a soil your underpants moment
indeed. But Hague was asking for troops from a guy named
Bhutan who had his own worries he was worried he got an intelligence that the Germans had another fist
that was poised to attack near Paris and as far as Batam was concerned that was his number one
concern. There's a meeting on March twenty sixth and some historians have
described Hague's mood at this point as near panic
as he runs up against this brick wall where he's not getting the kind of help he feels like he needs and he's
in a crisis situation.
02:19:23
Eric John Breaux says quote gaps also opened between the British and the French
across the river sending Hague into near panic as he ordered trenches
dug to protect the Channel ports shifted six divisions from his Northern armies including
three from the front line and implored to ten to rush twenty divisions. Now
he's quoting the head of the general staff the British general staff for Henry Wilson quote Haig is
cowed said Wilson on March twenty fifth. Quote he said that unless the whole of the French
army came up we were beaten and it would be better to make peace on any terms we could
.
02:19:57
End quote.
02:19:59
The seriousness of the situation finally leads the Allied entente
powers to disregard questions of sovereignty and jealous
guarding of rights and privileges and all that and finally decide to
nominate and finally approve somebody whose job it's going to be not so much to
be the boss but to be the guy that coordinates and this honor goes to the French
military leader Ferdinand Foshan we had talked about him in an earlier episode a
very aggressive energetic brave
and one of the first things he'll do is issue an order that says that there will be no
retreat from this important French city that loon who is going to go after
now the people have to die where they stand basically not one step
back and he will dole out the reinforcements as he sees
fit but he's going to be very stingy and the generals like Haig will think that he's
stingy.
02:20:59
Lloyd George the British prime minister writes in his memoirs of that that thought he was being a gambler and
that's what Generals often have to be. How often have we said alluding to if the gambler but what Foshee is
gambling on is that he can be stingy with these reserves and that these
generals can manage without them or will manage without what they really want.
I mean hey exam said he can't get twenty divisions twenty divisions is a huge force. No wonder you can't get
twenty divisions far she's trying to safeguard and stockpile
a reserve force people that could just stay back stay in good health and ready to go
chomping at the bit and then unleash a counterattack when the German offensive is
like the wave that washes up on the beach and loses its momentum right before it
you know sinks back into the surf that's when you want to launch a counter-offensive with fresh troops when the enemy is
exhausted.
02:21:49
What Fosh sees in this multi-part inch combination of Luden
doors is an opportunity to win the war. Let the Germans punch themselves out here
and then take it to one with a fresh force once they're exhausted. But that fresh force can only be billed by
being stingy with reserves when people like Hagar worried that he's about to be pushed into the sea and the
French and the British are about to lose contact in the you know middle middle part of this front.
02:22:15
There is desperate you know little I mean heroic when you talk about some of the fighting of
this battle.
02:22:20
It's the kind of thing where you know you have the last four guys with the gun overrun fighting to the last
man to you know give the rest of the army you know another hour of safety while they you know move back
to reserve positions I mean it's really frantic heroic stuff and the Germans are striving
they know this is the war winning or war losing moment and they're giving it their all and
the casualties are outrageous. A lot of people talk about this time
period as the end of trench warfare and the beginning of open warfare again which hasn't
existed on the western front since the war started I mean you had like six months of it and the casualties were
terrible and then everything you know went down underground and into the trenches because it was the only
way to stay alive with all that lead flying up above you know ground
level.
02:23:05
And now it had reverted to open warfare again the troops seemed happy to be
moving. But this is also much more dangerous because those trenches were there for a reason they
protected you from the kind of casualties that you're starting to see right here at Kaiser schlock with the
resumption of open warfare again comes the kind of casualties that we hadn't seen for a
while.
02:23:26
Something happens on March twenty third that it's hard to put it in a
proper context.
02:23:32
What happens is people in Paris start seeing and hearing
explosions out of nowhere decent size explosions too
.
02:23:43
And in an interesting sort of twist the explosion comes with no sound
of any shell or anything there's just nothing and then boom you know something goes up in smoke
and it's puzzling for a while the people in Paris can't figure out what's going on in there or you know there are books that talk about
this where people will be in cafes speculating on what's causing the explosions and you know
aircraft is what everybody was thinking but the skies were clear and there were no aircraft. And then one of
the theories floated by some of these people in cafes that were quoted was that the Germans had somehow
smuggled an artillery piece you know secretly hiding it in some forest or something within
range of Paris because it was so obviously an artillery piece or a bomb. Finally
what the French will figure out is that they are being shelled.
02:24:28
From a cannon firing from the German side of the line. But the
German side of the line is way farther than the range of any other gun that anyone's ever
heard of. And it turns out that Paris is not being shelled by
one gun but probably multiple guns but they're called the Paris Gun
and they're being shelled from a distance of seventy five miles.
The gun can reportedly shoot eighty one miles and to give you an idea of how long
that is one of the longer range guns you will ever run into where the sixteen inch
guns on the American Iowa class battleships. And they can
shoot if I recall correctly between twenty five and thirty miles
. So you're talking about a gun that shoots twice as far. Easily
. It's got a barrel that is one hundred feet long.
02:25:22
They have to have a special crane like device that that sits over the
gun and holds the barrel up and keeps it from drooping.
This show that it shoots I am told is the first thing that
humans ever launched into the stratosphere and the
distances were so long that the Gunners had to reportedly account for the
rotation of the earth in their calculations.
02:25:50
But their calculations couldn't be that targeted I mean these people could only shoot at cities
and that accounts for why the shells sort of landed randomly. The worst occasion
is a much talked about still incident during a holiday when people
were in church and one of the shells came crashing through the roof and exploded in the church and killed like eighty
or ninety people it was awful.
02:26:14
But over the course of the conflict it would only dish out a little more than eight
hundred casualties in less than three hundred deaths which you know isn't wonderful. But if you
have a giant artillery piece shelling your city I think you would assume worse after a
while. But some historians say this is all part of a of a concerted effort that what the
Germans are trying to do with their army is shock the allies into a pro
German peace and shelling Paris as a way of of working
the other flank sort of on that I'm pushing you British armies
back I'm shelling Paris and believe me it certainly makes clear to the French the stakes involved
here.
02:26:53
The Germans are close enough to be shelling Paris.
02:26:57
Now the key to this battle is going to be how the generals
utilize the reserves that they have not to get too technical but. But in this level of warfare
when troops are fighting each other in modern combat they're wearing each other down and whittling
away their strength. And so generals have at their disposal troops that they're
holding back and where they decide to commit those troops as part of the
art of generalship it's part of what wins or loses battles and it's part of what the generals are so
concerned about when they launch these offensives at least half the offensives half the punches Luden
Dorf will throw in Keizer schlock are nothing but efforts to
divert reserves from where he really wants to punch
but didn't do it decides to do is to throw you know some of these vital and
limited reserves which are all these wonderful stormtroopers these
Ernst Junger says they're all kind of young long haired sort of wild men as opposed to the sort of
buzz cut Germans. It's interesting to talk about stormtrooper culture I had understood them to be
you know members of the of the best and brightest simply pulled out but younger makes them sound like some
sort of ultra cool set of long haired German Viking
youngsters or something. Nonetheless you don't have a ton of them. So where are you going to
use in Luton to have decides to throw them into where the British Army the fifth Army in the Third Army where they're
bulging back like forty miles and see if you can smash through to this important railway
junction.
02:28:24
But he runs into the same problems that the British and the French could have warned him
about that these first world war armies run into when they try to
launch offenses and continue them day after day after day. They simply break down
and they break down on multiple levels. First of all the logistical and supply
problems are immense and they are immense for the armies that still have a lot of good
stuff like the British and the French to the Germans who are down to like you know horses that
are underfed and not even enough of them to try to move supply up. These
battles are huge challenges. At one point some of the really
important German armies in sort of ironic end up conquering and pushing
into the territory that they had deliberately destroyed in a scorched
earth policy to hamper their opponents and now they had to try to operate
in the German army right next door to the army that moved through the scorched earth territory ended up going through the
old Somme battlefield with all its craters and barbed wire and you know the graveyards
of the dead and all this I mean.
02:29:29
So both these armies were kind of in bad terrain now they were attacking and more and more you know
the allies are resisting heroically and the supply is
huge the German army is starving in some cases.
02:29:44
And you know when you read like the Memoirs of a loon or if you'll say something like well supply didn't keep up or some
little comment like that as a reason why you know these battles bogged down. But when you
actually read accounts of what these troops who are desperately trying to get the the
guns and the bullets but more importantly even the food to these people who
are at what they call the tip of the spear or the head of the snake the combat troops are actually
fighting. They are being shelled and shot at while they they try to
overcome supply difficulties that once you hear them you sit there
and go wow it's a miracle they got as far as they did. Historian Alexander
Watson has a reminiscence by one of these German
supply troops who realizes that winning or losing the war requires that
they get their stuff up to the front but listen to what they have to contend with and then
magnify this across an entire forty or fifty mile
front as they try to move forward and continue to keep this momentum as the
supply lines get stretched longer.
02:30:49
And the German says quote.
02:30:53
I have the feeling that we've been marching in the wrong direction. We ask on several occasions but don't
receive any useful information. And in the meantime Tommy their pet name for the British
recall begins to shoot and not at all badly. That's right on the heading
come upon two recently shot up carts and two dead horses through a miracle the
driver remains unhurt. They warn us that we should not drive past for in
front it's hell. But what can you do there for four words. Now
however the way begins to get bad. Thick mud makes forward progress difficult
and soon we have a supply column stuck fast in front of us. A Saxon mobile
bridging unit cannot go any further. It approaches us and gets stuck. We
therefore harness the horses push make room unload the bridging unit
stuff etc all in the deepest darkness and with the least possible noise. In
addition the shells crash around but one no longer worries about them.
After much effort the wagons are got back on the road and we think. Now the comrade in his
column who missed their way can go on but no just then a
narrow gauge train comes rushing along. Irresponsible chaps have thrown
munitions on the rails. One jolt in the train has derailed on exactly
that street along which we have to pass. What to do with unspeakable
effort. The munitions which are jammed at the front are removed the Darrelle the carriage is
lifted by means of a winch and then the route is free. Now the vehicles can get through
and they start up again. We then come to the worst part of the road thick clay
allows us to go forward only gradually. At every moment a wagon and its driver
get stuck. Reserve teams are sent forward. Bridges over streams are
especially difficult to cross and on top of that were under heavy fire.
02:32:43
End quote.
02:32:46
But the fact that the troops aren't getting supplies becomes part of the reason why they can't
continue to push on at the pace that the German High Command wants them to push on the pace that they're going to
have to push on if they want to achieve these objectives.
Princess Evelyn blue sure the English wife of the German nobleman who quoted a few times
before has a story about letters that their family was
receiving from family members who were in these battles.
02:33:14
And when you read them you hear about an army that is literally
starving and exhausted.
02:33:22
She writes quote they say that no words can describe the
horrors of what they've been through. They write that they're almost dying of starvation.
They say they advance so rapidly that no provisions could reach them and their division was five
days and nights fighting incessantly without food or even sleep at all. And
those of their companies who were not killed or wounded died of exhaustion. And it is only by
a miracle that they themselves are left to tell the tale. Their letter ends with the significant
words quote send us some food somehow as quickly as you can or we
also shall die.
02:33:59
End quote.
02:34:00
She then comments about the situation in this little village where she lives quote the
peasants and village people receive the news that sometimes one sometimes even two of their
sons have been killed on the same day.
02:34:12
It has been a wholesale slaughter of late and quote Given
that situation. It's not hard to understand
how once these troops began to push forward
into Allied controlled area and see the
supply dumps and the stores and all these things that the allied
troops have it's funny if you read their accounts they think they were suffering right. I mean I
remember reading one where the guy said a British soldier saying you know we're eating dog biscuits we're practically
starving.
02:34:46
But these Germans come across with these British forces have and they
just stop in some cases. G.J. Meyer quotes a
famous piece about a soldier
investigating why the advance wasn't moving forward.
02:35:04
A German captain writing about events on March twenty sixth saying quote
Today the advance of our infantry stop near Al Baer nobody could understand why
our airman had reported no enemy between al Baer and I'm yeah the enemy's guns were only
firing now and again on the very edge of affairs our way seemed entirely clear
. I jumped into a car with orders to find out what was causing the stoppage at the front. As soon
as I got near the town I began to see curious sights strange figures who
looked very little like soldiers and certainly showed no signs of advancing or making
their way back. There were men driving cows before them on the line others
who carried a hand under one arm and a box of note paper under the other men
carrying a bottle of wine under their arm and another one open in their hand. Men who had torn
a silk drawing room curtain off its rod and were. Dragging it to the rear is a useful
piece of loot. Men with writing paper and colored notebooks evidently they'd found
it desirable to sack a stationer's shop men dressed up in comic
disguise. Men with top hats on their heads men staggering men who
could hardly walk when I got into the town the streets were running with wine out of a
cellar came a lieutenant of the second ring division helpless and in despair I
asked him what is going to happen. It was essential for them to get forward immediately he
replied solemnly and emphatically I cannot get my men out of the cellar without
bloodshed and quote.
02:36:36
But in addition to the logistical and supply exhaustion there's another kind of exhaustion that plays into all these
World War One offensives and it's human exhaustion. It's the part where
human beings simply come to the end of their limit. You know when you win you can
fight a battle the way you want to you rotate people out. So after a unit is so
tired they're not useful anymore. You take them out of the line you replace and buy fresh troops but in these battles
and especially on the German side this was very difficult to do and they didn't
. So the same troops are fighting for days and they're dropping where they stand I mean
if you believe the prince's Blue Shield letter they're dying from exhaustion.
But if you think about how being this tired affects your ability to resist and
your willingness to continue onward. I mean we're sitting in the
comfort of our recording studio here overwhelmed by these people's
ability to put up with the shelling and the conditions and the dead bodies and all
that stuff. But that's when you think of them having a full
belly and a good night's sleep imagine it when you haven't slept in days and
you're starving to death. And the second world war some of these armies will
sometimes use things like amphetamines to prolong the amount of time people could
endure before they hit the exhaustion point. I've seen it blamed by some historians
for some of the more infamous massacres. Here are troops that have been up for twelve days straight
using speed. They might not be as rational or as
collected as they might have been twelve days previously.
02:38:16
I'm part of why these exhausted soldiers aren't able to force anything to a conclusion
that they're they're moving forward. They've been successful they've been reinforced but they don't have
any mobility. Throughout all of human history cavalry had sort of played the role
of what they needed now someone they could rush forward and attack retreating or
troops who were at least pulling back really so you know all sorts of chaos in the enemy
rear. The Germans made tanks and they need armored personnel carriers and they
won't have it for another world war. Their opponents do have these
things. They unveiled the tank a year before this time period and they've
become better and are getting continually better at figuring out how to use it.
Initially the German High Command had scoffed at this whole tank idea but they're taking it more and more
seriously as time goes on. They wish they had some tanks now I bet because these
exhausted soldiers are only able to march forward. Historian John terrain
considers this to have been almost criminal that the German High Command
launches these offensives to win the war but don't give the troops any way to exploit their victory
he said quote As the year would show the days of cavalry as an
arm of exploitation on a modern battlefield were over yet feeble as it was
the cavalry was the only exploiting arm that existed for the Germans to launch an offensive
intended to win the war with none at all was not just foolish it was
criminal.
02:39:44
End quote.
02:39:46
And it would allow the enemy to move reserves and help and the French have
unleashed divisions of troops that come to the aid to the resistance
of the allies will stiffen heroically you know in front of this important railway
juncture.
02:40:01
And the Germans would run out of gas essentially it would be like that wave that
lost the momentum at the end of the beach and wound or
five years later writing in his memoirs about what he knows is this important
moment in his history Germany's history world history in that he's been criticised
for a ton.
02:40:22
And here's the way he puts it in his memoirs quote the enemy's
line was now becoming denser and in places they were even attacking themselves
while our armies were no longer strong enough to overcome them on aided the ammunition was not
sufficient and supply became difficult. The repair of roads and railways was taking too
long in spite of all of our preparations.
02:40:44
He then goes on to say it was an established fact that the enemy's resistance was
beyond our strength and court.
02:40:55
On April fifth Luden Dorf calls off operation Michael
. He's inflicted one hundred seventy eight thousand casualties on the
British dam in fifteen days. Seventy seven
thousand on the French. But he suffered between two hundred thirty and
two hundred fifty thousand casualties himself for a man who
launched this whole attack out of a fear that American reinforcements were
going to come and swamp the Germans through sheer numbers. You can't trade lives at this rate
and survive. Lindorff knows that but he's going to
continue to punch because that's his plan. He's hoping to land a clean shot
somewhere. The problem is that there was so much invested
in Michael these offensives that have been planned for months always do the best the troops
morale was always at its highest. The failure was
disheartening and the dead on the German side come
disproportionately from their very best hand-picked troops
. When you decide to you know use most of the
rocket fuel in the very first punch you don't have a ton left for subsequent punches
and at this point Luden door starts getting really pointed not so nice
questions from subordinates about what you think and hear what he going to do
.
02:42:21
Some of Luden door staff is turning against him
. They're openly questioning his decision making in these
situations. At least one of lewd indorse responses to his
rebellious staff members made it into the history books he's supposed to have said and one historian
described it as acidly quote.
02:42:44
What is the purpose of your croaking.
02:42:47
What do you want from me and my now to conclude peace at any price and
quote Bill Von Leeb who will be a
field marshal in the next world war is openly critical of Luton Dorf
and then says that on March thirty first he quote totally lost his
nerves and quote this is sort of the way they described a
nervous breakdown back then and if Luden do if it had won me
here and he may have had another one or he may have had the
first one later there is going to be an increasingly stressful period ahead for Luden Dorff
and he's already showing signs of cracking if he'd had one then that would just put him as the
second German military leader in this war to have a nervous breakdown the
original architect who had to carry out the plan to win the war at the very start of the war Von mult
also lost his nerves. Now you say to yourself Who
cares. Why does it matter.
02:43:48
But if Luton Dorf is still basically the guy making all these decisions on what to do with
all these punches and how to react when opportunities or crises erupt. His state of mind
is key and if it isn't clear how is his decision making going to be.
02:44:05
It gets questioned increasingly as we continue on more the second punch arrives on April ninth
. So right after Michael is called off they launch Georgette.
Each of these punches as I said has its own name. Georgette was supposed to be George but now it's been scaled
back hence Georgette because of the huge losses that the first punch
cost the Germans. Georgette is launched in the north in Flanders against
in a really strong defenses where they've been fighting for years these defences had been weakened
somewhat though because when the Germans were busy throwing their first punch Hagen the British were rushing every unit
that they could spare down to where the fighting was on a bunch of those units had been a pier in Flanders.
A lot of what the North is going to do with these punches as we said. It's to
create diversions to be the equivalent in a boxing match of throwing a punch at someone's body to get
them to pull their hands down opening up their head and into another punch.
This is where Luden Gore really wants to win the war though because up in the north here in Flanders his
goal are the Channel ports these ports right on the other side of the English Channel
from Great Britain that are supplying everything the entire British Army and in fact all of the stuff
that they're bringing in you know to share with the French and everything else. It's a key area
everybody knows it. And when Georgette strikes once again Luden doors got foggy weather
helping him out. And once again he somehow strikes units that are just shouldn't be in the line of
fire they were actually moved to what was thought was a quiet part of the line and then boom you have
another German hurricane bombardment you have still some stormtroopers left who are pursuing through
this fog a poor Portuguese division this is truly becoming a world war
now. It was supposed to be leaving the front that day gets just
disintegrates in front of the artillery fire. A British unit pulls back and you have a very similar
situation to exactly how Michael started this German penetration. Another soil your
underpants moment when Hague once again pleads for you no help from the
French and he gets. But it's sort of stingy in his mind
how much he gets remember far she's squirreling away troops for this counterattack he wants to launch when
the Germans are totally punched out. But he has to gamble that he can be
stingy with troops and not have Hague fold up. No one knows
whether or not that can happen. Hague issues one of his most famous
speeches or proclamations I guess you would say it's called the backs to the wall proclamation and it
is literally one of those stand or die orders to the troops very
famous very stirring rousing when the situation is grim.
02:46:41
Quote many amongst us are now tired to those I would say that
victory will belong to the side which holds out the longest. The French army is moving
rapidly in in great force to our support. There is no other course open to us but to fight
it out. Every position must be held to the last man. Or must be no
retirement with our backs to the wall and believing in the justice of our cause.
Each one of us must fight on to the end the safety of our homes and the freedom of
mankind alike depend upon the conduct of each one of us at this critical moment
and quote none the less again due to ferocious
resistance I mean you have to think of both sides is absolutely straining to the maximum
.
02:47:26
The British and the French are able to hold once again the
logistical supplies and the human exhaustion and the casualty levels you know
destroy the momentum of the German attack again. It's a mirror image
. It's the same thing that the allies have had to face the last
couple years when they tried to launch offensives and then continue to maintain the momentum.
George it gets to within five miles of a key you know
objective and both sides by the way. Oh yeah it's going to be mind
numbing suffer another hundred ten thousand casualties each. It's
hard to get your mind around the numbers I always think you know you figure fifty to sixty thousand people fill up
your average sports stadium so your hundred ten thousand number is you know a
couple of sports stadiums in Georgia by the way is small That's why it's named Georgette. The
big encounters are giving you you know multiple hundreds of thousands of people
on May twenty seventh almost a month later Luden door throws the third
punch and it's a month later because it took that long to you know refit
and reorganize and send replacements and have people in the hospital that didn't
have major wounds get sent back to the front meaning the exhaustion was such that it took a month to
recover so that they could launch another one of these punches and it's called Operation Blue
sure. And within a couple of days the French are discussing abandoning
Paris moving the government to Bordeaux. The
British are panicked that if the French fold up here and it's a
real possibility that they will that the British army will be
trapped on the continent on French soil. They will be
hostages in the minds of some of these people that we're discussing.
Coming up with a plan to get the troops out of France hostages
to a an arm twisting German peace agreement right before the
Americans can come and save Europe with their massive numbers of people
. The British would have had to knuckle under after the French were defeated and their army
. And it's hundreds of thousands or low millions be held by the
Germans for leverage. What we've seen
happen here is a replay of what we saw in both Michael and Georgia where the Germans again have an
initial breakthrough that shocking and unlike
operation Michael where the Germans broke through and there really wasn't any super
fantastic goal that they could strike at this time when they break through. It's near
Paris the French capital. Lindorff
decides to reinforce this attack as in passing and labels him and I think it's a pretty good label for
him. He says he's ever the opportunist never the strategist
. But that can be taken kind of as a complement to Luden Dorf
thinks that the idea of pinning yourself down to one standard recipe or set
of rules or objectives you know decreases flexibility and he makes a move toward Paris and we have
this crisis again another so we'll your underpants moment.
02:50:39
Ferdinand farce provides as many troops as he can without totally destroying his opportunity to have a
counterattack in the near future. The Americans already
untrained get thrown into the mix because of the desperation of the times
they are fighting a small encounter at Chateau Tieri it's called and then they'll fight a
famous battle in American military history called Be the wood
and the Americans when they get into combat for the first time. They fight like the Europeans fought in
one thousand fourteen you know they're not particularly enamored with with European
warfare of what they've seen and what they've you know the French are trying to train them and stuff. They'd rather storm up San
Juan Hill and and simply take these things why are we being so you know
canonizing about and why are we you know just go up and a little dash a little American
aggressiveness and you clear out these trenches and these Germans will be on the run
because of this the Americans are taking one thousand fourteen level
casualties men to suffer ten thousand casualties Abella would
walk into the war.
02:51:44
The initial German reports say that the Americans are almost suicidally brave.
Very good marksman but clumsily led and the American artillery
which is mostly stuff they borrowed from the French they don't have any of their own heavy artillery doesn't know how to
do basic things that the European armies do all the time now like a creeping barrage that sort of level of
cooperation and sophistication isn't yet part of the
American arsenal but it makes it hard to conduct battles the way the Europeans
do. At this point Luden Dore says his biggest fear
about the Americans is that they can go and take over the
quiet parts of the line from the French and British soldiers that are currently there allowing those soldiers to be
moved into positions where they can fight the Germans. But there
are ten thousand Americans a day arriving in France
. There are almost three hundred thousand by this time in the story
and there will be two hundred fifty thousand every month for the
forseeable future as the Emperor and great military leader Napoleon said about
troops. Quantity has a quality all its own and what Luden
door is going to find out is that the Americans make damn good soldiers.
But the Canadians and the Australians do too and several
historians John Keegan among them have started saying that by this point in the war the
Canadian and Australian divisions are the shock armies of the British army
the British had lost a ton of their own units in one thousand nine hundred eighteen at the Somme at this point
. The Canadians and the Australians are healthier bigger stronger
you're still getting sort of the pick of the litter whereas these British formations involve
a lot more people that if you had your druthers she'll be back in civilian
life you know with kids or still finishing up school or whatever it might be
. And the Canadians and Australians are so important at this point in the war that the German
intelligence pays attention to where they are. And I
read somewhere that said that if the German intelligence saw that the Canadians in the Australian divisions were
right by each other they knew that some offensive was going to happen right there. One German
soldier quoted after being captured by the Canadians had been
shocked because he said we thought you were up north. You know they monitored where they
were.
02:54:12
When the Germans captured the Americans what had so impressed them was a combination
of how you know strong and healthy. The Americans were compared to you know the
way that the soldiers that they were either encountering or living with were and also that the
equipment was so nice and pristine and you know they marveled at
the quality of the leather and the belt buckles and all those things I mean because the German army stuff at
this point is well trashed their kit as it would be called is trash the guns and
whatnot are still good but in terms of clothing and whatnot the German Army is looking pretty ragged
. It'll be two incidents that are celebrated in American history that show the
attitude of the Americans as we've always celebrated it. One comes during
a one of these really battles that involve Americans where they're going into action with the French and there's a moment in time where the
French decide to call a tactical retreat because sometimes that's the right move to make you know from the from the
playbook and they advise the American captain and Marine Captain I believe that he should do the
same thing. And he famously says retreat. Hell we only just got here.
And then there's another famous incident that has gone down into American military lore from
these early battles where the Americans do their impetuosity and
suicidal bravery as the German commander might say get themselves in
trouble under fire in tall grass with a machine gun pinning them down and knowing people down
and at a certain point one of their officers an old Marine who had been at all the classic preened
First World War Marine encounters that had recently happened from the Spanish-American War to the
Philippines to Central America and all that kind of stuff is supposed to have stood up started walking
forward firing his weapon from the hip and yelling at all the soldiers that were on their stomachs in the tall grass
. Come on you sons of bitches do you want to live forever.
02:55:58
Once again the ending is a mirror image of the other punches
physical and human exhaustion combined with the logistical and supply nightmares
combined with heroic resistance again I can't emphasize enough
these battles on both sides are fought with the ultimate you know sort of
frenzied striving I can't describe it any other way. But the Germans are
starting to get weaker. As we said they burned their rocket fuel.
02:56:27
They're down to people that they had planned to be the troops that you put
in the trenches that the better troops had already conquered to serve in the rear and just kind of
be the last line of defense and a lot of their best weapons were taken and given to the other troops. They've never been
trained in the new fire and movement the stormtrooper tactics. And yet these are the people now who have to
make the last few of these punches work when the better troops at a higher
state of morale at a better time couldn't make it happen. The fourth
punches thrown in June ninth.
02:56:57
It's called denies a now and this time you don't see that
initial period where the Germans are able to you know make great progress before they're
stopped here they're just stopped. By this time the Kaiser schlock has
cost the German army between half a million and seven hundred fifty thousand
casualties. Remember this punch of theirs
that they were going to throw was about a million two million three hundred
thousand man fist and now its condition is a little
like what the condition of your fist would be if you had been throwing it multiple times
into a hard object. First it gets nicked then it gets sliced up and
starts to bleed and then it starts to break. And
if that wasn't enough there were two other things impacting the ability of the German
army to continue to fight like this one is perhaps the
worst disease in human history certainly top five on anyone's list in terms of
nasty epidemics. It's known to history as the Spanish flu
and it probably killed between fifty
and one hundred million people at a time when the population was less than
two billion. Some five hundred million people will come
down with it. And in June and July right at the time when all these
encounters are taking place a half million German soldiers have it in
addition to an actual contagion. They're dealing in the German
army now with an intellectual one.
02:58:37
The fire that Luden Dorf had started in his next door neighbor's apartment
is now coming home to roost. And as we said it is so hard to figure
out from the memoirs you know how much of these people are actually Bolsheviks. How
much of them are much more moderate socialists and how much of it are just people that have decided that
the war should be over guys like Luden Dorf and Hitler.
02:59:00
They put them all in the same category and one thousand nine hundred eighteen is the
replacements are coming to these German units when they need reinforcements from home
. They are people that have been touched shall
we say by the intellectual contagion let loose
in Russia by the German high command to undermine their willingness to continue the
war and now they are part of these German units.
The author Adam Hochschild writes some stuff on the Americans and then shift
gears towards this intellectual contagion issue that
Luden Dorf is sort of in a car makes a lot of sense beginning to reap.
02:59:43
He writes quote In addition to confronting Americans eager for battle the
German High Command found danger in another quarter the impact of the Russian Revolution
was beginning to ripple through the German army as its divisions of Eastern Front troops were
transported to France and Belgium. The generals discovered that revolutionary
ideas had come with them. Having read German language newspapers distributed by the
Bolsheviks or fraternize with soldiers from the fast dissolving Russian army
many had lost all ardor for combat. Quote our victorious army
on the Eastern Front became rotten with Bolshevism a senior German general told
an American newspaper. After the war. Quote We got to the point where we did not
dare transfer certain of our eastern divisions to the West End quote.
Hochschild continues quote. Soldiers shipped to the western front turned
rowdy firing shots from train windows and from one troop train in Maine
one thousand eight hundred carrying six hundred thirty one men eighty three deserted along the
way cynical troops chalked cattle for Flanders on the side
of the railway cars taking them west and in half a dozen German cities
underground network sprang up to a desert years. Leftist sympathizers
provided men with shelter money forged papers and ration cards and
instructions on the best spots to slip across the border into neutral Holland
and walked a little over a month after
the fourth German punch denies an hour was halted quickly Luden
Dorf throws the fifth punch.
03:01:21
And by the way he's planning on a sixth punch up in Flanders again
where Georgette just failed. But first this fifth punch may be to draw our
reserves away from Flanders and to who knows you know punch a hole and see what
happens. It's known to history as the second battle of the Marne
and the reason why people remember this name so well is because instead of
the Germans breaking through and having this early success at the second battle of the
Marne they get hammered back. They launch a
pincer movement at a couple of French cities and one side of the pincer is immediately stopped the other
side you know goes on for a couple of days slow grinding advance and then it stopped
and then the French military leader the generalist Simone out of
the Allied entente forces Ferdinand Falasha launches
a counterattack. Now historians disagree over whether or not this counterattack counts
as the beginning of the big counterattack that Fox has been saving up for. Some say it does
. Others say that this counterattack is more something designed to
stop this battle and the next counterattack is the beginning of the big push
. Nonetheless within two days of the Second Battle of the Marne
being launched by Luton north the allies are counterattacking and
they're doing it using essentially Second World War tactics.
They hit the Germans in the flank. They had a part of the salient that's
a rear area essentially and the Germans are there trying to cut down some wheat that they've just
advanced into because they're starving. And then with no warning at
all an artillery barrage just starts
and instead of you know hitting various positions all over the place the
shells instantly come together to form one of those creeping
barrages those walls of explosions and then the creeping barrage instantly
starts moving forward like a giant moving
hurricane heading toward German troops
behind this hurricane of shells this wall of explosions
is a giant smokescreen. And charging out of a forest where
they've been hiding are hundreds of light tanks
followed by infantry and with aircraft swooping down conducting
what we call now ground attack missions which is something they did not even
exist three years previously.
03:04:01
These tanks didn't either. Not only are these tanks and you know hundreds of them in one place is
very uncommon. These are a new kind of tank a light tank that even Luden Dorf
has to acknowledge in his memoirs made a big difference because they're fast
.
03:04:17
Well they can move at the speed of a jogging man and wear the heavy tanks which are the size of a
school bus and have fifteen to twenty people on the move at more the speed of a walking
man. Hundreds of the tanks at once make a huge difference as well. And what their
job is is to go take out the things that are so damaging to the
infantry thereby making it safe for the infantry to advance remember what the First World War
did was combine a bunch of new weapon systems together that changed everything
. Two of the most important of them were machine guns and barbed wire
. The first thing these tanks do is crush the barbed wire and go after the machine guns
machine guns can't hurt the tanks. And what they basically do they often don't even use their guns they often
just drive right over the machine gun nest in either crush the people inside or force
them to flee. But this opens up the battlefield for the infantry who are following close
behind. Luden gov also mentions in his memoirs that
the French are using he calls them tanks that hold infantry
and he says this infantry drives up in the tank onto the battlefield. Dismount sets
up a machine gun nest and the tank goes back to pick up more infantry. He's basically describing
armored personnel carriers. These generals who are out this war
have been accused of being an imaginative butchers are
figuring out how to overcome the challenges of early twentieth century
warfare. The Germans on their side have some very forward thinking generals who are
good at this. The allies do to one of them's a Canadian guy another is an Australian general
Korean Monash and they're coming up with the new tactics. The French have generals who are
coming up with the new tactics and together they are overcoming the traditional
things that slow down an office you might call it a form of
proto a blitzkrieg.
03:06:11
AMERICAN SOLDIER L.T.E. makan was at this counterattack and I've been
told that there wouldn't be a preliminary barrage at this wall of steel this moving
wall of steel would just appear instantly and then the infantry would rush in afterwards and
he describes a situation like this quote one instant there was
silence and then the world went mad in a smashing burst of sound
men caught off balance were hurled to the earth which shook against the guns
mines stupefied refused all function for a moment and revealed
everything within one hundred yards was nodding bitter tearing bites at
Men in Trees and wire the stately forest melted beneath a raging
storm of fire and steel heavy branches and tree trunks crushed the life out
for men who cowered among the roots for shelter. One heard a furious
awful screaming as the shell fire rolled away. Then mad waves
of charging infantry came after it mopping up and quote.
03:07:15
This allied counter-offensive puts an end to all those punches that the
German army had been throwing Luden Dorf will very quickly
cancel that punch he was thinking about throwing up in Flanders again and he put
the German army on the defensive and the German army has now reached a point in this
war that is you know you seed a lot of wars actually but it's that it's that point
when you are not defeated.
03:07:41
But you can no longer win how you play that
card when you're dealt it is very interesting
.
03:07:52
And once again makes us wonder about you know how
sound the mind of the man who's going to play this card
is during this time period Luden Dorf has been spotted by
subordinates crying.
03:08:09
At one point they will carefully convince him to go see a
psychiatrist and the exchange is actually almost a little comical I mean
you know these are human beings and we should have some sympathy but at the same time the the
psychiatry's a saying things like you never get out. You never smell the air what was the last time you had some good food you know
it's it's it's just sort of a you never think about yourself and didn't know it was going yes yes yes you're right it's
all true but what can I do.
03:08:35
And then later says that the war has taken everything
in one sense he's not exaggerating. Soon after the
German Michel offensive starts Luden Dorf motors
into territory that had been recently conquered by the Germans and some of this
ground contained graves and wooden door pulls up in the car the story
goes has them dig up the remains of one of the graves and he
identifies his son. Also named Eric Luton
Dorf. Now this is a stepson actually but supposedly he was as
close to them as biological sons and this was the second son that he'd lost
in this war.
03:09:21
Also the second pilot and you know it's interesting to sort of compare and
contrast. This is the last war where you see a lot of
famous powerful important people lose their children in the war
.
03:09:35
I can't think of another time period after this where it's been anything quite like this. I mean not only does allude to or
flues two stepsons but just off the top of my head the prime minister who
Britain you know went through the first two or so years of the war with Herbert Asquith he lost a son
Ferdinand farce the generals some of the allies he lost a son and famously when he had been
told the news he was busy in the middle of an offensive and doing stuff he was told the news he gave himself a
half hour to grieve composed himself and got back to work. Theodore
Roosevelt the famous adventure junkie encouraged his kids to get involved and then last won
a pilot also. It's hard to know how much
losing his second son in this war affected Luden Dorf tempted to feel
like it's just one more straw weighing down the camel's back and
he's in one of these positions you know I'm always fascinated by the extreme human
situations and Luden Doris in one of those positions now in history there's a lot of people who've been in
them where they're under this extreme crushing stress and I always wonder how much they can take
on is there a limit that everyone has or could you plug some other person with some other personality type in
the situation Luton or fifteen and have them do better. I mean look at adult Hitler in
the last four months of the Second World War He's under this crushing you know sort of
Damocles pressure and he's this palsied rack. Could you put someone
else in that role and have them do much better I don't know where the limits of human endurance
are. But you know it's a question that's valid
across the board you don't just want to ask it about the people at the top of the food chain like the Ludin Dorce
. You also want to ask it about the soldiers collectively in the fight. How
long can they endure. And also about the people back home remember one of the
things that this war really inaugurate is the idea of total war although
you can go back to other times in history and you see it but in the modern era total war means the
involvement of the what's called the home front and all the people are needed in this endeavor because
they produce if nothing else. You know all the munitions and everything the troops at the front need to keep
fighting. What happens when they reach the limits of their insurance
.
03:11:50
You know this last part of the war in the last couple of months will be known as the one
hundred days is one of those you know it's not a heavily
studied part of the war because it's not like the trench warfare part of the First World
War But it's one of those occurrences that when you read it
it brings strange emotions to the fore because what you're
watching is a sort of a doomed effort.
And the costs of the doomed effort are beyond belief. And so
as you watch it you don't know what to think because there's something
unbelievably admirable about the people in this
story's willingness to sacrifice all for
whatever reason.
03:12:41
But part of you just screams out at what appears to a person not in that
situation and let's be honest raised on much more cynical modern values what
appears to be frankly not that smart right
if you think that the war is over and you are looking at it from the early twenty
first century as we are and you watch these people go through unbelievable
things to prolong it. You know one second longer or something you can't help but
feel like you want to scream out against the collective waste of it all right
. You know if you know that this is done why let this continue.
And it's a strange emotion as I said.
03:13:22
There's something heroic about the last several months of the
war.
03:13:28
And one side of the heroism and again for people in the twenty first century
it's a little strange because we have the Second World War intervening in the way we think about things in the Second
World War really had a good and evil feel to it. The first world war was sold as a
good and evil war and the people of the time period kind of treated it that way. But one hundred years later as
we are now you can look back on it and see it's really not a good evil war it's really more of an
old line you know power politics international relations. It's pretty
representative in a much larger scale of the kind of war as people have always
fought.
03:14:06
And once you do that you can begin to see everyone sacrifice in a certain light and as I
said in a strange way the light that these people sacrifice
really takes on in the last several months of the war is is heroism
and the very old grand sense of the time and maybe a sort of a doomed
heroism.
03:14:28
Then as we said before you know there's a very tall can ask feeling to the
First World War and many people will say that that's not an accident. Tolkien's we mentioned in an earlier
episode was in this war as a soldier started writing the stuff that would
become things like The Lord Of The Rings. You know in this conflict Bay certain
scenes of The Lord Of The Rings on things he'd seen in this war
and the way that Tolkien sort of underpins his whole Lord Of The Rings story
is the Last Alliance of the grand old peoples that used to be
so powerful to take down the dark power and
then you know one of two things can happen either they could lose to the dark power and everything
will be covered in darkness or they can beat the dark power but in so doing
will so damage themselves that they're you know a high water mark on the
world stage will also be over it's a doomed victory and that's kind of
what we're watching in these last couple of months of the war. Where
a frightfully high amount of damage is being done to all sides in this
effort to bring what's now a foregone conclusion to an end. These people are
dying over terms maybe you know can we
kill enough of the enemy to make them give us a little more leeway on this point in the
peace treaty. That's what these people are really dying for but they're dying in such large
numbers that these will be mortal wounds really to the British and
the French Empires and if not moral ones in terms of replace ability because eventually you can replace
those people maybe mortal wounds on an imperial psyche
whose cost was now appearing to be unsustainable.
03:16:17
On August eighth the Allied Powers launched a long awaited
counterattack the punch back against the exhausted German
forces in the hopes that you can snap back like a
rubberband everything that they had taken in the past couple of months. They have washed up
to the top of the beach as we said the tide that had run out of momentum and on
August eighth they were hit with such extreme
violence in several places that Luden Dorf will
call it the black day of the German army in the history of this war
and who call it that. Not so much because the Germans were
smashed and pushed backward but they were but because it seemed to
be the first real confirmation that the morale
limits had been reached at least for some of these soldiers.
03:17:13
There were a ton of surrenders for example which is what had happened a couple weeks
before when the French had launched that battle with all those light tanks a lot of German surrendered now they did
again here and they didn't surrender in one's or two's. You know guys that have been
cornered in shell holes. They came in groups of heavily
armed men led by junior officers who would surrender to the first Allied
officer they ran into. Thirty fifty seventy five men of the
time it was a it was a sign of something different as the Germans didn't do this. It was a sign
that we were reaching the limits of endurance at least for some of these units the Army had become brittle
and on August eighth you see that because some elements of the army held firm. But when you're
trying to keep a solid line if it gives away anywhere the enemy streams through
that and then surrounds all the other position turning them into little islands amongst the enemy
and one of my favorite stories from August eighth because it really brings forward the
sense of confusion is of an officer in the second line of
defense who's in a bunker on a telephone trying to get news of what the heck's going on he could hear
stuff. It's foggy that day which is kind of like Mother Nature
deciding to equal the odds because it had been foggy through so many of the punches the
Germans had recently thrown in their one thousand nine hundred spring offensive it seems only fair. It would be
foggy. You know the day the Allies counterattack and it is in that bunker commander says you can't even see
ten feet out there. And then as he's on the phone trying to figure out what's going on an aide comes
down the stairs and and says that the lines are broken the enemy is has has has bypassed
this readout and is behind them and he says that before the person speaking even gets the
whole message out the grenades are rolling down his staircase into his
bunker. In other words the enemies they are already throwing grenades. So this
sums up how August eighth looked and the allies in the north up at I mean the
British who are using the Canadians and Australians as we said a sort of shock army's
use five hundred plus tanks and most of them are the big heavy ones that are that are
like school buses and they have the aircraft come in and do the ground attack missions.
They have the infantry come out they used the wall of shells but no preliminary
bombardment and German units just break in front of them
.
03:19:35
The French have success you know in there is that they launch a couple hours later
and the allies are pushing through German lines and making what by first
world war standards is great progress here's how historian Nick Lowe describes.
The day quote.
03:19:52
Eighth August would be one of the most remarkable days of the war. Although the position of all
units was not known the Allied assault had driven between six and eight miles into
German lines shattering the Second Army in unhinging the flank of the eighteenth army on its
left. German casualties had been staggering. The official history estimated that
they were as high as forty eight thousand men including thirty three thousand missing or taken
prisoner four hundred guns had been lost as well as hundreds of machine guns and
trench mortars for the battalions in the front line often only small groups of
survivors remained. He then continues quote numerous frontline battalions have
been reduced to the size of companies. All that remained were clusters of shell shocked
men. There will orderly broken their faces grimy their eyes
glassy staring straight ahead.
03:20:43
Their stories were always the same horrifying accounts of iron monsters clanking
out of the Mists towards them of mass infantry attacks of being cut off and
surrounded and waiting for counter attacks that never came. Some did not or
perhaps could not say anything at all lewd indorsed worst nightmare
was it seemed coming true.
03:21:05
End quote.
03:21:08
In his memoirs he is very suspect and take it with a grain of salt memoirs Luden
Dorf claims to have sent an observer to go and check out the scene
where these units were breaking and he says the observer came back and
said that the troops at the front line were yelling at the
reserves as they came up to take their place blacklegs
strikebreakers. You're prolonging the war and
looting Dorf pointed out that there was no way to hide now. You know the
changes in the fighting efficiency as he called it of the troops. They become brittle you
couldn't depend on some of them. Lindorff says of course that I warned you about this all the
time it's the Bolshevism taking hold he wanted to shoot more of them. Maybe as a way to
stiffen the defense. But then he says that this convinced him that the war
had to be ended. And then some history say that the Kaiser a day
or two later comes to the conclusion after talking with them that the war had to be ended and then other histories
say other things. I mean I don't even know how to describe all of the uncertainties as people try to
figure out what really happened as opposed to what ended up in the history books
. There's a lot of evidence to suggest that Luden Dorf was more of a hard
liner and held out until much later.
03:22:26
But when you see how again the sacrifice that's going to be made
because he maybe drags his feet on peace negotiations for example
.
03:22:36
That's a hard thing to justify after the war if a decision like that costs an extra hundred or two
hundred thousand casualties. How do you look your countrymen in the eye. Twenty thirty years
later right.
03:22:47
I think if I were in Luden or shoes I might try after the war to shade things in the
best light too. I mean one of the tragedies during this period will be a
German general who is looking at the incoming list of eighteen year olds and entire
age group now being called up again to be thrown into the mall of this war when it's
already decided and he'll say too bad about the young blood.
03:23:12
If one of those members of that new crop of young bloods was your son and you
lost him in that war afterwards reading lewd indorse memoirs you might not be too
pleased either. Nonetheless after the black day of the German
army on Aug eighth the allies will launch a series of regular
hammer blows of the Germans and they're all pretty darn awful. And between them there's
tons of fighting going on here the taking of this machine gun nasty moving into this
valley it's pretty much constant somewhere up and down the line pressure on the German army
and the casualties because now we've reverted back to open warfare again people are not hiding in
trenches which let's be honest are safer than being up above the trenches which is why
you had trenches to begin with and the casualties just go through the roof again at a
point in the war where really they're fighting for
improved terms of an armistice right and lewdness not exactly moving
all that fast supposedly the Kaiser wants to open up negotiations with the Netherlands but it's not
really taken off so fast in your thinking in your head as you look back on this tragedy every
day. You know all these people dying you just want them to hurry rush there's a time limit here right
every day you get a little closer to Armageddon.
03:24:30
Armageddon is exactly what historian Peter Hart called this period of the war
the period after the black day of the German army Aug eighth when multiple punches keep
knocking the Germans backward eventually knocking them back into those prepared defenses that
they had you know move forward from months ago everybody takes up their positions again then the Allies
smash through that hard says quote The Allied
armies British French American and Belgian moved forward along most
of the Western Front.
03:25:01
They were winning all right but casualties were still high. This was a truly
murderous form of warfare. It's a sobering statistic that of the one point two
million men serving in the British Expeditionary Force between August and November one thousand nine
hundred eighteen some three hundred sixty thousand of them became casualties.
This was unsustainable. The B.E.F. was being consumed. The French and Americans were
also suffering this was Armageddon and quote.
03:25:30
Again it reminds you of an almost token esque situation where the good
guys even if they win are going to be a shadow of their former selves
. But if it was bad for the allies who at least knew that they were going to win the
situation.
03:25:44
Think about what it was like for the people who are enduring with the knowledge that whatever they were
fighting for is already a moot point in passing and writes
quote most of the Kaiser's men were now utterly resigned to the prospect of
defeat and despair that they fought on in places with such tenacity and in such
good order never ceases to impress and amaze many that either witnessed it then or consider it
today but it was also a truly awful experience. Soldiers bemoaned their
plight and he quotes a German soldier during these last hundred days of the war quote
Our artillery is fired out. We have too few horses are fresh troops are
anemic boys in need of rest who cannot carry a pack but merely know how to
die by thousands. They understand nothing about warfare. They simply
go and let themselves be shot down. The summer of one thousand eight hundred has been the most bloody
and the most terrible. Every man here knows we are losing the war. Still the campaign
goes on. The dying goes on.
03:26:46
End quote.
03:26:49
Again that's another guy who might not want to read lewd indorsed memoirs after the
war after the war the great German historian militaries during Hans still Brooke will
be a scathing critique of Luden doors and with the same kind of rage that anyone might
have from that generation and even that side of the war when you realize that maybe
several hundred thousand casualties were unnecessary.
As we said the weird human emotion comes into play though is that
when you look at the sacrifices and the endurance of these people you can't help but
notice the heroism in it right. It's it's a strange thing
.
03:27:29
Lloyd George knows it though the British prime minister in his memoirs in a part that you can't really
spin goes out of his way to just talk about how amazing
the whole thing was he says quote.
03:27:41
This ceaseless body blows delivered with increasing power by the allied forces
left the German army breathless and helpless. But it is fair to acknowledge
that they retreated fighting for every kilometer that they ultimately had to concede. It
was not a chase and hardly a pursuit starved decimated
despairing. The German soldiers fought on making us pay a heavy price for
every mile we wrestled from them throughout the whole war the Germans had shown themselves
dowdy fighters. But there was nothing finer in their record than the pluck with which they
continued to withstand us in the hour of their defeat. They could not but know that they were
beaten at home their families were starving. Yet in the month of October the
last whole month of the war the British forces in France suffered over one hundred twenty thousand
battle casualties as evidence of the resistance they encountered between July
first and the conclusion of hostilities. The British battle casualties in fighting a
beaten foe and a foe that knew he was beaten on every front. Total
four hundred thirty thousand in killed wounded prisoners and missing during practically the
same period the French lost five hundred thirty one thousand men and the Americans over
two hundred thousand. Let us do honor to a brave people with whom we have had
but one deadly quarrel they fought to the end with desperate valor
and quote.
03:29:06
American historian Scott Stevenson wrote quote to be a
German defender in the path of a major allied attack late in the war was to
experience the horrors of Dantes inferno and
quote and truthfully when you read the stories they sound like they
could come from any part of this nightmare. The worst tragedy
here is that you get the feeling like all of this is you know coming after the
time when this conflict should be ended already if the whole thing is already
tragic this is the extra tragic part.
03:29:42
Historian Nick Lloyd talks about a German gunner named Ernst Kiel Meyer
who recorded in his diary about the fighting going on in late September early October
. He writes about his experience of coming under sustained British artillery
bombardment including a direct hit. He talks about three men and says that they
were quote torn apart beyond recognition. When he said Oh
Lord what a Monday morning and said quote I'm firing on gun number four
all day.
03:30:13
In between we picked up the pieces of bone and flesh and put them in a box. I marked
them with a red pencil my companion at all times so that the cemetery official will
know as there are metal plates with names and ranks could not be found. Try to pick up
three heads six arms and feet and whatever else there is left from your friends
and then the historian Nick Lloyd writes quote kill Myra was
understandably traumatized by his experiences.
03:30:41
Quote If that's how three of us die he wrote I hope their families will never
find out and quote.
03:30:49
And again as we've done earlier in this piece I want to emphasize. But these
are the survivors who go home and make the post First World
War world. These are what are in their memory banks these are what they carry
with them these are what influenced their politics their standards their
expectations and influences what they want. The
bitterness that is part of of what I don't Hitler is trying to touch
in his audience reading his book Mind comp is the sort of bitterness that
experiences like this generate. And they do so in an entire generation
after this war. The British and the French will also have their poets and their writers and
their thinkers and their politics. And when one wonders why they seem
so willing to do whatever it took before the Second World War even if it involved
what we call today appeasement. Look at what were in those people's memory banks
doing all those negotiations. The vast majority of the people that will be in
decision making positions militarily and politically were people who were in the
First World War And look at what they went through and think of
how it changed them.
03:32:04
As autumn was beginning to turn to November one thousand nine hundred eighteen optimists were beginning to think
that this war could be won in one thousand one thousand. Pessimists still pointed out maybe nine hundred
twenty was more realistic. If the Germans began a step by step dog defense they could
hold out for a long time you know it's worth pointing out because it's kind of important that
the Germans aren't on German soil yet they're retreating but they're still on conquered territory
something that they would continually tell themselves was you know a sign that they were
never defeated and something politicians after the war will play up to write the never
defeat the German army always on conquered territory but they're being battered pillar to post
during this last hundred days offensive.
03:32:47
They will retreat at one point to the old Hindoo Berg line these great defenses we're going to make a
stand they'll never break down the murder line in the American and French forces break through the end line.
03:33:00
Ironically though considering all of the debates the Allied commanders and politicians have been
having for years the eastern or western or debate where do you put the troops where do you win the war Western Front or
someplace else it's someplace else that collapses first
.
03:33:15
In this case it's what's called the Balkan front and for years the allies have been slowly
but surely building up forces in a place called Salonica in Greece and doing nothing with the
mainly the British especially joked that they were the gardeners of
Salonica because they were just sitting around a Greek army eventually joins the French and
British army that's there. The army of Serbia remember Serbia has been conquered taken over out of the
war now for a couple of years but their army fled with the King at the head and they've been
reconstituted here at Salonica but more people are dying from malaria there than
any military fighting and then all of a sudden in September one thousand eighteen. The allies strike
there against a bunch of bog Ariens who are poorly supplied poorly
motivated and certainly not ready to be hit by what is now more than four hundred
thousand allied troops and they collapse.
03:34:07
This imperils everything. And it's funny because if you read the Western histories written by
the British and the French and the Americans it's clear that to them this is a side show thing it
barely gets a mention sometimes but if you read German accounts this is a
catastrophe. They get their oil. A lot of their food from this area
.
03:34:26
This will certainly you know be the last card for the Austrian Carians who are teetering anyway
because this is right by them. The Ottoman Empire you know is one second away from
collapsing too. This is sort of a final straw. But it's when
Bulgaria drops out of the war in September twenty ninth that Luton door finally breaks
down. No ifs ands or buts about it. He goes to the
Kaiser and says that the war must be ended right away we need an armistice right now I can't guarantee
that the army will be able to stand another twenty four hours.
03:35:00
The German government contacts Woodrow Wilson hoping that they can get a nice deal from the Americans whereas the
British and the French are not feeling very charitable. Wilson still has has his idealistic fourteen
points out there and maybe the Germans can get that deal now looks a lot better to them while they were
treating than to do all they were advancing.
03:35:19
And as a German military historian Hans Delbruck writes and this is
the most painful event he's ever lived through and
he writes this at the time to the German public and as the editor of
the book points out this is something that would have been censored three weeks before he wrote it right it was so
anti-war or defeatist or whatever you want to say but now at this point in the
war he's allowed to openly say something like this.
03:35:48
Quote the same day I completed the previous volume the most
terrible fate we feared overcame us our southeast front in the Balkans broke
completely open the Bulgarian were defeated their king abdicated and the
army of the entente that had so long defended Salonica was on the march to the Danube
River in Syria the English not only fought but destroyed the Turkish army and took
Damascus in Constantinople the German allied Turkish government of Embratel it
is gone it will not be long before the English fleet has free access to the Black Sea
Austria-Hungary is also in full dissolution on the western front. Our hope that the
enemy offensive would not pass through our Siegfried line is unfulfilled under heavy
losses of prisoners and material. Our army retreats from one place to another. The
superiority of our combined enemies not only in men but also in material
airplanes tanks of munitions far exceeds expectations and calculations. When
we remember how strong we look to the world this past spring and our battlefield
successes from the twenty first of March through June. Our sudden reverse is hard to believe
.
03:36:56
End quote.
03:36:58
On October thirtieth the Ottomans drop out of the war
. On Nov third. The
Austrians do.
03:37:09
While all this is going on you have this very weird almost month long period
where negotiations are opening and going on behind the scenes and everybody begins to
get the impression that things are happening I mean the mood is quickening the war is is winding to
some sort of a conclusion but people are still dying in mass numbers.
Some in the higher ups of the German Navy decided that if the war's going to end like
this the German navy is going to go out heroically and
they come up with an idea for an Imperial Navy Death
Ride to Sally with everything you have take on the British
fleet. You know when a giant head to head battle and go down fighting it take as many of them with you as you
can.
03:37:54
Which sounds heroic and wonderful if you're some admiral somewhere when news
that this is what's going on reaches the sailors in the fleet though who can also see
that the war is winding down everybody's going to get to go home it's terrible but it's over and then they
find out they get to be part of some death ride to save some honor for a fleet that isn't
going to be around whether the death ride happens or not in a
month's time.
03:38:20
They say no and they begin to
rebel. Riot is not too strong of a word. First they have
mutineers the mutineers are captured then the rest of the fleet its sailors get upset
about the mutineers and long story short they end up you know running through the streets taking over the
Naval city of Kiel and then they send out runners to other
nearby cities and they begin to spread an idea not that dissimilar from
ideas that were being spread in Russia the year before.
Here is the fire from Luton Dorce neighbor's apartment
finally taking flame in Germany. And there's been a lot of
analysis as to how Bolshevik oriented some of this is. And the truth is most of it
isn't the left in Germany runs the gamut from mild Social Democrats
all the way to hard core what are called Spartacists and everything in
between. And part of what'll happen over the next six months in Germany will happen because
there's no agreement on the left at all as to what should happen except that they're pretty darn
unified about one thing. The war shouldn't happen anymore and as
these people spread to other locations city after city goes
revolutionary. The great journalist Philip Gibbs who was with the Allied
entente armies as they as they batter the Germans back towards Germany you
know thinks of everything they've been through through these years of war he writes quote The thought of all the
losses on the way and of all the futility of this strife smote at
one's heart what fools the Germans had been.
03:39:58
What tragic fools.
03:40:00
What a mad villainy there had been among rival dynasties and powers and politicians and
peoples to lead to this massacre. What had one gained out of it all.
Nothing except ruin. Nothing except great death and poverty and remorse and
revolt end quote.
03:40:16
And as the German armies are collapsing Gibbs points out that it's not a moment too soon. He
writes quote.
03:40:22
If the British army could not have gone much farther after November eleventh when the armistice
brought us to a halt for three months our troops had fought incessantly storming many
villages strongly garrisoned with machine gunners crossing many canals under heavy fire
losing many comrades all along the way. The pace could not have been kept up. There was
a limit even to the valor of British troops and for a time we had reached that limit. There were not
many divisions who could have staggered on to new attacks without rest and relief
. It goes on to talk about the French and the Americans and then says
quote. Before then the German troops were in revolt. At last against the
bloody futile sacrifices of their manhood and people a blinding
light had come to them revealing the criminality of their war lords in this great
swindle against their race. It was defeat an agony which enlightened them
as most people even ourselves are enlightened only by suffering in disillusionment and
never by successes and caught.
03:41:24
If you read mine come from this moment in the war
is the crucible of Hitler's life and he says basically what
Gibbs said you know when he finds out about what's going on he is
recovering from a gas attack in the hospital and he finds out that
this war is essentially winding down to an armistice and the German government and the allies and
especially Woodrow Wilson are negotiating back and forth as people die and Hitler freaks out
and then he writes about it in mind calm in a way that is
tactically brilliant.
03:42:00
I mean Hitler is a demagogue of the highest order and knows exactly you know
what buttons to push in his audience and he knows that this audience you know
ten years fifteen years after the war not even that long in some cases are
still in shock and denial and disbelief and the bitterness that they're drowning in
thinking of what was lost and who they knew who was lost and in the limbs that they had lost in the
lives of the change. He knew that those buttons were right for
exploiting.
03:42:32
And yet at the same time demagogue and manipulator though he was Hitler understood those
buttons really well because those were actually the same buttons that he was so affected
by. He wrote this in mind calm and remember imagine reading this as one of those
people sitting there without an alarm. Fifteen years after the war.
Tortured by that experience still Hitler says quote
.
03:42:56
And so it had all been in vain in vain all the sacrifices and privations
in vain the hunger and thirst of months which were often endless in vain
the hours in which with mortal fear clutching our hearts we nevertheless did our duty
and in vain the deaths of two millions who died would not the graves of all the
hundreds of thousands open the graves of those who with faith in the Fatherland had
marched forth never to return would they not open and send the silent mud
and blood covered heroes back as spirits a vengeance to the homeland which had cheated
them with such mockery of the highest sacrifices which a man can make to his people in this world.
Had they died for this. The soldiers of August and September nine hundred fourteen. Was
it for this in the autumn of the same year that the volunteer regiments marched out after their
old comrades. Was it for this that the boys of seventeen sank into the earth to
Flanders. Was this the meaning of the sacrifice which the German mother made to the
Fatherland with a sore heart as she let her best love boys march off never
to see them again.
03:44:01
Did all this happen only so that a gang of wretched criminals could lay hands on the
Fatherland and court this bitterness was
not just on the side of the Central Powers who lost this war though Corporal
Louis Barton was in the French army is if nothing else
almost in sympathy with the German veterans many
of these people felt cheated by the whole thing disillusioned by the whole thing
exploited even.
03:44:31
Bart sounds like he feels more sympathy for his German enemy
than he does for the people you know that in his mind anyway. BARDAS is a socialist and
believes that the people running the world are kind of the enemy.
03:44:45
He writes quote Meanwhile the great drama was reaching its conclusion
alone against twenty nations baying after her in a fantastic clammer
Germany so proud in one thousand fourteen now on its knees ask for
mercy. Asked for armistice. But this way of fleeing the war didn't appeal to the
striped sleeves who didn't have their fill of crosses medals stars stripes
ribbons honors and glories for these folks. War had to end with total
disaster for the German army against which Gen Waterloo and said Don would be
mere skirmishes. Thousands of captured cannon hundreds of thousands of
captured Bosches shattered enemy forces streaming back across the Rhine bridges
pursued with bayonets at their backs by our soldiers our regiments entering the great cities
beyond the Rhine flags fluttering bands playing. Here was the Apotheosis dreamed of
not only by our great warriors but by the government. Almost all the press almost
all the Embassy gazing back in the rear all those who had nothing more to lose or who had more
to gain by continuing the war. What did one hundred thousand two hundred thousand more
cadavers matter a few more months of unimaginable suffering to bear.
Did that matter for those who were far from the slugfest he says and to
accomplish this monstrous dream the so-called allied government sought to delay for as long as
possible.
03:46:07
The hour of the last cannon shot by requiring Germany to repeat its demands for armistice
several times for simple questions of form and formulas he says
during that time in an orgy of murder bloodletting and burning the whole front was in
flames from EPE to Belfour without exception all the regiments were thrown into the assault on the
German machine guns. He says the German army is bent back on all
the points of contact without letting their line be broken and their retreat didn't turn into a
rout and quote what you hear there is
admiration from a soldier to a soldier and sort of a
shared understanding that when it came right down to it you know
truces could be called on they could go in the middle of no man's land and share tobacco and chocolate
with each other. But the people that parts House had said earlier in the work
force them to fight each other against their will would continue the
conflict until things were just the way they wanted and people will die
until the absolute last minute of this conflict in fact they
will die for decades afterwards. The Germans will finally work out a
deal with Woodrow Wilson and the allies on the Entente they have to get rid of their form of
government and transition to a republic Luden Dorf offers his
resignation.
03:47:30
You know the last couple days of October it's accepted he dons a disguise and flees the
country and the Kaiser is told that he has to abdicate
. You know to save lives and end the war and he tries not to but is kind of
he says stabbed in the back too and kind of forced to him and he flees to the Netherlands and now this new
German government which has been sort of left behind as a landmine by
guys like Luton who have alluded to are famously said again blaming the socialists on the people back
home you know that they did this stab in the back so let them pick up the pieces and let them get
blamed by signing all the surrender and armistice papers and that's kind of the way Luden
door started spinning this whole thing from minute one.
03:48:12
Hitler picked up on that and entire German political movement will play off
this idea that these people who signed the peace agreement the traitors of
November were the ones who lost the war and that it was never lost
at the front by the soldiers. This will set the stage for the next
conflict and when the actual peace agreement is signed sealed and
delivered which will happen for quite a while they'll be long negotiations into one thousand one thousand
. The results are so punitive. That
people will realize forward thinkers will realize and will say at the time
that this does nothing but delay the decision and that they will be so
many embittered elements after this treaty is signed the one that will actually end the First World War It
will be a series of treaties actually that you're guaranteeing another world war in the
near future.
03:49:07
Yet one can't help but think of all the men in uniform especially
those in combat units at the front who were just glad
that they were going to have a future. And at the eleventh hour
the eleventh day of the eleventh month eleven A.M.
November eleventh nineteen eighteen on many
different fronts.
03:49:34
Soldiers greeted this moment this agreed moment it's a
little strange when the war would end in advance.
03:49:44
The historian soldier and politician John Buchan was there in one part of the front.
03:49:48
The minute the war ended Here's what he wrote quote
at two minutes to eleven opposite the South African brigade at the easternmost point
reached by the British army's a German machine gunner after firing off a belt
without a pause was seen to stand up take off his helmet bow
and then walk slowly to the rear.
03:50:11
There came a second of expectant silence and then a curious rippling sound
which observers far behind the front likened to the noise of a light wind
.
03:50:21
It was the sound of men cheering from the Vose to the sea
and quote the future may have been poisoned. But
at least these people would be there to see it.
03:50:36
November eleventh will be celebrated after the war as Armistice Day
and will be celebrated with a wide mix and range of emotions.
The war however had taken the geo political chess map of the world
that had been basically in place since Napoleon's defeat a hundred years before
and threw it up in the air and as the pieces fell back
down to earth and people tried to reconstruct a new
world really as countries had been totally removed from the map. A lot of
people were going to suffer.
03:51:14
Part of the reason that the first world war is so important to our modern
time is that it's a little like a giant bundle of
firecrackers that when you light it off nice big chunks of firecrackers blow off in the
distance and continue to explode sometimes with more violence than the original I mean that's what the Second World
War is right a direct successor Bolshevism in Russia
which leads to the Cold War the situation in the Middle East and the oil and
the Colonial impact.
03:51:46
The thing about the First World War is that it wasn't quite Armageddon yet
the very things that probably were needed to create an absolute
global holocaust hadn't yet entered into the picture of things like nuclear weapons for
example. But I think you can safely say looking at it that what the First World
War was was a blueprint for Armageddon.
03:52:14
So from a business sense or a
self promotion sense the Internet's the greatest thing that ever happened to regular people I talk to people
about this all the time I'm an obvious beneficiary of the fact I don't have to have a
broadcast transmitter or radio station to do what I do. Those of you who do
online commerce or who are even trying to get your name or work
out there you know we have this advantage of Web sites and I don't think we
quite realize the revolutionary nature of them they've become such an integral part of our
lives. The novelty has worn off but trust me once upon a time doing for yourself what
a website does for you was extremely expensive and only the very few could do it this is a
form of democratized media thats in your hands and it doesn't have to be
complicated.
03:53:02
It can be simple. These days it can be powerful and beautiful and inexpensive
to think about Squarespace when you want to start a new website.
03:53:13
Only eight dollars a month to get a free domain. If you buy a square space for a year
you want to worry about things like responsive design. It'll scale on any device already
commerce is built into what covered pages are built into it. You can do it yourself and it
looks great. If you've ever thought about having a website it might be worth a
try. Not too bad of an experiment and usually I find when people put a
website together not only do they continue to do that but they often make it
evolve and change and grow.
03:53:45
I firmly believe down the road most people will have some version of their own
website and most of us don't want to spend a ton of time coding and certainly a ton of money
paying some professional firm to do which you can do with Squarespace and it's
simple powerful and beautiful and you'll get ten percent off your first purchase
if you sign up to square space and use our offer code hardcore
Squarespace build beautiful.
03:54:17
If this were a book this would sort of be the postscript section I guess.
But one of the most interesting aspects of the First World War is what came
right afterwards sort of as a result and it changed so much. So the catalyst for
change itself was interesting but the change in Australian was fascinating
.
03:54:38
Start with the fact that all of a sudden the map of Europe the great geo political
chessboard that had existed forever was thrown up in the air totally scatter and
all of a sudden pieces fell down that hadn't existed you know in a long time all of a sudden
Poland was back there hadn't been a Poland for quite some time. All of a sudden there was going to be you know
like a Czechoslovakia I mean these are places that used to be part of larger
empires but those empires were smashed by this war Austria-Hungary alone when you
break that up you get a bunch of new countries.
03:55:10
If you break the Ottoman Empire up you get the modern Middle East
.
03:55:16
You break Germany and you get arguments for
the Second World War right to get dancing and you get this new date new land and
what's also apparent at the end of the First World War is you get
this period of people who are trying to play the game the way it's always been
played and maybe you could make an argument always will be played and people who are trying
to utilise the flipside of bitterness I guess you could say to create a
better world. We talked earlier about Woodrow Wilson and his idealism or
fake idealism depends on which Woodrow Wilson you buy into. But nonetheless when you
sell a war on the idea that is a war to end all wars.
Sometimes that becomes powerful hype that you have to at least make a good argument around if you
want to play things the old fashioned way. The British and the French for example
make out like winners in the war when it comes
to the territory that they acquired when the Ottoman Empire broke up all those
new countries didn't really get full independence most of them had a sort of a
compromise sovereignty is not a good way to put it with the French or the British Empire in
charge that twentieth century version of coal thing oil
. The British will miraculously end up with a ton of it.
03:56:39
But the Americans and others had pushed ideas like self-determination and the British had sort of mouthed
that too and they kind of believed it too and it's one of those things where as the prime minister
had said he kind of would have been remiss if he didn't grab some of that area just let the French have it.
Nonetheless they all kind of realized it didn't look that great with the new set of values in play. But
self-determination became this weird thing to do you know who deserves their own
place and and how can you use self-determination as a weapon Hitler would use it against one
of those territories that was created out of whole cloth by the World War One peace agreements a place
called Czechoslovakia within that place was a territory that had a majority of
Germans. It's called the Sudeten land and Hitler would turn the
arguments of idealism and self-determination on their head when he said hey of
self-determination what you really believe in.
03:57:29
Those Germans in the Sudeten land should be allowed to come back to Germany and bring their land with
them. This would turn out to be a big problem in what are called the interwar
years it would hamstring an entity that was truly
idealistic like the League of Nations set up after the First World War
by the people who are as I said on the flip side sort of of the global bipolar mood.
Instead of being bitter their attitude about the First World War was a sort of a never again
attitude. And things like the League of Nations and collective security. We're
going to ensure that the world never had a tragedy like that happened again
. We emphasize the bitterness at the end of the last program because the bitterness
helps play into the next war. But there were a lot of people that weren't bitter. And it's only fair to
point that out first of all you had people a lot of times these were officers too it's interesting
to note who were so proud of their war service and what happened and justifiably so look what
these people endured. Wouldn't take anything away from anyone. Some people
straight up enjoy the experience. Ernst Junger has a piece in his book where he
does something that I think many people throughout history have done when they are at Giant
historical events when you're in a great battle and you know you're watching history
unfold. Sometimes there's a powerful feeling in that and especially when you
think you're playing a part in it. On the fiftieth anniversary of the Normandy landings
of D.-Day I remember there was a newspaper article published by an Army
psychiatrist who was talking about these kinds of moments in
soldiers' lives and said that for many of the men you know who were at
D.-Day in the second world war that was the greatest experience of their lives the greatest event they
would take part in. His story Neil Ferguson in his book
The pity of war describes the remembrances of a couple of soldiers
who were probably representative of a whole lot of these soldiers. One's a Canadian
private talking about you know what the First World War was to him and he said it was quote the
greatest adventure of my life.
03:59:36
The memories of which will remain with me for the remainder of my days. And I would not have missed it for
anything.
03:59:42
End quote.
03:59:44
It also had this sort of momentous feeling that was sometimes tough
to you know recapture in private life. Ferguson also quoted another
soldier that said quote everything that happened after the war was an
anti-climax end quote.
04:00:02
In some ways the war was an anti-climax. So many
people went to fight based on ideas like The War To End All Wars
.
04:00:12
And yet people who were rather far sighted but there were plenty of them
before the smoke had even cleared. We're predicting the Second World War I mean the generally
Simo of the Allied entente forces Ferdinand farce had said when he
saw the overside peace treaty this is not peace.
04:00:31
This is a twenty year armistice and by the way it was almost twenty years exactly twenty one.
04:00:38
Yet look to the British and the French like they made out well with territories that they were able to take over
but they were both in terms of their great power
status mortally wounded. You know the eventual cost of
this war especially falls on Britain's shoulders more than any others they were sort of the banker of the
Allied side and they are still are or were recently I don't know if there are still
outstanding loans but it was only in the last few months that they paid off one of the outstanding first
world war debts that were still out there as we had said in the show will be the
center of the world trade and banking transferred from London to New York
during this conflict and as a result of the financial transfer of wealth from the
Old World to the new world that this conflict required.
04:01:27
As we had said about token this is this is the you know peoples
of the free peoples of Middle earth destroying themselves to take down the dark lord
right he's gone. Imperial Germany is no threat to anyone any more. But
France and Britain to name just two countries I mean not even to go into Russia's
backyard and mention then France and Britain will never quite be what they were
. The Russians Needless to say aren't going to
be what they are they're going to be living under a communist regime for
decades.
04:02:01
The Czar and his family in the middle of one thousand nine hundred eighteen will be
executed by the Bolsheviks every last one of them and the cook
. The United States comes out of the war. Well
actually they're on the receiving end of all that old world wealth for example
. But for Americans it was quite a change a change that had really started
with the Spanish-American war. You know twenty or so years before the First World War when the
United States started going abroad and involving themselves more overseas the
First World War solidified that trend and even though after the war there would be this mood
that you know we're not doing that again. You could tell that it's it was sort of like
virginity a a a barrier had been crossed and you really just couldn't go
back to the way things were or we'd find that out as Americans in the second world war.
04:02:55
Americans also got to experience other things that would not be uncommon in Europe things like
sedition an Espionage Act imposed by the Wilson administration things to prevent
criticism of the war anti-war activities criminalized laws that are
still on the books and still used today that most people look back on
and still think that those were extreme overreaches of presidential authority.
04:03:19
Nonetheless you know it was the first world war and the threat was there
.
04:03:26
Japan as I said it would be the United States or Japan that I would nominate for the big victors in these
wars. Japan had a relatively easy run of it took over anything that was over in their territory that was
German and then started moving in more to the Asian mainland.
04:03:39
Already in charge of a lot of Korean folks they started taking over territory that would
eventually morph into what some historians now considered to be the really early
stages of the Second World War because by the time the second world
war breaks out the Japanese had been involved in fighting with the Chinese for years and some
fighting with the Russians to Turkey will continue to have problems with
violence and ethnic conflict and modernism. The fighting
will never really stop over in Anatolia. Then that country
will continue to strive towards a more national statehood they'll go through a
period under command a lot of torque Mostafa come out that's important
in their history.
04:04:24
They'll also have to begin to live down some of the things
that were done during the First World War and famously to Armenians but also to
people like Assyrian Christians Greeks the Turks had an
ethnic problem that they dealt with sometimes in a very heavy handed
manner. The Austria-Hungary INS also had an ethnic
problem.
04:04:49
They along with the Hapsburg rulers that had been in power for centuries were
wiped away as a result of this war and the idea of
self-determination that Hitler would be able to use about the sedating land and whatnot would
begin to raise uglies sort of questions in places like
India controlled by the British but not necessarily because the Indians
wanted it that way.
04:05:18
Trying to clean up after the war is one of the great efforts of
modern times. First you have the bodies to deal
with then you have the damage to the battlefields and then you have the cleanup
that happens you know in in the collective
populations of all these countries the emotional cleanup if you will the getting past it
all of these societies that were heavily involved in the first world war will have a lot of disabled
veterans around it will be a very visible reminder. Nobody gets to
just put this behind them and walk away unscathed
. Here's a story. Adam Hochschild in his book
relates the dates from the time of these last German offensive. You know the
big last card being played. That is a perfect example of what was
going on in hundreds of thousands of homes I mean there's no question
it was that many I'm just playin that number safe. How child talks about these
cards that the officers would send to family members
informing them that their child or loved one was dead or missing
.
04:06:31
And he says quote The cards flowed out in a ceaseless stream.
But when it came to Steven Hobhouse his younger brother. His parents like so many
others simply received word that in the new German offensive the twenty three year old
Paul was quote missing presumed killed end quote. He had
been seen fighting then falling when his unit's position was overrun several
months later the family's hopes were raised when a fellow officer passed on a rumor that Paul was
wounded and a prisoner in Germany with mail going through contacts in neutral
countries. Stephen got in touch with a passivist committee in Berlin. Quote I was very
glad to be able to set on foot by this means in search for my brother Paul.
Alas no trace of him could be found. My poor mother for over six months
persisted in the fond belief that Paul would return and quote Hochschild
continues. During that time Margaret Hobhouse never ceased to write letters to her
son. Although they eventually came back marked undeliverable return to
sender.
04:07:35
Paul's body was never found.
04:07:38
End quote.
04:07:41
But lots and lots of other people's work and they're still being found
.
04:07:46
You know you don't know how much of the really nasty stuff
to get into on a program like this because you don't want to be gratuitous but what you do
want to be able to do is in your mind's eye see what these people
are seeing right as we always say you can experience or understand what they're going through but you can try
to have the tiniest little bit of emotional sympathy but you kind of have to see
things through their eyes and what they're seeing is permanently scarring the
people who have to clean up after this war are sometimes as traumatized as the people
that have to fight it after these last big German offensives that
that last story dealt with that the boy missing and presumed killed the
people who were killed had to be picked up by somebody an American
soldier named Robert Hoffman in August one thousand nine hundred eighteen was one of those somebodies one
day.
04:08:42
He writes quote Did you ever smell a dead mouse. That will give you about as
much idea of what a group of long dead soldiers smells like as Will one grain of
sand give you an idea of Atlantic City's beaches. A group of men were
sent to Hill two or four to make a reconnaissance to report on conditions there as well as
to bury the dead. The story was a very pathetic one he says the men were still
lying there nearly two weeks later just as they'd fallen. I knew all of these men
intimately and it was indeed painful to learn of their condition. Some had apparently
lived for some time had tried to address their own wounds or their comrades addressed them
but later they died there. I was especially pleased that the capture of the German soldiers had made it
possible to bring back all the wounded in our sector. Many of the men had been pumped full of
machine gun bullets shot almost beyond recognition. One hundred or so bullets
even in a dead man's body is not a pretty sight. One of our members lying with a German bayonet
through him not unlike a pin through a large beetle. Bayonets are hard to remove when
once they've been caught between the ribs especially the Sawtooth bayonets many of the Germans
carried to dislodge them it's usually necessary to shoot once or more to loosen the bayonet
. This German had not waited but left his gun and passed on the little Italian boy
was lying on the barbed wire. His eyes open and his helmet hanging back on his head.
There's been so much shrapnel in some of the bodies were torn beyond recognition. This was the
first experience of handling and burying the dead for many of our men. It was a trying
experience as I was to personally find somewhat later.
04:10:18
He then goes on to say there's nothing more pitiful than a battlefield after a battle
.
04:10:25
Well pitiful Yes but dangerous is another term we might
use because this cleanup is ongoing even now. There's a good
side in the downside for the clean up process with having a war that doesn't move
the great mass of Europe and places elsewhere were spared the total
sort of ruinous war that the Second World War brought to so many areas. But the places where
the war was actually fought were devastated and not just devastated permanently scarred maybe
permanently ruined.
04:10:57
Certainly for several forseeable lifetimes author Donovan Webster wrote a whole
book on the state of those battlefields in earlier wars
today and the most polluted most dangerous most
impossible to imagine them ever cleaning up are all these ones that the first war a war fought on the
western front. In these places where things didn't move for years because the
shells buried themselves in the ground.
04:11:23
I don't remember what the exact percentage that they that they estimated the number of duds
versus the number of good shells were but since one thousand nine hundred forty six
French specialists have removed eighteen
million shells and they estimate that there's another twelve
million just around verged on the biggest
shells like those Paris gun shells the duds from those are so deep in
the earth they won't even make their way to the surface for sixty years
. Hundreds and hundreds of these people who go and
try to clean up these areas die. There have been farmers killed or like thirty five killed in
one year when their tractors were hitting shells and some of the shells as you might imagine
are chemical weapons. The problems that these people have trying to reclaim the areas
are so bad that they just have cordoned off the area since the war and millions
upon millions of acres of France and part of Belgium are just shut down. Too
dangerous. So it's like the world's biggest garbage dump with human beings all
ground up through it and then it's littered with booby trapped explosives and chemical weapons
. Good luck cleaning that moonscape up.
04:12:39
The Germans have thought that they were signing something more like an armistice
more like a secession of hostilities more like some deal along the lines of what they thought.
Woodrow Wilson was talking about in the fourteen points.
04:12:52
What they ended up with was more like a surrender and truly given
their military condition that's probably what they should have been doing. But
even as the war was winding down Luton Dorf changed his
mind at the last minute and wanted to restart the conflict right before the armistice
actually took effect would not have been an interesting what if scenario. Nonetheless his
army was ready to go home and in a lot of cases was going home by the end and the Germans had at
least a million people that they thought were shirking or were not listening to orders or simply
refusing to fight any more. The deal at the end of the war and the difference
that the Germans thought they were getting versus what they actually got was one of the seeds that Solo's the future
bitterness the German navy manages to sort of give the middle
finger to the allies you know the year after the war is over when they're
transferring their fleet to Britain as part of the mandated things that they had to
do you know with the peace treaty and they intentionally sink a bunch of the
ships so they may have rioted against their own officers
at the end of the war but that didn't mean they wanted the former enemy to end up in
possession of their vessels. I'd also like to
quickly mention something that I think you're aware of that's been throughout this whole program but
the ripples of pain that these wars and all these deaths and
maimings and sufferings cost the number of people you know relating to the
soldier or civilian who experienced the horribleness and how that just radiates across
societies you can go read the artists of this
post-war generation and and sometimes it's just so incredibly haunting I mean you'll read
. They'll talk about for example that there are all these women who sweethearts or Botros
or people that you know they maybe would have married somewhere down the road didn't exist because they died in the war so they
ended up spinsters. I mean just decades of pain
you know rippling through these societies and the sense of loss
. And often times in some of these nation states plagued by
chaos you know as they tried to find their in their new path I mean Germany's a
perfect example Russia's an even better one. People were often confused and
sometimes caught up in the wheels of things that they had no
control over.
04:15:18
How would you like to be some civilian living in a country that went fascist on you
or Bolshevik on you or that fell apart.
04:15:28
I'd like to point out that the problem with this story
that we did here is the same problem you often run into if you you know
read or speak in the English language and you want to you know get a hold of something about the
First World War. I've often said that doing these programs has given me
the most sympathy for the people who actually write these books
and create the materials that we use as as sources for this program for example
because once you try to do even a pale imitation of what they're trying to do
you instantly see you have all your questions answered right Also why didn't they do this and then you
started to do this kind of a show yourself and you go oh my gosh how am I ever going to include this
without screwing something up. I mean. If there's anybody who got really shafted in
this story I mean I can think of numerous peoples who deserved a ton more time but I think we
alluded to it earlier the French are an enormous part of the story I don't even get to Clemens So that's
inexcusable right. How do you even get away with that Carlen. All I can say
is look how long this series is now I mean I
left out tons of stuff to get it down to this enormous length isn't that terrible. And what about
the people in the Balkans right this is where the whole war begins. Those are the people who had an
amazing history right before the first world war. They're finding themselves in their
national identity and consciousness is all coming together I mean it's a fantastically both
dramatic and dramatic time of change I mean it's colorful it's interesting
.
04:17:01
The situation in the Middle East with the Ottomans and and the Modern Middle East beginning to form
Africa got totally shafted in the story could've been a whole podcast series on the
first world war in Africa and the Far East is busy setting the stage for the Pacific
war in the second world war and we dealt with it minimally.
As a point of explanation though I might point out the lack of
good English works on this subject. We
have a lot of quotes from Germans a lot of quotes from British folks and their dominions a lot of
quotes from the United States. There are not a ton of good books even on the French where you get a lot of
first hand accounts from soldiers of their experiences. I found one really good one and we've used it in the
show but that guy wasn't at the battle you're talking about. All of a sudden the sources are hard to come by. I
love to have more from the Russian side. The Balkans the Ottomans
to Africa would be great too. Finally there were some subjects we could have
gone into more deeply that I know a lot of you want. I mean some of you people geek out
about the military side of history as I do.
04:18:09
We did do some discussions on airplanes that didn't make it into the show we did some deeper
stuff on the warships that did bring it into another show those a law will be
rolled together with some other Popery I put together in the extra show whenever we get
that out and I'm not promising when that happens I got another one of the real you know regular history shows
to start working on right away because you folks have been patient with me. This one took longer than any we've
ever had in the past. Well I guess you could probably see why go look at the reading list. Be nice to
do a subject that is not as well documented next time. Thank you for everything
ladies and gentleman.